CHAPTER I.
Come hither, neighbor Sea-coalGod hath blessed you with
a good name: to be a well-favored man is the gift of fortune; but
to write and read comes by Nature.
Much ado about Nothing
.
IT has already been said, that the hour at which
the action of the tale must re-commence, was early
morning. The usual coolness of night, in a country
extensively covered with wood, had passed, and the
warmth of a summer morning, in that low latitude,
was causing the streaks of light vapor, that floated
about the meadows, to rise above the trees. The
feathery patches united to form a cloud that sailed
away towards the summit of a distant mountain,
which appeared to be a common rendezvous for
all the mists that had been generated by the past
hours of darkness.
Though the burnished sky announced his near
approach, the sun was not yet visible.
Notwithstanding
the earliness of the hour, a man was
already mounting a little ascent in the road, at no
great distance from the southern entrance of the
hamlet, and at a point where he could command a
view of all the objects described in the preceding
chapter. A musket thrown across his left shoulder,
with the horn and pouch at his sides, together with
the little wallet at his back, proclaimed him one
who had either been engaged in a hunt, or in some
short expedition of even a less peaceable character
His dress was of the usual material and fashion of
a countryman of the age and colony, though a short
broadsword, that was thrust through a wampum
belt which girded his body, might have attracted
observation. In all other respects, he had the air
of an inhabitant of the hamlet, who had found
occasion
to quit his abode on some affair of pleasure
or of duty, that had made no very serious demand
on his time.
Whether native or stranger, few ever passed the
hillock named, without pausing to gaze at the quiet
loveliness of the cluster of houses that lay in full
view from its summit. The individual mentioned
loitered as usual, but, instead of following the line
of the path, his eye rather sought some object in
the direction of the fields. Moving leisurely to the
nearest fence, he threw down the upper rails of
a pair of bars, and beckoned to a horseman, who
was picking his way across a broken bit of pasture
land, to enter the highway by the passage he had
opened.
Put the spur smartly into the pacer's flank,
said he who had done this act of civility, observing
that the other hesitated to urge his beast across
the irregular and somewhat scattered pile; my
word for it, the jade goes over them all, without
touching with more than three of her four feet.
Fie, doctor! there is never a cow in the
Wish-Ton-Wish
,
but it would take the leap to be in the first
at the milking.
Softly, Ensign; returned the timid equestrian,
laying the emphasis on the final syllable of his
companion's
title, and pronouncing the first as if it were
spelt with the third instead of the second vowel.
Thy courage is meet for one set apart for deeds
of valor, but it would be a sorrowful day when the
ailing of the valley should knock at my door, and a
1 *
broken limb be made the apology for want of
succor
.
Thy efforts will not avail thee, man; for the
mare hath had schooling, as well as her master. I
have trained the beast to methodical habits, and
she hath come to have a rooted dislike to all
irregularities
of movement. So, cease tugging at the
rein, as if thou wouldst compel her to pass the pile
in spite of her teeth, and throw down the upper
bar altogether.
A doctor in these rugged parts should be
mounted
on one of those ambling birds of which we read,
said the other, removing the obstacle to the secure
passage of his friend; for truly a journey at night,
in the paths of these clearings, is not always as safe
moving as that which is said to be enjoyed by the
settlers nearer sea.
And where hast found mention of a bird of a
size and velocity fit to be the bearer of the weight
of a man? demanded he who was mounted, with
a vivacity that betrayed some jealousy on the
subject
of a monopoly of learning. I had thought
there was never a book in the valley, out of mine
own closet, that dealeth in these abstrusities!
Dost think the scriptures are strangers to us?
Therethou art now in the public path, and thy
journey is without danger. It is matter of marvel
to many in this settlement, how thou movest about
at midnight, amongst upturned roots of trees, holes,
logs and stumps, without falling
I have told thee, Ensign, it is by virtue of much
training given to the beast. Certain am I, that
neither whip nor spur would compel the animal to
pass the bounds of discretion. Often have I travelled
this bridle-path, without fear as in truth without
danger, when sight was a sense of as little use as
that of smelling.
I was about to say, falling into thine own hands,
which would be a tumble of little less jeopardy than
even that of the wicked spirits.
The medical man affected to laugh at his
companion's
joke; but, remembering the dignity suited
to one of his calling, he immediately resumed the
discourse with gravity
These may be matters of levity, with those
who know little of the hardships that are endured
in the practice of the settlements. Here have I
been on yonder mountain, guided by the instinct of
my horse
Ha! hath there been a call at the dwelling of
my brother Ring? demanded the pedestrain,
observing
,
by the direction of the other's eye, the road
he had been travelling.
Truly, there hath; and at the unseasonable
hour that is wont, in a very unreasonable proportion
of the cases of my practice.
And Reuben numbereth another boy to the four
that he could yesterday?
The medical man held up three of his fingers, in
a significant manner, as he nodded assent.
This putteth Faith something in arrears,
returned
he who has been called Ensign, and who
was no other than the reader's old acquaintance
Eben Dudley, preferred to that station in the
train-band
of the valley. The heart of my brother
Reuben will be gladdened by these tidings, when
he shall return from the scout.
There will be occasion for thankfulness, since
he will find seven beneath a roof where he left but
four!
I will close the bargain with the young captain
for the mountain lot, this very day! muttered
Dudley, like one suddenly convinced of the prudence
of a long-debated measure. Seven pounds of the
colony money is no usurer's price, after all, for a
hundred acres of heavily-timbered land; and they
in full view of a settlement where boys come three
at a time!
The equestrain stopped his horse, and regarding
his companion intently and with a significant air,
he answered
Thou hast now fallen on the clue of an
important
mystery, Ensign Dudley. This continent was
created with a design. The fact is apparent by its
riches, its climate, its magnitude, its facilities of
navigation, and chiefly in that it hath been left
undiscovered
until the advanced condition of society
hath given opportunity and encouragement to men
of a certain degree of merit, to adventure in its
behalf. Consider, neighbor, the wonderful progress
it hath already made in the arts and in learning, in
reputation and in resources, and thou wilt agree
with me in the conclusion that all this hath been
done with a design.
'Twould be presuming to doubt it; for he hath
indeed a short memory, to whom it shall be
necessary
to recall the time when this very valley was
little other than a den for beasts of prey, and this
beaten highway, a deer-track. Dost think that
Reuben will be like to raise the whole of the recent
gift?
With judgment, and by the blessing of
Providence
.
The mind is active, Ensign Dudley, when
the body is journeying among the forests; and much
have my thoughts been exercised in this matter,
whilst thou and others have been in your slumbers.
Here have we the colonies in their first century,
and yet thou knowest to what a pass of improvement
they have arrived. They tell me the Hartford
settlement
is getting to be apportioned like the towns
of mother England, that there is reason to think
the day may come when the provinces shall have
a power, and a convenience of culture and
communication
,
equalling that which belongeth to some
parts of the venerable island itself!
Nay, nay, Doctor Ergot, returned the other
with an incredulous smile, that is exceeding the
bounds of a discretionable expectation.
Thou wilt remember that I said equalling to
certain
parts. I think we may justly imagine, that
ere many centuries shall elapse, there may be
millions
counted in these regions, and truly that, too,
where one seeth nought, at present, but the savage
and the beast.
I will go with any man, in this question, as far
as reason will justify; but doubtless thou hast read
in the books uttered by writers over sea, the matters
concerning the condition of those countries, wherein
it is plain that we may never hope to reach the
exalted
excellence they enjoy.
Neighbor Dudley, thou seemest disposed to push
an unguarded expression to extremity. I said
equalling
certain
parts, meaning always, too, in
certain
things. Now it is known in philosophy, that the
stature of man hath degenerated, and must
degenerate
in these regions, in obedience to established
laws of nature; therefore it is meet that allowance
should be made for some deficiency in less material
qualities.
It is like, then, that the better sort of the men
over sea are ill-disposed to quit their country,
returned
the Ensign, glancing an eye of some unbelief
along the muscular proportions of his own vigorous
frame. We have no less than three from the old
countries in our village, here, and yet I do not find
them men like to have been sought for at the
building
of Babel.
This is settling a knotty and learned point by
the evidence of a few shallow exceptions. I
presume
to tell you, Ensign Dudley, that the science,
and wisdom, and philosophy of Europe, have been
exceeding active in this matter; and they have
proved to their own perfect satisfaction, which is
the same thing as disposing of the question without
appeal, that man and beast, plant and tree, hill and
dale, lake and pond, sun, air, fire and water, are all
wanting in some of the perfectness of the older
regions. I respect a patriotic sentiment, and can
carry the disposition to applaud the bounties
received
from the hands of a beneficent Creator as far as
any man; but that which hath been demonstrated
by science, or collected by learning, is placed too
far beyond the objections of lightly-minded cavillers,
to be doubted by graver faculties.
I shall not contend against things that are
proven, returned Dudley, who was quite as meek
in discussion as he was powerful and active in more
physical contests; since it needs be that the
learning
of men in the old countries must have an
exceeding
excellence, in virtue of its great age. It
would be a visit to remember, should some of its
rare advantages be dispersed in these our own
youthful regions!
And can it be said that our mental wants have
been forgottenthat the nakedness of the mind
hath been suffered to go without its comely vestment,
neighbor Dudley? To me, it seemeth, that therein
we have unwonted reason to rejoice, and that the
equilibrium of nature is in a manner restored by
the healing exercises of art. It is unseemly in an
unenlightened province, to insist on qualities that
have been discreetly disproven; but learning is a
transferable and communicable gift, and it is meet
to affirm that it is to be found here, in quantities
adapted to the wants of the colony.
I'll not gainsay it, for having been more of an
adventurer in the forest than one who hath
travelled
in quest of sights among the settlements along
the sea-shore, it may happen that many things are
to be seen there, of which my poor abilities have
formed no opinion.
And are we utterly unenlightened, even in this
distant valley, Ensign? returned the leech, leaning
over the neck of his horse, and addressing his
companion
in a mild and persuasive tone, that he had
probably acquired in his extensive practice among
the females of the settlement. Are we to be
classed
with the heathen in knowledge, or to be
accounted
as the unnurtured men who are known once to
have roamed through these forests in quest of their
game? Without assuming any infallibility of
judgment
,
or aspiring to any peculiarity of information,
it doth not appear to my defective understanding,
Master Dudley, that the progress of the settlement
hath ever been checked for want of necessary
fore-sight
,
nor that the growth of reason among us hath
ever been stunted from any lack of mental aliment.
Our councils are not barren of wisdom, Ensign, nor
hath it often arrived that abstrusities have been
propounded, that some one intellect, to say no more
in our own favor, hath not been known to grapple
with, successfully.
That there are men, or perhaps I ought to say
that there
is a man
, in the valley, who is equal to
many marvels in the way of enlightened gifts
I knew we should come to peaceable conclusions,
Ensign Dudley, interrupted the other, rising erect
in his saddle, with an air of appeased dignity; for
I have ever found you a discreet and consequent
reasoner, and one who is never known to resist
conviction
,
when truth is pressed with understanding.
That the men from over sea are not often so well
gifted as somewe will say, for the sake of a
convenient
illustration, as thyself, Ensignis placed
beyond the reach of debate, since sight teacheth us
that numberless exceptions may be found to all the
more general and distinctive laws of nature. I think
we are not likely to carry our disagreement further?
It is impossible to make head against one so
ready with his knowledge, returned the other, well
content to exist in his own person a striking
exception
to the inferiority of his fellows; though it
appeareth to me that my brother Ring might be
chosen, as another instance of a reasonable stature;
a fact that thou mayst see, Doctor, by regarding
him as he approaches through yon meadow. He
hath been, like myself, on the scout among the
mountains.
There are many instances of physical merit
among thy connexions, Master Dudley, returned
the complaisant physician; though it would seem
that thy brother hath not found his companion among
them. He is attended by an ill-grown, and, it may
be added, an ill-favored comrade, that I know not.
Ha! It would seem that Reuben hath fallen on
the trail of savages! The man in company is
certainly
in paint and blanket. It may be well to
pause at yonder opening, and await their coming.
As this proposition imposed no particular
inconvenience
,
the Doctor readily assented. The two drew
nigh to the place where the men, whom they saw
crossing the fields in the distance, were expected to
enter the highway.
But little time was lost in attendance. Ere many
minutes had elapsed, Reuben Ring, accoutred and
armed like the borderer already introduced in this
chapter, arrived at the opening, followed by the
stranger whose appearance had caused so much
surprise to those who watched their approach.
What now, Sergeant, exclaimed Dudley, when
the other was within ear-shot, speaking a little in
the manner of one who had legal right to propound
his questions; hast fallen on a trial of the savage,
and made a captive? or hath some owl permitted
one of its brood to fall from the nest across thy
footpath
?
I believe the creature may be accounted a man,
returned the successful Reuben, throwing the breech
of his gun to the earth, and leaning on its long
barrel
,
while he intently regarded the half-painted,
vacant, and extremely equivocal countenance of
his captive. He hath the colors of a Narragansett
about the brow and eyes, and yet he faileth greatly
in the form and movements.
There are anomalies in the physicals of an
Indian
,
as in those of other men, interrupted Doctor
Ergot, with a meaning glance at Dudley. The
conclusion of our neighbor Ring may be too hasty,
since paint is the fruit of art, and may be applied
to any of our faces, after an established usage. But
the evidences of nature are far less to be distrusted.
It hath come within the province of my studies, to
note the differences in formation which occur in the
different families of man; and nothing is more
readily
to be known, to an eye skilled in these
abstrusities
,
than the aboriginal of the tribe Narragansett.
Set the man more in a position of examination,
neighbors, and it shall shortly be seen to which race
he belongs. Thou wilt note in this little facility of
investigation, Ensign, a clear evidence of most of
the matters that have this morning been agitated
between us. Doth the patient speak English?
Therein have I found some difficulty of inquiry,
returned Reuben, or as he should now be, and as he
was usually called, Sergeant Ring. He hath been
spoken to in the language of a Christian, no less
than in that of a heathen, and as yet no reply hath
been made, while he obeys commands uttered in
both forms of speech.
It mattereth not, said Ergot, dismounting and
drawing near to his subject, with a look towards
Dudley that should seem to court his admiration.
Vol. II. 2
Happily the examination before me leaneth but
little on any subtleties of speech. Let the man be
placed in an attitude of ease; one in which nature
may not be fettered by restraint. The conformation
of the whole head is remarkably aboriginal, but the
distinction of tribes is not to be sought in these
general
delineations. The forehead, as you see,
neighbors
,
is retreating and narrow, the cheek-bones, as
usual, high, and the olfactory member, as in all of
the natives, inclining to Roman.
Now to me it would seem that the nose of the
man hath a marked upturning at the end, Dudley
ventured to remark, as the other ran volubly over
the general and well-known distinctive points of
physical construction in an Indian.
As an exception! Thou seest, Ensign, by this
elevation of the bone, and the protuberance of the
more fleshy parts, that the peculiarity is an
exception
.
I should rather have said that the nose
originally
inclined to the Roman. The departure from
regularity has been produced by some casualty of
their warfare, such as a blow from a tomahawk, or
the gash of a knifeay! here thou seest the scar
left by the weapon! It is concealed by the paint, but
remove that, and you will find it hath all the form
of a cicatrice of a corresponding shape. These
departures
from generalities have a tendency to
confound
pretenders; a happy circumstance, in itself,
for the progress of knowledge on fixed principles.
Place the subject more erect, that we may see the
natural movement of the muscles. Here is an
evidence
of great aquatic habits in the dimensions of
the foot, which go to confirm original conceptions.
It is a happy proof, through which, reasonable and
prudent conclusions confirm the quick-sighted glances
of practice. I pronounce the fellow to be a
Narragansett
.
Is it then a Narragansett that hath a foot to
confound a trail? returned Eben Dudley, who had
been studying the movements and attitudes of the
captive with quite as much keenness, and with
something more of understanding, than the leech.
Brother Ring, hast ever known an Indian leave
such an out-turning foot-print on the leaves?
Ensign, I marvel that a man of thy discretion
should dwell on a slight variety of movement, when
a case exists in which the laws of nature may be
traced to their sources. This training for the
Indian
troubles hath made thee critical in the position
of a foot. I have said that the fellow is a
Narragansett
,
and what I have uttered hath not been
lightly ventured. Here is the peculiar formation
of the foot, which hath been obtained in infancy, a
fullness in the muscles of the breast and shoulders,
from unusual exercise in an element denser than
the air, and a nicer construction in
The physician paused, for Dudley had coolly
advanced
to the captive, and, raising the thin robe
of deer-skin which was thrown over the whole of
his superior members, he exposed the unequivocal
skin of a white man. This would have proved an
embarrassing refutation to one accustomed to the
conflict of wits; but monopoly, in certain branches
of knowledge, had produced in favor of Doctor
Ergot
an acknowledged superiority, that, in its effects,
might be likened to the predominating influence of
any other aristocracy, on those faculties that have
been benumbed by its operation. His opinion
changed, which is more than can be said of his
countenance; for, with the readiness of invention
which is so often practised in the felicitous
institutions
we have named, and by which the reasoning
instead of regulating is adapted to the practice, he
exclaimed with uplifted hands and eyes that bespoke
the fullness of his admiration
Here have we another proof of the wonderful
agency by which the changes in nature are
gradually
wrought! Now do we see in this
Narragansett
The man is white! interrupted Dudley,
tapping
the naked shoulder, which he still held exposed
to view.
White, but not a tittle the less a Narragansett.
Your captive, beyond a doubt, oweth his existence
to Christian parentage, but accident hath thrown
him early among the aboriginals, and all those parts,
which were liable to change, were fast getting to
assume the peculiarities of the tribe. He is one of
those beautiful and connecting links in the chain of
knowledge, by which science followeth up its
deductions
to demonstration.
I should ill brook coming to harm for doing
violence
to a subject of the King, said Reuben Ring,
a steady, open-faced yeoman, who thought far less
of the subtleties of his companion, than of
discharging
his social duties in a manner fitting the
character
of a quiet and well-conditioned citizen. We
have had so much of stirring tidings, latterly,
concerning
the manner the savages conduct their
warfare
,
that it behoveth men in place of trust to be
vigilant; for, glancing his eyes towards the ruin
of the distant block-house, thou knowest, brother
Dudley, that we have occasion to be watchful, in a
settlement as deep in the forest as this.
I will answer for the indemnity, Sergeant Ring,
said Dudley, with an air of dignity. I take upon
myself the keeping of this stranger, and will see
that he be borne, properly and in fitting season,
before
the authorities. In the mean time, duty hath
caused us to overlook matters of moment in thy
household, which it may be seemly to communicate.
Abundance hath not been neglectful of thy interests,
during the scout.
What! demanded the husband, with rather
more of earnestness than was generally exhibited
by one of habits as restrained as his own; hath the
woman called upon the neighbors, during my
absence
?
Dudley nodded an assent.
And I shall find another boy beneath my roof?
Doctor Ergot nodded three times, with a gravity
that might have suited a communication even more
weighty than the one he made.
Thy woman rarely doth a good turn by halves,
Reuben. Thou wilt find that she hath made
provision
for a successor to our good neighbor Ergot,
since a seventh son is born in thy house.
The broad, honest face of the father flushed with
joy, and then a feeling less selfish came over him.
He asked, with a slight tremor in the voice, that
was none the less touching for coming from the lips
of one so stout of frame and firm of movement
And the woman?in what manner doth
Abundance
bear up under the blessing?
Bravely, returned the leech; go to thy
dwelling
,
Sergeant Ring, and praise God that there is
one to look to its concerns, in thy absence. He
who hath received the gift of seven sons, in five
years, need never be a poor nor a dependent man,
in a country like this. Seven farms, added to that
pretty homestead of mountain-land which thou
now tillest, will render thee a patriarch in thine
age, and sustain the name of Ring, hundreds of
years hence, when these colonies shall become
peopled
and powerful, and, I say it boldly, caring not
who may call me one that vaunteth out of reason,
equal to some of your lofty and self-extolled
kingdoms
of Europeay, even peradventure to the
mighty sovereignty of Portugal, itself! I have
enumerated
thy future farms at seven, for the allusion
of the Ensign to the virtues of men born with
natural
2 *
propensities to the healing art, must be taken
as pleasant speech, since it is a mere delusion of old
wives' fancy, and it would be particularly
unnecessary
,
here, where every reasonable situation of this
nature is already occupied. Go to thy wife,
Sergeant
,
and bid her be of good cheer; for she hath
done herself, thee, and thy country, a service, and
that without dabbling in pursuits foreign to her
comprehension.
The sturdy yeoman, on whom this rich gift of
Providence had been dispensed, raised his hat, and
placing it decently before his face, he offered up a
silent thanksgiving for the favor. Then, transferring
his captive to the keeping of his superior and
kinsman
,
he was soon seen striding over the fields
towards
his upland dwelling, with a heavy foot, though
with a light heart.
In the mean time, Dudley and his companion
bestowed a more particular attention on the silent
and nearly motionless object of their curiosity.
Though the captive appeared to be of middle age,
his eye was unmeaning, his air timid and uncertain,
and his form cringing and ungainly. In all these
particulars, he was seen to differ from the known
peculiarities of a native warrior.
Previously to departing, Reuben Ring had
explained
,
that while traversing the woods, on that
duty of watchfulness to which the state of the colony
and some recent signs had given rise, this wandering
person had been encountered and secured, as seemed
necessary to the safety of the settlement. He had
neither sought nor avoided his captor; but when
questioned concerning his tribe, his motive for
traversing
those hills, and his future intentions, no
satisfactory
reply could be extracted. He had scarcely
spoken, and the little that he said was uttered in a
jargon between the language of his interrogator
and the dialect of some barbarous nation. Though
there was much in the actual state of the colonies,
and in the circumstances in which this wanderer
had been found, to justify his detention, little had in
truth been discovered, to supply a clue either to any
material facts in his history or to any of his views
in being in the immediate vicinity of the valley.
Guided only by this barren information, Dudley
and his companion endeavored, as they moved
towards
the hamlet, to entrap their prisoner into some
confession of his object, by putting their questions
with a sagacity not unusual to men in remote and
difficult situations, where necessity and danger are
apt to keep alive all the native energies of the
human
mind. The answers were little connected and
unintelligible, sometimes seeming to exhibit the
finest subtlety of savage cunning, and at others to
possess the mental helplessness of appearing the
most abject fatuity.
CHAPTER II.
I am not prone to weeping, as our sex
Commonly are;
But I have
That honorable grief lodged here, which burns
Worse than tears drown.
Winter's Tale
.
If
the pen of a compiler, like that we wield,
possessed
the mechanical power of the stage, it would
be easy to shift the scenes of this legend as rapidly
and effectively as is required for its right
understanding
,
and for the proper maintenance of its
interest. That which cannot be done with the
magical
aid of machinery, must be attempted by less
ambitious, and we fear by far less efficacious means.
At the same early hour of the day, and at no
great distance from the spot where Dudley
announced
his good fortune to his brother Ring, another
morning meeting had place, between persons of the
same blood and connexions. From the instant when
the pale light, that precedes the day, was first seen
in the heavens, the windows and doors of the
considerable
dwelling, on the opposite side of the valley,
had been unbarred. Ere the glow of the sun had
gilded the sky over the outline of the eastern woods,
this example of industry and providence was
followed
by the inmates of every house in the village, or
on the surrounding hills; and, by the time the golden
globe itself was visible above the trees, there was
not a human being in all that settlement, of proper
age and health, who was not actively afoot.
It is unnecessary to say that the dwelling
particularly
named was the present habitation of the
household
of Mark Heathcote. Though age had sapped
the foundations of his strength, and had nearly dried
the channels of his existence, the venerable
religionist
still lived. While his physical perfection had
been gradually giving way before the ordinary
decay of nature, the moral man was but little
altered
.
It is even probable that his visions of futurity
were less dimmed by the mists of carnal interests
than when last seen, and that the spirit had gained
some portion of that energy which had certainly
been abstracted from the more corporeal parts of
his existence. At the hour already named, the
Puritan was seated in the piazza, which stretched
along the whole front of a dwelling, that, however
it might be deficient in architectural proportions,
was not wanting in the more substantial comforts
of a spacious and commodious frontier residence.
In order to obtain a faithful portrait of a man so
intimately connected with our tale, the reader will
fancy him one who had numbered four-score and
ten years, with a visage on which deep and constant
mental striving had wrought many and meaning
furrows, a form that trembled while it yet exhibited
the ruins of powerful limb and flexible muscle, and
a countenance in which ascetic reflections had
engraved
a severity, that was but faintly relieved
by the gleamings of a natural kindness, which no
acquired habits, nor any traces of metaphysical
thought, could ever entirely erase. Across this
picture
of venerable and self-mortifying age, the first
rays of the sun were now softly cast, lighting a
dimmed eye and furrowed face with a look of
brightness and peace. Perhaps the blandness of the
expression belonged as much to the season and hour,
as to the habitual character of the man. This
benignancy
of feature, unusual rather in its strength
than in its existence, might have been heightened
by the fact that his spirit had just wrought in
prayer
,
as was usual, in the circle of his children and
dependants, ere they left those retired parts of the
building where they had found rest and security
during the night. Of the former, none known and
cherished in the domestic circle had been absent;
and the ample provision that was making for the
morning meal, sufficiently showed that the number
of the latter had in no degree diminished since the
reader was familiar with the domestic economy of
his household.
Time had produced no very striking alteration
in the appearance of Content. It is true that the
brown hue of his features had deepened, and that
his frame was beginning to lose some of its elasticity
and ease of action, in the more measured movements
of middle age. But the governed temperament of
the individual had always kept the animal in more
than usual subjection. Even his earlier days had
rather exhibited the promise than the performance
of the ordinary youthful qualities. Mental gravity
had long before produced a corresponding physical
effect. In reference to his exterior, and using the
language of the painter, it would now be said, that,
without having wrought any change in form and
proportions, the colors had been mellowed by time.
If a few hairs of gray were sprinkled, here and
there, around his brow, it was as moss gathers on
the stones of the edifice, rather furnishing evidence
of its increased adhesion and approved stability,
than denoting any symptoms of decay.
Not so with his gentle and devoted partner.
That softness and sweetness of air which had first
touched the heart of Content was still to be seen,
though it existed amid the traces of a constant
and a corroding grief. The freshness of youth had
departed, and in its place was visible the more
lasting
,
and, in her case, the more affecting beauty of
expression. The eye of Ruth had lost none of its
gentleness, and her smile still continued kind and
attractive; but the former was often painfully vacant,
seeming to look inward upon those secret and
withering
sources of sorrow that were deeply and almost
mysteriously seated in her heart; while the latter
resembled the cold brightness of that planet, which
illumines objects by repelling the borrowed lustre
from its own bosom. The matronly form, the
feminine
beaming of the countenance, and the melodious
voice, yet remained; but the first had been shaken
till it stood on the very verge of a premature decay,
the second had a mingling of anxious care in its
most sympathetic movements, and the last was
seldom without that fearful thrill which so deeply
affects the senses, by conveying to the understanding
a meaning so foreign from the words. And yet an
uninterested and ordinary observer might not have
seen, in the faded comeliness and blighted maturity
of the matron, more than the every-day signs that
betray the turn in the tide of human existence.
As befitted such a subject, the coloring of sorrow
had been traced by a hand too delicate to leave the
lines visible to every vulgar eye. Like the
master-touches
of art, her grief, as it was beyond the
sympathies
,
so it lay beyond the ken of those whom
excellence may fail to excite, or in whom absence
can deaden affections. Still her feelings were true
to all who had any claims on her love. The
predominance
of wasting grief over the more genial
springs of her enjoyments, only went to prove how
much greater is the influence of the generous than
the selfish qualities of our nature, in a heart that
is truly endowed with tenderness. It is scarce
necessary
to say, that this gentle and constant woman
sorrowed for her child.
Had Ruth Heathcote known that the girl ceased
to live, it would not have been difficult for one of
her faith to have deposited her regrets by the side
of hopes that were so justifiable, in the grave of the
innocent. But the living death to which her
offspring
might be condemned, was rarely absent from
her thoughts. She listened to the maxims of
resignation
,
which were heard flowing from lips she loved,
with the fondness of a woman and the meekness of
a Christian; and then, even while the holy lessons
were still sounding in her attentive organs, the
workings of an unconquerable nature led her
insidiously
back to the sorrow of a mother.
The imagination of this devoted and feminine
being had never possessed an undue control over her
reason. Her visions of happiness with the man
whom her judgment not less than her inclination
approved, had been such as experience and religion
might justify. But she was now fated to learn there
is a fearful poetry in sorrow, which can sketch with
a grace and an imaginative power that no feebler
efforts of a heated fancy may ever equal. She
heard the sweet breathing of her slumbering infant
in the whispering of the summer airs; its plaints
came to her ears amid the howlings of the gale;
while the eager question and fond reply were mixed
up with the most ordinary intercourse of her own
household. To her the laugh of childish happiness,
that often came on the still air of evening from the
hamlet, sounded like the voice of mourning; and
scarce an infantile sport met her eye, that did not
bring with it a pang of anguish. Twice, since the
events of the inroad, had she been a mother; and,
as if an eternal blight were doomed to destroy her
hopes, the little creatures to whom she had given
birth, slept, side by side, near the base of the ruined
block. Thither she often went, but it was rather to
be the victim of those cruel images of her fancy,
than as a mourner. Her visions of the dead were
calm and even consolatory, but if ever her thoughts
mounted to the abodes of eternal peace, and her
feeble fancy essayed to embody the forms of the
blessed, her mental eye sought her who was not,
rather than those who were believed to be secure
in their felicity. Wasting and delusory as were
these glimpses of the mind, there were others far
more harrowing, because they presented themselves
with more of the coarse and certain features of
the world. It was the common and perhaps it was
the better, opinion of the inhabitants of the valley,
that death had early sealed the fate of those who
had fallen into the hands of the savages on the
occasion of the inroad. Such a result was in
conformity
with the known practices and ruthless
passions
of the conquerors, who seldom spared life,
unless to render revenge more cruelly refined, or
to bring consolation to some bereaved mother of the
tribe, by offering a substitute for the dead in the
person of a captive. There was relief, to picture
the face of the laughing cherub in the clouds, or to
listen to its light footstep in the empty halls of the
dwelling; for in these illusive images of the brain,
suffering was confined to her own bosom. But when
stern reality usurped the place of fancy, and she
saw her living daughter shivering in the wintry
blasts or sinking beneath the fierce heats of the
climate, cheerless in the desolation of female
servitude
,
and suffering meekly the lot of physical
weakness
beneath a savage master, she endured that
anguish
which was gradually exhausting the springs
of life.
Though the father was not altogether exempt
from similar sorrow, it beset him less ceaselessly.
He knew how to struggle with the workings of his
mind, as best became a man. Though strongly
impressed
with the belief that the captives had early
been put beyond the reach of suffering, he had
neglected no duty, which tenderness to his
sorrowing
partner, parental love, or Christian duty, could
require at his hands.
The Indians had retired on the crust of the snow,
and with the thaw every foot-print, or sign, by
which such wary foes might be traced, had
vanished
.
It remained matter of doubt to what tribe, or
even to what nation, the marauders belonged. The
peace of the colony had not yet been openly
broken, and the inroad had been rather a violent
and fierce symptom of the evils that were
contemplated
,
than the actual commencement of the
ruthless
hostilities which had since ravaged the frontier.
But while policy had kept the colonists quiet,
private
affection omitted no rational means of
effecting
the restoration of the sufferers, in the event of
their having been spared.
Scouts had passed among the conspiring and but
half-peaceable tribes, nearest to the settlement,
and rewards and menaces had both been liberally
used, in order to ascertain the character of the
savages who had laid waste the valley, as well as
Vol. II. 3
the more interesting fortunes of their hapless
victims
.
Every expedient to detect the truth had
failed
.
The Narragansetts affirmed that their constant
enemies the Mohicans, acting with their customary
treachery, had plundered their English friends;
while the Mohicans vehemently threw back the
imputation on the Narragansetts. At other times,
some Indians affected to make dark allusions to the
hostile feelings of fierce warriors, who, under the
name of the Five Nations, were known to reside
within the limits of the Dutch colony of
New-Netherlands
,
and to dwell upon the jealousy of the
Pale-faces
who spoke a language different from that of
the Yengeese. In short, inquiry had produced no
result; and Content, when he did permit his fancy
to represent his daughter as still living, was forced
to admit to himself the probability that she might
be buried far in the ocean of wilderness which then
covered most of the surface of this continent.
Once, indeed, a rumor of an exciting nature had
reached the family. An itinerant trader, bound
from the wilds of the interior to a mart on the
seashore
,
had entered the valley. He brought with
him a report, that a child, answering in some
respects
to the appearance which might now be
supposed
to belong to her who was lost, was living
among the savages, on the banks of the smaller
lakes of the adjoining colony. The distance to this
spot was great; the path led through a thousand
dangers, and the result was far from certain. Yet
it quickened hopes which had long been dormant.
Ruth never urged any request that might involve
serious hazard to her husband, and for many
months the latter had even ceased to speak on the
subject. Still, nature was working powerfully
within
him. His eyes, at all times reflecting and calm,
grew more thoughtful; deeper lines of care gathered
about his brow; and at length, melancholy took
possession of a countenance which was usually so
placid.
It was at this precise period, that Eben Dudley
chose to urge the suit, he had always pressed after
his own desultory fashion, on the decision of Faith.
One of those well-ordered accidents, which, from
time to time, had brought the girl and the young
borderer in private conversation, enabled him to
effect his design, with sufficient clearness. Faith
heard him without betraying any of her ordinary
waywardness, and answered with as little
prevarication
as the subject seemed to demand.
This is well, Eben Dudley, she said, and it is
no more than an honest girl hath a right to hear,
from one who hath taken as many means as thou
to get into her favor. But he who would have his
life tormented by me, hath a solemn duty to do, ere
I listen to his wishes.
I have been in the lower towns and studied
their manner of life, and I have been upon the
scouts of the colony, to keep the Indians in their
wigwams, returned her suitor, endeavoring to
recount
the feats of manliness that might reasonably
be expected of one inclined to venture on so
hazardous
an experiment as matrimony. The bargain
with the young Captain for the hill-lot, and for a
village homestead, is drawing near a close; and as
the neighbors will not be backward at the
stone-bee
,
or the raising, I see nothing to
Thou deceivest thyself, observant Dudley,
interrupted
the girl, if thou believest eye of thine
can see that which is to be sought, ere one and the
same fortune shall be the property of thee and me.
Hast noted, Eben, the manner in which the cheek
of the Madam hath paled, and how her eye is
getting
sunken, since the time when the fur trader
tarried with us, the week of the storm?
I cannot say that there is much change in the
wearing of the Madam, within the bearing of my
memory, answered Dudley, who was never
remarkable
for minute observations of this nature,
however keen he might prove in subjects more
intimately
connected with his daily pursuits. She is
not young and blooming as thou, Faith, nor is it
often that we see
I tell thee, man, that sorrow preyeth upon her
form, and that she liveth but in the memory of the
lost infant!
This is carrying mourning beyond the bounds
of reason. The child is at peace; as is thy brother,
Whittal, beyond all manner of question. That we
have not discovered their bones, is owing to the fire,
which left but little to tell of
Thy head is a charnel-house, dull Dudley, but
this picture of its furniture shall not suffice for me.
The man who is to be my husband must have a
feeling
for a mother's sorrows!
What is now getting uppermost in thy mind,
Faith! Is it for me to bring back the dead to life,
or to place a child that hath been lost so many years
once more in the arms of its parents?
It is.Nay, open not thine eyes, as if light were
first breaking into the darkness of a clouded brain!
I repeat, it is!
I am glad that we have got to these open
declarations
,
for too much of my life hath been
already
wasted in unsettled gallanting, when sound
wisdom
,
and the example of all around me, have shown
that in order to become the father of a family, and
to be esteemed for a substantial settler, I should
have both cleared and wived some years ago. I
wish to deal justly by all, and having given thee
reason to think that the day might come when we
should live together, as is fitting to people of our
condition, I felt it a duty to ask thee to share my
chances; but now that thou dealest in
impossibilities
,
it is needful to seek elsewhere.
This hath ever been thy way, when a good
understanding
hath been established between us. Thy
mind is ever getting into some discontent, and then
blame is heaped on one who rarely doth anything
that should in reason offend thee. What madness
maketh thee dream that I ask impossibilities?
Surely
,
Dudley, thou canst not have noted the manner
in which the nature of the Madam is giving way
before the consuming heat of her grief; thou canst
not look into the sorrow of woman, or thou wouldst
have listened with more kindness to a plan of
travelling
the woods for a short season, in order that it
might be known whether she of whom the trader
spoke is the lost one of our family, or the child of
some stranger!
Though Faith spoke with vexation, she also spoke
with feeling. Her dark eye swam in tears, and the
color of her brown cheek deepened, until her
companion
saw new reasons to forget his discontent in
sympathies, which, however obtuse they might be,
were never entirely dormant.
If a journey of a few hundred miles be all thou
askest, girl, why speak in parables? he
good-naturedly
replied. The kind word was not wanting
to put me on such a trail. We will be married on
the Sabbath, and, please Heaven, the Wednesday,
or the Saturday at most, shall see me on the path
of the western trader.
No delay. Thou must depart with the sun. The
more active thou provest on the journey, the sooner
wilt thou have the power to make me repent a
foolish
deed.
But Faith had been persuaded to relax a little
from this severity. They were married on the
Sabbath
,
and the following day Content and Dudley
left the valley, in quest of the distant tribe on which
3 *
the scion of another stock was said to have been so
violently engrafted.
It is needless to dwell on the dangers and
privations
of such an expedition. The Hudson, the
Delaware
,
and the Susquehannah, rivers that were then
better known in tales than to the inhabitants of
New-England, were all crossed; and after a painful
and hazardous journey, the adventurers reached
the first of that collection of small interior lakes,
whose banks are now so beautifully decorated with
villages and farms. Here, in the bosom of savage
tribes, and exposed to every danger of field and
flood, supported only by his hopes, and by the
presence
of a stout companion that hardships or danger
could not easily subdue, the father diligently sought
his child.
At length a people were found, who held a
captive
that answered the description of the trader.
We shall not dwell on the feelings with which
Content
approached the village that contained this
little
descendant of a white race. He had not
concealed
his errand; and the sacred character, in
which he came, found pity and respect even among
those barbarous tenants of the wilderness. A
deputation
of the chiefs received him in the skirts of
their clearing. He was conducted to a wigwam,
where a council-fire was lighted, and an interpreter
opened the subject, by placing the amount of the
ransom offered, and the professions of peace with
which the strangers came, in the fairest light before
his auditors. It is not usual for the American
savage
to loosen his hold easily, on one naturalized in
his tribe. But the meek air and noble confidence
of Content touched the latent qualities of those
generous though fierce children of the woods. The
girl was sent for, that she might stand in the
presence
of the elders of the nation.
No language can paint the sensation with which
Content first looked upon this adopted daughter of
the savages. The years and sex were in accordance
with his wishes; but, in place of the golden hair
and azure eyes of the cherub he had lost, there
appeared
a girl in whose jet-black tresses and equally
dark organs of sight, he might better trace a
descendant
of the French of the Canadas, than one
sprung from his own Saxon lineage. The father
was not quick of mind in the ordinary occupations
of life, but nature was now big within him. There
needed no second glance, to say how cruelly his
hopes had been deceived. A smothered groan
struggled
from his chest, and then his self-command
returned
with the imposing grandeur of Christian
resignation
.
He arose, and, thanking the chiefs for
their indulgence, he made no secret of the mistake
by which he had been led so far on a fruitless
errand
.
While speaking, the signs and gestures of
Dudley gave him reason to believe, that his
companion
had something of importance to communicate.
In a private interview, the latter suggested the
expediency
of concealing the truth, and of rescuing
the child they had in fact discovered from the hands
of her barbarous masters. It was now too late to
practise a deception that might have availed for this
object, had the stern principles of Content permitted
the artifice. But, transferring some portion of the
interest which he felt for the fortunes of his own
offspring, to that of the unknown parent, who, like
himself, most probably mourned the uncertain fate
of the girl before him, he tendered the ransom
intended
for Ruth, in behalf of the captive. It was
rejected. Disappointed in both their objects, the
adventurers were obliged to quit the village, with
weary feet and still heavier hearts.
If any who read these pages have ever felt the
agony of suspense in a matter involving the best of
human affections, they will know how to appreciate
the sufferings of the mother, during the month that
her husband was absent on this holy errand. At
times, hope brightened around her heart, until the
glow of pleasure was again mantling on her cheek
and playing in her eye. The first week of the
adventure
was one almost of happiness. The hazards
of the journey were nearly forgotten in its
anticipated
results, and, though occasional apprehensions
quickened the pulses of one whose system answered
so fearfully to the movements of the spirit, there
was a predominance of hope in all her anticipations.
She again passed among her maidens with a mien
in which joy was struggling with the meekness of
subdued habits, and her smiles once more began to
beam with renovated happiness. To his dying day,
old Mark Heathcote never forgot the sudden
sensation
that was created by the soft laugh that on some
unexpected occasion came to his ear from the lips
of his son's wife. Though years had elapsed
between
the moment when that unwonted sound was
heard, and the time at which the action of the tale
now stands, he had never heard it repeated. To
heighten the feelings which were now uppermost in
the mind of Ruth, when within a day's march of
the village to which he was going, Content had found
means to send the tidings of his prospects of success.
It was over all these renewed wishes that
disappointment
was to throw its chill, and it was affections
thus riveted that were to be again blighted by the
cruelest of all withering influences,that of hope
defeated.
It was near the hour of the setting of the sun,
when Content and Dudley reached the deserted
clearing, on their return to the valley. Their path
led through this opening on the mountain-side, and
there was one point, among the bushes, from which
the buildings, that had already arisen from the ashes
of the burning, might be distinctly seen. Until now,
the husband and father had believed himself equal
to any effort that duty might require, in the
progress
of this mournful service. But here he paused,
and communicated a wish to his companion that he
would go ahead and break the nature of the
deception
that had led them so far on a fruitless mission.
Perhaps Content was himself ignorant of all he
wished, or to what unskilful hands he had confided
a commission of more than ordinary delicacy. He
merely felt his own inability, and, with a weakness
that may find some apology in his feelings, he saw
his companion depart, without instructions, or indeed
without any other guide than Nature.
Though Faith had betrayed no marked
uneasiness
during the absence of the travellers, her quick
eye was the first to discover the form of her
husband
,
as he came with a tired step across the fields,
in the direction of the dwellings. Long ere Dudley
reached the house, every one of its inmates had
assembled
in the piazza. This was no meeting of
turbulent
delight, or of clamorous greetings. The
adventurer
drew near amid a silence so oppressive,
that it utterly disconcerted a studied project, by
which he had hoped to announce his tidings in a
manner suited to the occasion. His hand was on
the gate of the little court, and still none spoke; his
foot was on the low step, and yet no voice bade him
welcome. The looks of the little group were rather
fixed on the features of Ruth, than on the person of
him who approached. Her face was pallid as death,
her eye contracted, but filled with the mental effort
that sustained her; and her lip scarce trembled, as,
in obedience to a feeling still stronger than the one
which had so long oppressed her, she exclaimed
Eben Dudley, where hast thou left my
husband
?
The young Captain was a-foot weary, and he
tarried in the second growth on the hill; but so
brave a walker cannot be far behind. We shall see
him soon, at the opening by the dead beech; and it
is there that I recommend the Madam
It was thoughtful in Heathcote, and like his
usual kindness, to devise this well-meant caution!
said Ruth, across whose countenance a smile so
radiant
passed, that it imparted the expression which
is believed to characterize the peculiar benignancy
of angels. Still it was unnecessary; for he should
have known that we place our strength on the Rock
of Ages. Tell me, in what manner hath my
precious
one borne the exceeding weariness of thy
tangled route?
The wandering glance of the messenger had gone
from face to face, until it became fastened on the
countenance of his own wife, in a settled, unmeaning
gaze.
Nay, Faith hath demeaned well, both as my
assistant and as thy partner, and thou mayst see
that her comeliness is in no degree changedAnd
did the babe falter in this weary passage, or did
she retard thy movements by her fretfulness? But
I know thy nature, man; she hath been borne over
many long miles of mountain-side and treacherous
swamp, in thine own vigorous arms. Thou answerest
not, Dudley! exclaimed Ruth, taking the alarm,
and laying a hand firmly on the shoulder of him
she questioned, as, forcing his half-averted face to
meet her eye, she seemed to read his soul.
The muscles of the sun-burnt and strong features
of the borderer worked involuntarily, his broad
chest swelled to its utmost expansion, big burning
drops rolled out upon his brown cheeks, and then,
taking the arm of Ruth in one of his own powerful
hands, he compelled her to release her hold, with a
firm but respectful exercise of his strength; and,
thrusting the form of his own wife, without
ceremony
,
aside, he passed through the circle, and
entered the dwelling, with the tread of a giant.
The head of Ruth dropped upon her bosom, the
paleness again came over her cheeks, and it was
then that the inward look of the eye might first be
seen, which afterwards became so constant and so
painful an expression in her countenance. From that
hour, to the time in which the family of the
Wish-Ton-Wish
is again brought immediately before the
reader, no further rumors were ever heard, to lessen
or to increase the wasting regrets of her bosom.
CHAPTER III.
Sir, he hath never fed of the dainties that are bred in a book;
he hath not eaten paper as it were; he hath not drunk ink: his
intellect is not replenished; he is only an animalonly sensible
in the duller parts.
Love's Labor Lost
.
Here
cometh Faith, to bring us tidings of the
hamlet, said the husband of the woman whose
character we have so feebly sketched, as he took
his seat in the piazza, at the early hour and in
the group already mentioned. The Ensign hath
been abroad in the hills, throughout the night, with
a chosen party of our people; and perchance she
hath been sent with the substance that they have
gathered, concerning the unknown trail.
The heavy-footed Dudley hath scarce mounted
to the dividing ridge, where report goeth the prints
of moccasons were seen, observed a young man, who
in his person bore all the evidences of an active
and healthful manhood. Of what service is the
scouting that faileth of the necessary distance, by
the weariness of its leader?
If thou believest, boy, that thy young foot is
equal to contend with the sinews of Eben Dudley,
there may be occasion to show the magnitude of
thy error, ere the danger of this Indian out-breaking
shall pass away. Thou art too stubborn of will,
Mark, to be yet trusted with the leading of parties
that may hold the safety of all who dwell in the
Wish-Ton-Wish within their keeping.
The young man looked displeased; but, fearful
that his father might observe and misinterpret his
humor into a personal disrespect, he turned away,
permitting his frowning eye to rest, for an instant,
on the timid and stolen glance of a maiden, whose
cheek was glowing like the eastern sky, as she busied
herself with the preparations of the table.
What welcome news dost bring from the sign
of the Whip-Poor-Will? Content asked of the
woman, who had now come within the little gate
of his court. Hast seen the Ensign, since the party
took the hill-paths; or is it some traveller who hath
charged thee with matter for our ears?
Eye of mine hath not seen the man since he
girded himself with the sword of office, returned
Faith, entering the piazza and nodding salutation
to those around her; and as for strangers, when
the clock shall strike noon, it will be one month to
the day that the last of them was housed within
my doors. But I complain not of the want of
custom
,
as the Ensign would never quit the bar and
his gossip, to go into the mountain-lots, so long as
there was one to fill his ears with the marvels of
the old countries, or even to discourse of the
home-stirrings
of the colonies themselves.
Thou speakest lightly, Faith, of one who merits
thy respect and thy duty.
The eye of the former studied the meek
countenance
of her from whom this reproof came, with
an intenseness and a melancholy that showed her
thoughts were on other matters, and then, as if
suddenly recalled to what had passed, she resumed
Truly, what with duty to the man as a husband,
and respect to him as an officer of the colony,
Madam Heathcote, the task is not one of easy
bearing
.
If the King's representative had given the
colors to my brother Reuben, and left the Dudley
with the halberd in his hand, the preferment would
have been ample for one of his qualities, and all the
better for the credit of the settlement.
The Governor distributed his favor according
to the advice of men competent to distinguish merit,
said Content. Eben was foremost in the bloody
affair among the people of the Plantations, where
his manhood was of good example to all in company.
Should he continue as faithful and as valiant, thou
mayst yet live to see thyself the consort of a Captain!
Not for glory gained in this night's marching,
for yonder cometh the man with a sound body, and
seemingly with the stomach of a Csaray, and
I'll answer for it, of a regiment too! It is no trifle
that will satisfy his appetite, after one of these
ha! pray Heaven the fellow be not harmedtruly,
he hath our neighbor Ergot in attendance.
There is other than he too, for one cometh in
the rear whose gait and air are unknown to me
the trail hath been struck, and Dudley leadeth a
captive! A savage, in his paint and cloak of skin, is
taken.
This assertion caused all to rise, for the
excitement
of an apprehended inroad was still strong in
the minds of those secluded people. Not a syllable
more was uttered, until the scout and his companion
were before them.
The quick glance of Faith had scanned the
person
of her husband, and, resuming her spirits with
Vol. II. 4
the certainty that he was unharmed, she was the
first to greet him with words:
How now, Ensign Dudley, said the woman,
quite possibly vexed that she had unguardedly
betrayed
a greater interest in his welfare than she
might always deem prudent. How now, Ensign,
hath the campaign ended with no better trophy
than this?
The fellow is not a chief, nor, by his step and
dull look, even a warrior; but he was, nevertheless,
a lurker nigh the settlements, and it was thought
prudent to bring him in; returned the husband,
addressing himself to Content, while he answered
the salutation of his wife with a sufficiently brief
nod. My own scouting hath brought nothing to
light, but my brother Ring hath fallen on the trail
of him that is here present, and it is not a little that
we are puzzled in probing, as the good Doctor Ergot
calleth it, into the meaning of his errand.
Of what tribe may the savage be?
There hath been discussion among us, on that
matter, returned Dudley, with an oblique glance
of the eye towards the physician. Some have said
he is a Narragansett, while others think he cometh
of a stock still further east.
In giving that opinion, I spoke merely of his
secondary or acquired habits, interrupted Ergot;
for, having reference to his original, the man is
assuredly a White.
A White! repeated all around him.
Beyond a cavil; as may be seen by divers
particulars
in his outward conformation, viz: in the
shape of the head, the muscles of the arms and of
the legs, the air and gait, besides sundry other signs,
that are familiar to men who have made the
physical
peculiarities of the two races their study.
One of which is this! continued Dudley,
throwing
up the robe of the captive, and giving his
companions
the ocular evidence which had so
satisfactorily
removed all his own doubts. Though the
color of the skin may not be proof positive, like
that named by our neighbor Ergot, it is still
something
,
in helping a man of little learning to make
up an opinion in such a matter.
Madam! exclaimed Faith so suddenly as to
cause her she addressed to startfor the sake of
Heaven's mercy! let thy maidens bring soap and
water, that the face of this man may be cleansed of
its paint.
What foolishness is thy brain set upon? rejoined
the Ensign, who had latterly affected some of that
superior gravity which might be supposed to belong
to his official station. We are not now under the
roof of the Whip-Poor-Will, wife of mine, but in
the presence of those who need none of thy
suggestions
to give proper forms to an examination of office.
Faith heeded no reproof. Instead of waiting for
others to perform that which she had desired, she
applied herself to the task, with a dexterity that
had been acquired by long practice, and a zeal that
seemed awakened by some extraordinary emotion.
In a minute, the colors had disappeared from the
features of the captive, and, though deeply tanned
by exposure to an American sun and to sultry winds,
his face was unequivocally that of one who owed
his origin to an European ancestry. The movements
of the eager woman were watched with curious
interest
by all present; and when the short task was
ended, a murmur of surprise broke simultaneously
from every lip.
There is meaning in this masquerade, observed
Content, who had long and intently studied the dull
and ungainly countenance that was exposed to his
scrutiny by the operation. I have heard of
Christian
men who have sold themselves to gain, and
who, forgetting religion and the love of their race,
have been known to league with the savage in
order
to pursue rapine in the settlements. This wretch
hath the subtlety of one of the French of the
Canadas
in his eye.
Away! away! cried Faith, forcing herself in
front of the speaker, and, by placing her two hands
on the shaven crown of the prisoner, forming a sort
of shade to his features. Away with all folly,
about the Frenchers and wicked leagues! This is
no plotting miscreant, but a stricken innocent!
Whittal
my
brother Whittal, dost know me?
The tears rolled down the cheeks of the wayward
woman, as she gazed into the face of her witless
relative, whose eye lighted with one of its occasional
gleamings of intelligence, and who indulged in a
low, vacant laugh, ere he answered her earnest
interrogatory
.
Some speak like men from over sea, he said,
and some speak like men of the woods. Is there
such a thing as bear's meat, or a mouthful of
hommony
,
in the wigwam?
Had the voice of one, long known to be in the
grave, broken on the ears of the family, it would
scarcely have produced a deeper sensation, or have
quickened the blood more violently about their
hearts, than this sudden and utterly unexpected
discovery
of the character of their captive. Wonder
and awe held them mute for a time, and then Ruth
was seen standing before the restored wanderer,
her hands clasped in the attitude of petition, her
eye contracted and imploring, and her whole person
expressive of the suspense and excitement which
had roused her long-latent emotions to agony.
Tell me, said a thrilling voice, that might
have quickened the intellect of one even duller
than the man addressed, as thou hast pity in thy
heart, tell me, if my babe yet live?
'Tis a good babe, returned the other; and then
laughing again, in his own vacant and unmeaning
manner, he bent his eyes with a species of stupid
wonder on Faith, in whose appearance there was
far less change, than in the speaking but wasted
countenance of her who stood immediately before
him.
Give leave, dearest Madam, interposed the
sister: I know the nature of the boy, and could
ever do more with him than any other.
But this request was useless. The system of
the mother, in its present state of excitement, was
unequal to further effort. Sinking into the
watchful
arms of Content, she was borne away, and, for a
minute, the anxious interest of the handmaidens
left none but the men on the piazza.
Whittalmy old playfellow, Whittal Ring;
said the son of Content, advancing with a humid
eye to take the hand of the prisoner. Hast
forgotten
,
man, the companion of thy early days? It
is young Mark Heathcote that speaks.
The other looked up into his countenance, for a
moment, with a reviving recollection; but shaking
his head, he drew back in marked displeasure,
muttering
loud enough to be heard
What a false liar is a Pale-face! Here is one
of the tall rogues, wishing to pass for a loping boy!
What more he uttered his auditors never knew,
for he instantly changed his language to some
dialect
of an Indian tribe.
The mind of the unhappy youth hath even
been more blunted, by exposure and the usages of
a savage life, than by Nature, said Content, who
with most of the others had been recalled, by his
interest in the examination, to the scene they had
momentarily quitted. Let the sister deal tenderly
with the lad, and, in Heaven's time, shall we learn
the truth.
The deep feeling of the father clothed his words
4 *
with authority. The eager group gave place, and
something like the solemnity of an official
examination
succeeded to the irregular and hurried
interrogatories
,
which had first broken on the dull
intellect
of the recovered wanderer.
The dependants took their stations, in a circle,
around the chair of the Puritan, by whose side was
placed Content, while Faith induced her brother to
be seated on the step of the piazza, in a manner
that all might hear. The attention of the brother,
himself, was drawn from the formality of the
arrangement
,
by placing food in his hands.
And now, Whittal, I would know, commenced
the ready woman, when a deep silence denoted the
attention of the auditors, I would know, if thou
rememberest the day I clad thee in garments of
boughten cloth, from over sea; and how fond thou
wast of being seen among the kine in colors so gay?
The young man looked up in her face, as if the
tones of her voice gave him pleasure; but, instead
of making any reply, he preferred to munch the
bread with which she had endeavored to lure him
back to their ancient confidence.
Surely, boy, thou canst not so soon have
forgotten
the gift I bought, with the hard earnings of a
wheel that turned at night. The tail of yon
peacock
is not finer than thou then wastBut I will
make thee such another garment, that thou mayst
go with the trainers to their weekly muster.
The youth dropped the robe of skin that covered
the upper part of his body, and making a forward
gesture, with the gravity of an Indian, he
answered
Whittal is a warrior on his path; he has no
time for the talk of the women!
Now, brother, thou forgettest the manner in
which I was wont to feed thy hunger, as the frost
pinched thee, in the cold mornings, and at the hour
when the kine needed thy care; else thou wouldst
not call me woman.
Hast ever been on the trail of a Pequot?
Know'st how to whoop among the men?
What is an Indian whoop, to the bleating of
thy flocks, or the bellowing of cattle in the bushes?
Thou rememberest the sound of the bells, as they
tinkled among the second growth of an evening?
The ancient herdsman turned his head, and
seemed to lend his attention, as a dog listens to an
approaching footstep. But the gleam of recollection
was quickly lost. In the next moment, he yielded
to the more positive, and possibly more urgent,
demands of his appetite.
Then hast thou lost the use of ears; else thou
wouldst not say that thou forgettest the sound of
the bells.
Didst ever hear a wolf howl? exclaimed the
other. That's a sound for a hunter! I saw the
Great Chief strike the striped panther, when the
boldest warrior of the tribe grew white as a craven
Pale-face at his leaps!
Talk not to me of your ravenous beasts and
Great Chiefs, but rather let us think of the days
when we were young, and when thou hadst delight
in the sports of a Christian childhood. Hast
forgotten
,
Whittal, how our mother used to give us leave
to pass the idle time in games among the snow?
Nipset hath a mother in her wigwam, but he
asketh no leave to go on the hunt. He is a man;
the next snow, he will be a warrior.
Silly boy! This is some treachery of the savage,
by which he has bound thy weakness with the
fetters
of his craftiness. Thy mother, Whittal, was a
woman of Christian belief, and one of a white race;
and a kind and mourning mother was she over thy
feeble-mindedness! Dost not remember, unthankful
of heart! how she nursed thy sickly hours in
boyhood
,
and how she administered to all thy bodily
wants? Who was it that fed thee when a-hungered,
or who had compassion on thy waywardness, when
others tired of thy idle deeds, or grew impatient of
thy weakness?
The brother looked, for an instant, at the flushed
features of the speaker, as if glimmerings of some
faintly distinguished scenes crossed the visions of
his mind; but the animal still predominated, and
he continued to feed his hunger.
This exceedeth human endurance! exclaimed
the excited Faith. Look into this eye, weak one,
and say if thou knowest her who supplied the place
of that mother whom thou refusest to remember
she who hath toiled for thy comfort, and who hath
never refused to listen to all thy plaints, and to
soften all thy sufferings. Look at this eye, and
speakdost know me?
Certain! returned the other, laughing with a
half-intelligent expression of recognition; 'tis a
woman of the Pale-faces, and I warrant me, one
that will never be satisfied till she hath all the furs
of the Americas on her back, and all the venison
of the woods in her kitchen. Didst ever hear the
tradition, how that wicked race got into the
hunting-grounds
,
and robbed the warriors of the
country
?
The disappointment of Faith had made her too
impatient to lend a pleased attention to this tale;
but, at that moment, a form appeared at her side,
and by a quiet and commanding gesture directed
her to humor the temper of the wanderer.
It was Ruth, in whose pale cheek and anxious
eye, all the intenseness of a mother's longings might
be traced, in its most touching aspect. Though so
lately helpless and sinking beneath her emotions,
the sacred feelings which now sustained her
seemed
to supply the place of all other aid; and as she
glided past the listening circle, even Content
himself
had not believed it necessary to offer succor, or
to interpose with remonstrance. Her quiet,
meaning
gesture seemed to say, `proceed, and show all
indulgence to the weakness of the young man.'
The rising discontent of Faith was checked by
habitual
reverence, and she prepared to obey.
And what say the silly traditions of which you
speak? she added, ere the current of his dull ideas
had time to change its direction.
'Tis spoken by the old men in the villages, and
what is there said is gospel-true. You see all around
you, land that is covered with hill and valley, and
which once bore wood, without the fear of the axe,
and over which game was spread with a bountiful
hand. There are runners and hunters in our tribe,
who have been on a straight path towards the
setting
sun, until their legs were weary and their eyes
could not see the clouds that hang over the salt
lake, and yet they say, 'tis everywhere beautiful as
yonder green mountain. Tall trees and shady woods,
rivers and lakes filled with fish, and deer and beaver
plentiful as the sands on the sea-shore. All this land
and water the Great Spirit gave to men of red skins;
for them he loved, since they spoke truth in their
tribes, were true to their friends, hated their
enemies
,
and knew how to take scalps. Now, a
thousand
snows had come and melted, since this gift was
made, continued Whittal, who spoke with the air
of one charged with the narration of a grave
tradition
,
though he probably did no more than relate
what many repetitions had rendered familiar to his
inactive mind, and yet none but red-skins were
seen to hunt the moose, or to go on the war-path.
Then the Great Spirit grew angry; he hid his face
from his children, because they quarrelled among
themselves. Big canoes came out of the rising sun,
and brought a hungry and wicked people into the
land. At first, the strangers spoke soft and
complaining
like women. They begged room for a few
wigwams
,
and said if the warriors would give them
ground to plant, they would ask their God to look
upon the red-men. But when they grew strong,
they forgot their words and made liars of
themselves
.
Oh, they are wicked knaves! A Pale-face
is a panther. When a-hungered, you can hear him
whining in the bushes like a strayed infant; but
when you come within his leap, beware of tooth
and claw!
This evil-minded race, then, robbed the red
warriors of their land?
Certain! They spoke like sick women, till they
grew strong, and then they out-devilled the Pequots
themselves in wickedness; feeding the warriors with
their burning milk, and slaying with blazing
inventions
,
that they made out of the yellow meal.
And the Pequods! was their great warrior dead,
before the coming of the men from over sea?
You are a woman that has never heard a
tradition
,
or you would know better! A Pequot is a
weak and crawling cub.
And thouthou art then a Narragansett?
Don't I look like a man?
I had mistaken thee for one of our nearer
neighbors
,
the Mohegan Pequods.
The Mohicans are basket-makers for the
Yengeese
;
but the Narragansett goes leaping through
the woods, like a wolf on the trail of the deer!
All this is quite in reason, and now thou pointest
to its justice, I cannot fail but see it. But we have
curiosity to know more of the great tribe. Hast
ever heard of one of thy people, Whittal, known
as Miantonimoh'tis a chief of some renown.
The witless youth had continued to eat, at
intervals
;
but, on hearing this question, he seemed
suddenly
to forget his appetite. For a moment he
look-ed
down, and then he answered slowly and not
without
solemnity
A man cannot live for ever.
What! said Faith, motioning to her
deeply-interested
auditors to restrain their impatience
has he quitted his people? And thou lived with
him, Whittal, ere he came to his end?
He never looked on Nipset, nor Nipset on him.
I know nought of this Nipset; tell me of the
great Miantonimoh.
Dost need to hear twice? The Sachem is gone
to the far land, and Nipset will be a warrior when
the next snow comes!
Disappointment threw a cloud on every
countenance
,
and the beam of hope, which had been
kindling
in the eye of Ruth, changed to the former
painful expression of deep inward suffering. But
Faith still managed to repress all speech among
those who listened, continuing the examination,
after
a short delay that her vexation rendered
unavoidable
.
I had thought that Miantonimoh was still a
warrior in his tribe, she said. In what battle did
he fall?
Mohican Uncas did that wicked deed. The
Pale-men gave him great riches to murder the
Sachem
.
Thou speakest of the father; but there was
another Miantonimoh; he who in boyhood dwelt
among the people of white blood.
Whittal listened attentively; and after seeming
to rally his thoughts, he shook his head, saying
before
he again began to eat
There never was but one of the name, and
there never will be another. Two eagles do not
build their nests in the same tree.
Thou sayest truly, continued Faith; well
knowing that to dispute the information of her
brother
,
was in effect to close his mouth. Now tell
me of Conanchet, the present Narragansett Sachem
he who hath leagued with Metacom, and hath
of late been driven from his fastness near the sea
doth he yet live?
The expression of the brother's countenance
underwent
another change. In place of the childish
importance with which he had hitherto replied to
the questions of his sister, a look of overreaching
cunning gathered about his dull eye. The organ
glanced slowly and cautiously around him, as if its
owner expected to detect some visible sign of those
covert intentions he so evidently distrusted. Instead
of answering, the wanderer continued his meal,
though less like one who had need of sustenance,
than one resolved to make no communications which
might prove dangerous. This change was not
unobserved
by Faith, or by any of those who so
intently
watched the means by which she had been
endeavoring to thread the confused ideas of one so
dull, and yet who at need seemed so practised in
savage artifice. She prudently altered her manner
of interrogating, by endeavoring to lead his thoughts
to other matters.
I warrant me, continued the sister, that thou
now beginnest to call to mind the times when thou
led'st the cattle among the bushes, and how thou
wert wont to call on Faith to give thee food, when
a-weary with threading the woods in quest of the
kine. Hast ever been assailed by the Narragansetts
thyself, Whittal, when dwelling in the house of a
Pale-face?
The brother ceased eating. Again he appeared
to muse as intently as was possible, for one of his
circumscribed intellects. But shaking his head in
the negative, he silently resumed the grateful office
of mastication.
What! hast come to be a warrior, and never
known a scalp taken, or seen a fire lighted in the
roof of a wigwam?
Whittal laid down the food, and turned to his
sister. His face was teeming with a wild and fierce
meaning, and he indulged in a low but triumphant
laugh. When this exhibition of satisfaction was
over, he consented to reply.
Certain, he said. We went on a path, in the
night, against the lying Yengeese, and no burning
of the woods ever scorched the 'arth as we
blackened
their fields! All their proud housen were
turned
into piles of coals.
And where and when did you this act of brave
vengeance?
They called the place after the bird of night;
as if an Indian name could save them from an
Indian
massacre!
Ha! 'Tis of the Wish-Ton-Wish thou speakest!
But thou wast a sufferer, and not an actor, brother,
in that heartless burning.
Thou liest like a wicked woman of the
Pale-faces
,
as thou art! Nipset was only a boy on that
path, but he went with his people. I tell thee, we
signed the very 'arth with our brands, and not a
head of them all ever rose again from the ashes.
Notwithstanding her great self-command, and the
object that was constantly before the mind of Faith,
she shuddered at the fierce pleasure with which
her brother pronounced the extent of the vengeance,
that, in his imaginary character, he believed he
had taken on his enemies. Still cautious not to
destroy
an illusion which might aid her, in the
so-long-defeated
and so-anxiously-desired discovery, the
woman repressed her horror, and continued
Trueyet some were sparedsurely the
warriors
carried prisoners back to their village. Thou
didst not slay all?
All.
Vol. II. 5
Naythou speakest now of the miserables who
were wrapt in the blazing block; butbut some,
without, might have fallen into thy hands, ere the
assailed sought shelter in the tower. Surelysurely
thou didst not kill all?
The hard breathing of Ruth caught the ear of
Whittal, and for a moment he turned to regard her
countenance in dull wonder. But again shaking
his head, he answered in a low, positive tone
All;ay, to the screeching women and crying
babes!
Surely there is a childI would say there is a
woman, in thy tribe, of fairer skin and of form
different
from most of thy people. Was not such an
one led a captive from the burning of the
Wish-Ton-Wish
?
Dost think the deer will live with the wolf, or
hast ever found the cowardly pigeon in the nest of
the hawk?
Nay, thou art of different color thyself, Whittal,
and it well may be, thou art not alone.
The youth regarded his sister a moment with
marked displeasure, and then, on turning to eat, he
muttered
There is as much fire in snow, as truth in a
lying
Yengeese?
This examination must close, said Content,
with a heavy sigh; at another hour, we may hope
to push the matter to some more fortunate result;
but, yonder cometh one charged with especial
service
from the towns below, as would seem by the
fact that he disregardeth the holiness of the day,
no less than by the earnest manner in which he is
journeying.
As the individual named was visible to all who
chose to look in the direction of the hamlet, his
sudden appearance caused a general interruption
to the interest which had been so strongly
awakened
on a subject that was familiar to every resident
in the valley.
The early hour, the gait at which the stranger
urged his horse, the manner in which he passed the
open and inviting door of the Whip-Poor-Will,
proclaimed
him a messenger, who probably bore some
communication of importance from the Government
of the Colony to the younger Heathcote, who filled
the highest station of official authority in that
distant
settlement. Observations to this purport had
passed from mouth to mouth, and curiosity was
actively
alive, by the time the horseman rode into
the court. There he dismounted, and, covered with
the dust of the road, he presented himself, with
the air of one who had passed the night in the
saddle
,
before the man he sought.
I have orders for Captain Content Heathcote,
said the messenger, saluting all around him with
the usual grave but studied courtesy of the people
to whom he belonged.
He is here to receive and to obey, was the
answer.
The traveller wore a little of that mysteriousness
that is so grateful to certain minds, which, from
inability to command respect in any other manner,
are fond of making secrets of matters that might as
well be revealed. In obedience to this feeling, he
expressed a desire that his communications might
be made apart. Content quietly motioned for him
to follow, leading the way into an inner apartment
of the house. As a new direction was given, by this
interruption, to the thoughts of the spectators of
the foregoing scene, we shall also take the
opportunity
to digress, in order to lay before the reader
some general facts that may be necessary to the
connexion of the subsequent parts of the legend.
CHAPTER IV.
Be certain what you do, sir; lest your justice
Prove violence.
Winter's Tale
.
The
designs of the celebrated Metacom had been
betrayed to the Colonists, by the treachery of a
subordinate warrior, named Sausaman. The
punishment
of this treason led to inquiries, which
terminated
in accusations against the great Sachem
of the Wampanoags. Scorning to vindicate himself
before enemies that he hated, and perhaps
distrusting
their clemency, Metacom no longer endeavored
to cloak his proceedings; but, throwing aside the
emblems of peace, he openly appeared with an
armed hand.
The tragedy had commenced about a year
before
the period at which the tale has now arrived.
A scene, not unlike that detailed in the foregoing
pages, took place; the brand, the knife, and the
tomahawk, doing their work of destruction, without
pity and without remorse. But, unlike the inroad
of the Wish-Ton-Wish, this expedition was
immediately
followed by others, until the whole of
New-England
was engaged in the celebrated war, to
which we have before referred.
The entire white population of the Colonies of
New-England had shortly before been estimated at
one hundred and twenty thousand souls. Of this
number, it was thought that sixteen thousand men
were capable of bearing arms. Had time been
given for the maturity of the plans of Metacom, he
might have readily assembled bands of warriors,
who, aided by their familiarity with the woods, and
accustomed to the privations of such a warfare,
would have threatened serious danger to the
growing
strength of the whites. But the ordinary and
selfish feelings of man were as active, among these
wild tribes, as they are known to be in more
artificial
communities. The indefatigable Metacom, like
that Indian hero of our own times, Tecumth, had
passed years in endeavoring to appease ancient
enmities
and to lull jealousies, in order that all of red
blood might unite in crushing a foe that promised,
should he be longer undisturbed in his march to
power, soon to be too formidable for their united
efforts to subdue. The premature explosion in some
measure averted the danger. It gave the English
time to strike several severe blows against the tribe
of their great enemy, before his allies had
determined
to make common cause in his design. The
summer and antumn of 1675 had been passed in
active hostilities between the English and
Wampanoags
,
without openly drawing any other nation
into the contest. Some of the Pequots, with their
dependent tribes, even took sides with the whites;
and we read of the Mohegans being actively
employed
in harassing the Sachem, on his well-known
retreat from that neck of land, where he had been
hemmed in by the English, with the expectation
that he might be starved into submission.
The warfare of the first summer was, as might
be expected, attended by various degrees of success,
fortune quite as often favoring the red-men, in their
desultory attempts at annoyance, as their more
disciplined
enemies. Instead of confining his operations
to his own circumscribed and easily environed
districts
,
Metacom had led his warriors to the distant
settlements on the Connecticut; and it was during
the operations of this season, that several of the
towns on that river were first assailed and laid in
5 *
ashes. Active hostilities had in some measure ceased,
between the Wampanoags and the English, with
the cold weather, most of the troops retiring to their
homes, while the Indians apparently paused to take
breath for their final effort.
It was, however, previously to this cessation of
activity, that the Commissioners of the United
Colonies
,
as they were called, met to devise the means
of a concerted resistance. Unlike their former
dangers
from the same quarter, it was manifest, by the
manner in which a hostile feeling was spreading
around their whole frontier, that a leading spirit
had given as much of unity and design to the
movements
of the foe, as could probably ever be created
among a people so separated by distance and so
divided in communities. Right or wrong, the
Colonists
gravely decided that the war on their part
was just. Great preparations were therefore made
to carry it on, the ensuing summer, in a manner
more suited to their means, and to the absolute
necessities
of their situation. It was in consequence
of the arrangements made for bringing a portion
of the inhabitants of the Colony of Connecticut into
the field, that we find the principal characters of
our legend in the warlike guise in which they have
just been re-introduced to the reader.
Although the Narragansetts had not at first been
openly implicated in the attacks on the Colonists,
facts soon came to the knowledge of the latter,
which left no doubt of the state of feeling in that
nation. Many of their young men were
discovered
among the followers of Metacom, and arms
taken from whites, who had been slain in the
different
encounters, were also seen in their villages.
One of the first measures of the Commissioners,
therefore, was to anticipate more serious opposition,
by directing an overwhelming force against this
people. The party collected on that occasion was
probably the largest military body which the
English
,
at that early day, had ever assembled in their
Colonies. It consisted of a thousand men, of whom
no inconsiderable number was cavalrya species
of troops that, as all subsequent experience has
shown, is admirably adapted to operations against
so active and so subtle a foe.
The attack was made in the depth of winter,
and it proved fearfully destructive to the assailed.
The defence of Conanchet, the young Sachem of
the Narragansetts, was every way worthy of his
high character for courage and mental resources,
nor was the victory gained without serious loss to
the Colonists. The native chief had collected his
warriors, and taken post on a small area of firm
land, that was situated in the centre of a densely
wooded swamp; and the preparations for resistance
betrayed a singular familiarity with the military
expedients of a white man. There had been a
palisadoed
breast-work, a species of redoubt, and a
regular block-house, to overcome, ere the Colonists
could penetrate into the fortified village itself. The
first attempts were unsuccessful, the Indians having
repulsed their enemies with loss. But better arms
and greater concert finally prevailed, though not
without a struggle that lasted for many hours, and
not until the defendants were, in truth, nearly
surrounded
.
The events of that memorable day made a deep
impression on the minds of men who were rarely
excited by any incidents of a great and moving
character. It was still the subject of earnest and
not unfrequently of melancholy discourse, around
the fire-sides of the Colonists; nor was the victory
achieved without accompaniments which, however
unavoidable they might have been, had a tendency
to raise doubts in the minds of conscientious
religionists
concerning the lawfulness of their cause. It is
said that a village of six hundred cabins was burnt,
and that hundreds of dead and wounded were
consumed
in the conflagration. A thousand warriors
were thought to have lost their lives in this affair,
and it was believed that the power of the nation
was broken for ever. The sufferers among the
Colonists themselves were numerous, and mourning
came into a vast many families, with the tidings of
victory.
In this expedition most of the men of the
Wish-Ton-Wish
had been conspicuous actors, under the orders
of Content. They had not escaped with impunity;
but it was confidently hoped that their courage was
to meet its reward in a long continuance of peace,
which was the more desirable on account of their
remote and exposed situation.
In the mean time, the Narragansetts were far
from being subdued. Throughout the whole
continuance
of the inclement season, they had caused
alarms on the frontiers; and, in one or two instances,
their renowned Sachem had taken signal vengeance
for the dire affair in which his people had so heavily
suffered. As the spring advanced, the inroads
became
still more frequent, and the appearances of
danger so far increased as to require a new call on
the Colonists to arm. The messenger, introduced in
the last chapter, was charged with matter that had
a reference to the events of this war; and it was
with an especial communication of great urgency,
that he had now demanded his secret audience with
the leader of the military force of the valley.
Thou hast affairs of moment ot deal with,
Captain
Heathcote, said the hard-riding traveller, when
he found himself alone with Content. The orders
of his Honor are to spare neither whip nor spur,
until the chief men of the borders shall be warned
of the actual situation of the Colony.
Hath aught of moving interest occurred, that
his Honor deemeth there is necessity for unusual
watchfulness. We had hoped that the prayers of the
pious were not in vain; and that a time of quiet
was about to succeed to that violence, of which,
bounden by our social covenants, we have unhappily
been unwilling spectators. The bloody assault of
Pettyquamscott hath exercised our minds severely
nay, it hath even raised doubts of the lawfulness of
some of our deeds.
Thou hast a commendable spirit of forgiveness,
Captain Heathcote, or thy memory would extend to
other scenes than those which bear relation to the
punishment of an enemy so remorseless. It is said
on the river, that the valley of Wish-Ton-Wish hath
been visited by the savage in its day, and men speak
freely of the wrongs suffered by its owners on that
pitiless occasion.
The truth may not be denied, even that good
should come thereof. It is certain that much
suffering
was inflicted on me and on mine, by the inroad
of which you speak; nevertheless we have ever
striven to consider it as a merciful chastisement
inflicted
for manifold sins, rather than as a subject
that might be remembered, in order to stimulate
passions that, in all reason as in all charity, should
slumber as much as a weak nature will allow.
This is well, Captain Heathcote, and in
exceeding
conformity with the most received doctrines,
returned the stranger, slightly gaping, either from
want of rest the previous night, or from
disinclination
to so grave a subject; but it hath little
connexion
with present duties. My charge beareth
especial
concern with the further destruction of the
Indians, rather than to any inward searchings into
the condition of our own mental misgivings,
concerning
any right it may be thought proper to
question
,
that hath a reference to the duty of
self-protection
.
There is no unworthy dweller in the
Connecticut
Colony, sir, that hath endeavored more to
cultivate a tender conscience, than the wretched
sinner who standeth before you; for I have the
exceeding
happiness to sit under the outpourings of a
spirit that hath few mortal superiors in the matter
of precious gifts. I now speak of Dr. Calvin Pope;
a most worthy and soul-quieting divine; one who
spareth not the goad when the conscience needeth
pricking, nor hesitateth to dispense consolation to him
who seeth his fallen estate; and one that never
faileth
to deal with charity, and humbleness of spirit,
and forbearance with the failings of friends, and
forgiveness of enemies, as the chiefest signs of a
renovated moral existence; and, therefore, there
can be but little reason to distrust the spiritual
rightfulness of all that listen to the riches of his
discourse. But when it cometh to be question of life
or death, a matter of dominion and possession of these
fair lands, that the Lord hath givenwhy, sir, then
I say that, like the Israelites dealing with the sinful
occupants of Canaan, it behoveth us to be true to
each other, and to look upon the heathen with a
distrustful
eye.
There may be reason in that thou utterest,
observed Content, sorrowfully. Still it is lawful to
mourn even the necessity which conduceth to all
this strife. I had hoped that they who direct the
Councils of the Colony might have resorted to less
violent means of persuasion, to lead the savage
back to reason, than that which cometh from the
armed hand. Of what nature is thy especial
errand
?
Of deep urgency, sir, as will be seen in the
narration
,
returned the other, dropping his voice like
one habitually given to the dramatic part of
diplomacy
,
however unskilful he might have been in its
more intellectual accomplishments. Thou wast in
the Pettyquamscott scourging, and need not be
reminded
of the manner in which the Lord dealt with
our enemies on that favor-dispensing day; but it
may not be known to one so remote from the
stirring
and daily transactions of Christendom, in what
manner the savage hath taken the chastisement.
The restless and still unconquered Conanchet hath
deserted his towns and taken refuge in the open
woods; where it exceedeth the skill and usage of
our civilized men of war, to discover, at all times,
the position and force of their enemies. The
consequences
may be easily conjectured. The savage
hath broken in upon, and laid waste, in whole or in
part, firstlyLancaster, on the tenth, counting on
his fingers, when many were led into captivity;
secondly, Marlborough, on the twentieth; on the
thirteenth, ultimo, Groton; Warwick, on the
seventeenth
;
and Rehoboth, Chelmsford, Andover,
Weymouth
,
and divers other places, have been greatly
sufferers, between the latter period and the day
when I quitted the abode of his Honor. Pierce of
Scituate, a stout warrior, and one practised in the
wiles of this nature of warfare, hath been cut off
with a whole company of followers; and
Wadsworth
and Brockleband, men known and esteemed
for courage and skill, have left their bones in the
woods, sleeping in common among their luckless
followers
.
These are truly tidings to cause us to mourn
over the abandoned condition of our nature, said
Content, in whose meek mind there was no
affectation
of regrets on such a subject. It is not easy
to see in what manner the evil may be arrested,
without again going forth to battle.
Such is the opinion of his Honor, and of all who
sit with him in Council; for we have sufficient
knowledge of the proceedings of the enemy, to be
sure that the master-spirit of wickedness, in the
person of him called Philip, is raging up and down
the whole extent of the borders, awakening the
tribes to what he calleth the necessity of resisting
further aggression, and stirring up their vengeance,
by divers subtle expedients of malicious cunning.
And what manner of proceeding hath been
ordered
,
in so urgent a strait, by the wisdom of our
rulers?
Firstly, there is a fast ordained, that we come
to the duty as men purified by mental struggle and
deep self-examination; secondly, it is recommended
that the congregations deal with more than wonted
severity with all backsliders and evil-doers, in order
that the towns may not fall under the divine
displeasure
,
as happened to them that dwelt in the
devoted cities of Canaan; thirdly, it is determined
to lend our feeble aid to the ordering of Providence,
by calling forth the allotted number of the trained
bands; and, fourthly, it is contemplated to
counteract
the seeds of vengeance, by setting a
labor-earning
price on the heads of our enemies.
I accord with the three first of these expedients,
as the known and lawful resorts of Christian men,
said Content. But the latter seemeth a measure
that needeth to be entertained with great wariness
of manner, and some distrust of purpose.
Fear not, since all suiting and economical
discretion
is active in the minds of our rulers, who
have pondered sagaciously on so grave a policy. It
is not intended to offer more than half the reward
that is held forth by our more wealthy and elder
sister of the Bay; and there is some acute question
about the necessity of bidding at all for any of
tender
years. And now, Captain Heathcote, with the
good leave of so respectable a subject, I will
proceed
to lay before you the details of the number
and the nature of the force that it is hoped you
will lead in person in the ensuing campaign.
As the result of that which followed will be seen
in the course of the legend, it is not necessary to
accompany the Messenger any further in his
communication
.
We shall therefore leave him and
Content busied with the matter of their conference,
and proceed to give some account of the other
personages
connected with our subject.
When interrupted, as already related, by the
arrival
of the stranger, Faith had endeavored, by a
new expedient, to elicit some evidences of a more
just remembrance from the dull mind of her
brother
.
Accompanied by most of the dependants of
the family, she had led him to the summit of that
hill which was now crowned with the foliage of a
young and thrifty orchard, and, placing him at the
foot of the ruin, she tried to excite a train of
recollections
that should lead to deeper impressions,
and, possibly, by their aid, to a discovery of the
important circumstance that all so much longed to
have explained.
The experiment produced no happy result. The
place, and indeed the whole valley, had undergone
so great a change, that one more liberally gifted
might have hesitated to believe them those that
have been described in our earlier pages. This rapid
alteration of objects, which elsewhere know so little
change in a long course of ages, is a fact familiar
to all who reside in the newer districts of the
Union. It is caused by the rapid improvements that
are made in the first stages of a settlement. To
fell the forest alone, is to give an entirely new
aspect
to the view; and it is far from easy to see in
a village and in cultivated fields, however recent
the existence of the one or imperfect the other, any
traces of a spot that a short time before was known
as the haunt of the wolf or the refuge of the deer.
The features, and more particularly the eye of
his sister, had stirred long-dormant recollections in
the mind of Whittal Ring; and though these
glimpses
Vol. II. 6
of the past were detached and indistinct, they
had sufficed to quicken that ancient confidence
which was partially exhibited in their opening
conference
.
But it exceeded his feeble powers to
recall
objects that would appeal to no very lively
sympathies, and which had themselves undergone so
material alterations. Still, the witless youth did
not look on the ruin entirely without some stirrings
of his nature. Although the sward around its base
was lively in the brightest verdure of early
summer
,
and the delicious odor of the wild clover
saluted
his senses, still there was that in the
blackened
and ragged walls, the position of the tower, and
the view of the surrounding hills, shorn as so much
of them now were, that evidently spoke to his
earliest
impressions. He looked at the spot, as a hound
gazes at a master who has been so long lost as even
to deaden his instinct; and at times, as his
companions
endeavored to aid his faint images, it would
seem as if memory were likely to triumph, and all
those deceptive opinions, which habit and Indian
wiles had drawn over his dull mind, were about to
vanish before the light of reality. But the
allurements
of a life in which there was so much of the
freedom of nature mingled with the fascinating
pleasures of the chase and of the woods, were not
to be dispossessed so readily. When Faith artfully
led him back to those animal enjoyments of which
he had been so fond in boyhood, the fantasy of her
brother seemed most to waver; but whenever it
became apparent that the dignity of a warrior, and
all the more recent and far more alluring delights
of his later life, were to be abandoned ere his being
could return into its former existence, his dull
faculties
obstinately refused to lend themselves to a
change that, in his case, would have been little
short of that attributed to the transmigration of
souls.
After an hour of anxious, and frequently, on the
part of Faith, of angry efforts to extract some
evidences
of his recollection of the condition of life to
which he had once belonged, the attempt for the
moment was abandoned. At times, it seemed as if
the woman were about to prevail. He often called
himself Whittal, but he continued to insist that he
was also Nipset, a man of the Narragansetts, who
had a mother in his wigwam, and who had reason
to believe that he should be numbered among the
warriors of his tribe, ere the fall of another snow.
In the mean time, a very different scene was
passing at the place where the first examination
had been held, and which had been immediately
deserted by most of the spectators, on the sudden
arrival of the Messenger. But a solitary individual
was seated at the spacious board, which had been
provided alike for those who owned and presided
over the estate, and for their dependants to the
very meanest. The individual who remained had
thrown himself into a seat, less with the air of him
who consults the demands of appetite, than of one
whose thoughts were so engrossing as to render him
indifferent to the situation or employment of his
more corporeal part. His head rested on his arms,
the latter effectually concealing the face, as they
were spread over the plain but exquisitely neat
table of cherry-wood, which, by being placed at the
side of one of less costly material, was intended to
form the only distinction between the guests, as, in
more ancient times and in other countries, the salt
was known to mark the difference in rank among
those who partook of the same feast.
Mark, said a timid voice at his elbow, thou
art weary with this night-watching, and with the
scouting on the hills. Dost not think of taking food
before seeking thy rest?
I sleep not, returned the youth, raising his
head, and gently pushing aside the basin of simple
food that was offered by one whose eye looked
feelingly
on his flushed features, and whose suffused
cheek perhaps betrayed there was secret
consciousness
that the glance was kinder than maiden
diffidence
should allow. I sleep not, Martha, nor doth
it seem to me, that I shall ever sleep again.
Thou frightest me by this wild and unhappy
eye. Hast suffered aught in the march on the
mountains?
Dost think one of my years and strength unable
to bear the weariness of a few hours' watching in
the forest? The body is well, but the mind endureth
grievously.
And wilt not say what causeth this vexation?
Thou knowest, Mark, that there are none in this
dwellingnay, I am certain, I might add in this
valley, that do not wish thee happiness.
'Tis kind to say it, good Marthabut, thou
never hadst a sister!
'Tis true, I am all of my race; and yet to me
it seemeth that no tie of blood could have been
nearer than the love I bore to her who is lost.
Nor mother! Thou never knew'st what 'tis to
reverence a parent.
And is not thy mother mine? answered a voice
that was deeply melancholy, and yet so soft that it
caused the young man to gaze intently at his
companion
,
for a moment, ere he again spoke.
True, true, he said hurriedly. Thou must
and dost love her who hath nursed thy infancy, and
brought thee, with care and tenderness, to so fair
and happy a womanhood. The eye of Martha
grew brighter, and the color of her healthful cheek
deepened, as Mark unconsciously uttered this
commendation
of her appearance; but as she shrunk,
with female sensitiveness, from his observation, the
change was unnoticed, and he continued: Thou
seest that my mother is drooping, hourly, under this
sorrow for our little Ruth; and who can say what
may be the end of a grief that endureth so long?
'Tis true that there hath been reason to fear
much in her behalf; but, of late, hope hath gotten
the better of apprehension. Thou dost not well,
nay, I am not assured thou dost not evil, to permit
this discontent with Providence, because thy mother
yieldeth to a little more than her usual mourning,
on account of the unexpected return of one so
nearly connected with her that we have lost.
'Tis not that, girl'tis not that!
If thou refusest to say what 'tis that giveth thee
this pain, I can do little more than pity.
Listen, and I will say. It is now many years, as
thou knowest, since the savage Mohawk, or
Narragansett
,
Pequot, or Wampanoag, broke in upon our
settlement, and did his vengeance. We were then
children, Martha; and 'tis as a child, that I have
thought of that merciless burning. Our little Ruth
was, like thyself, a blooming infant of some seven
or eight years; and, I know not how the folly hath
beset me, but it hath been ever as one of that
innocence
and age, that I have continued to think of my
sister.
Surely thou knowest that time cannot stay; the
greater therefore is the reason that we should be
industrious to improve
'Tis what our duty teacheth. I tell thee, Martha,
that at night, when dreams come over me, as they
sometimes will, and I see our Ruth wandering in the
forest, it is as a playful, laughing child, such as we
knew her; and even while waking, do I fancy my
sister at my knee, as she was wont to stand when
listening to those idle tales with which we lightened
our childhood.
But we had our birth in the same year and
6 *
monthdost think of me too, Mark, as one of that
childish age?
Of thee! That cannot well be. Do I not see that
thou art grown into the condition of a woman, that
thy little tresses of brown have become the
jet-black
and flowing hair that becomes thy years, and
that thou hast the stature, and, I say it not in
idleness
of speech, Martha, for thou knowest my tongue
is no vain flatterer, but do I not see that thou hast
grown into all the excellence of a most comely
maiden? But 'tis not thus, or rather 'twas not thus,
with her we mourn; for till this hour have I ever
pictured my sister the little innocent we sported
with, that gloomy night she was snatched from our
arms by the cruelty of the savage.
And what hath changed this pleasing image of
our Ruth? asked his companion, half-covering her
face to conceal the still deeper glow of female
gratification which had been kindled by the words
just heard. I often think of her as thou hast
described
,
nor do I now see why we may not still
believe
her, if she yet live, all that we could desire
to see.
That cannot beThe delusion is gone, and in
its place a frightful truth has visited me. Here is
Whittal Ring, whom we lost a boy; thou seest he
is returned a man, and a savage! No, no; my sister
is no longer the child I loved to think her, but one
grown into the estate of womanhood.
Thou thinkest of her unkindly, while thou
thinkest of others far less endowed by nature with
too much indulgence; for thou rememberest, Mark,
she was ever of more pleasing aspect than any that
we knew.
I know not thatI say not thatI think not
that. But be she what hardships and exposure may
have made her, still must Ruth Heathcote be far
too good for an Indian wigwam. Oh! 'tis horrible
to believe that she is the bond-woman, the servitor,
the wife of a savage!
Martha recoiled, and an entire minute passed,
during which she made no reply. It was evident
that the revolting idea for the first time crossed her
mind, and all the natural feelings of gratified and
maiden pride vanished before the genuine and pure
sympathies of a female bosom.
This cannot be, she at length murmuredit
can never be! Our Ruth must still remember the
lessons taught her in infancy. She knoweth she is
born of Christian lineage! of reputable name! of
exalted hope! of glorious promise!
Thou seest by the manner of Whittal, who is of
greater age, how little of that taught, can
withstand
the wily savage.
But Whittal faileth of Nature's gifts; he hath
ever been below the rest of men in understanding.
And yet to what degree of Indian cunning hath
he already attained!
But Mark, rejoined his companion, timidly, as
if, while she felt all its force, she only consented to
urge the argument in tenderness to the harassed
feelings of the brother, we are of equal years;
that which hath happened to me, may well have
been the fortune of our Ruth.
Dost mean that being unespoused thyself, or
that having, at thy years, inclinations that are free,
my sister may have escaped the bitter curse of
being the wife of a Narragansett, or what is not
less frightful, the slave of his humors?
Truly, I mean little else than the former.
And not the latter, continued the young man,
with a quickness that showed some sudden
revolution
in his thoughts. But though with opinions
that are decided, and with kindness awakened in
behalf of one favored, thou hesitatest, Martha, it is
not like that a girl left in the fetters of savage life
would so long pause to think. Even here in the
settlements
,
all are not difficult of judgment as thou!
The long lashes vibrated above the dark eyes of
the maiden, and, for an instant, it seemed as if she
had no intention to reply. But looking timidly aside,
she answered in a voice so low, that her companion
scarcely gathered the meaning of that she uttered.
I know not how I may have earned this false
character among my friends, she said; for to me
it ever seemeth that what I feel and think is but
too easily known.
Then is the smart gallant from the Hartford
town, who cometh and goeth so often between this
distant settlement and his father's house, better
assured
of his success than I had thought. He will
not journey the long road much oftener, alone!
I have angered thee, Mark, or thou wouldst not
speak with so cold an eye, to one who hath ever
lived with thee in kindness.
I do not speak in anger, for 'twould be both
unreasonable
and unmanly to deny all of thy sex right
of choice; but yet it doth seem right, that, when
taste is suited and judgment appeased, there should
be little motive for withholding speech.
And wouldst thou have a maiden, of my years,
in haste to believe that she was sought, when haply
it may be, that he of whom you speak is in quest
of thy society and friendship, rather than of my
favor?
Then might he spare much labor and some
bodily suffering, unless he finds great pleasure in
the saddle; for I know not a youth in the
Connecticut
Colony, for whom I have smaller esteem. Others
may see matter of approval in him, but, to me, he
is of bold speech, ungainly air, and great
disagreeableness
of discourse.
I am happy that at last we find ourselves of one
mind; for that, thou say'st of the youth, is much as
I have long considered him.
Thou! Thou thinkest of the gallant thus! Then
why dost listen to his suit? I had believed thee a
girl too honest, Martha, to affect such niceties of
deception. With this opinion of his character, why
not refuse his company?
Can a maiden speak too hastily?
And if here, and ready to ask thy favor, the
answer would be
No! said the girl, raising her eyes for an
instant
,
and bashfully meeting the eager look of her
companion, though she uttered the monosyllable
firmly.
Mark seemed bewildered. An entirely new and
a novel idea took possession of his brain. The
change was apparent by his altering countenance,
and a cheek that glowed like flame. What he
might have said, most of our readers over fifteen
may presume; but, at that moment, the voices of
those who had accompanied Whittal to the ruin
were heard on their return, and Martha glided away
so silently as to leave him for a moment ignorant
of her absence.
CHAPTER V.
Oh! when amid the throngs of men
The heart grows sick of hollow mirth,
How willingly we turn us, then,
Away from this cold earth;
And look into thy azure breast,
For seats of innocence and rest!
Bryant's
Skies
.
The
day was the Sabbath. This religious
festival
,
which is even now observed in most of the
States of the Union with a strictness that is little
heeded in the rest of Christendom, was then
reverenced
with a severity suited to the austere habits
of the Colonists. The circumstance that one should
journey on such a day, had attracted the
observation
of all in the hamlet; but, as the stranger had
been seen to ride towards the dwelling of the
Heathcotes
,
and the times were known to teem with more
than ordinary interests to the Province, it was
believed
that he found his justification in some apology
of necessity. Still, none ventured forth to inquire
into the motive of this extraordinary visit. At the
end of an hour, the horseman was seen to depart
as he had arrived, seemingly urged on by the calls
of some pressing emergency. He had in truth
proceeded
further with his tidings, though the
lawfulness
of discharging even this imperious duty on the
Sabbath had been gravely considered in the
Councils
of those who had sent him. Happily they had
found, or thought they had found, in some of the
narratives of the sacred volume, a sufficient
precedent
to bid their messenger proceed.
In the mean time, the unusual excitement, which
had been so unexpectedly awakened in the dwelling
of the Heathcotes, began to subside in that quiet
which is in so beautiful accordance with the sacred
character of the day. The sun rose bright and
cloudless above the hills, every vapor of the past
night melting before his genial warmth into the
invisible
element. The valley then lay in that
species
of holy calm which conveys so sweet and so
forcible an appeal to the heart. The world
presented
a picture of the glorious handywork of him
who seems to invite the gratitude and adoration of
his creatures. To the mind yet untainted, there is
exquisite loveliness and even godlike repose in such
a scene. The universal stillness permits the softest
natural sounds to be heard; and the buzz of the
bee, or the wing of the humming-bird, reaches the
ear like the loud notes of a general anthem. This
temporary repose is full of meaning. It should
teach how much of the beauty of this world's
enjoyments
,
how much of its peace, and even how
much of the comeliness of nature itself, is
dependent
on the spirit by which we are actuated. When
man reposes, all around him seems anxious to
contribute
to his rest; and when he abandons the
contentions
of grosser interests, to elevate his spirit, all
living things appear to unite in worship. Although
this apparent sympathy of nature may be less true
than imaginative, its lesson is not destroyed, since it
sufficiently shows that what man chooses to consider
good in this world is good, and that most of its strife
and deformities proceed from his own perversity.
The tenants of the valley of the Wish-Ton-Wish
were little wont to disturb the quiet of the Sabbath.
Their error lay in the other extreme, since the
impaired the charities of life by endeavoring to
raise man altogether above the weakness of his
nature
.
They substituted the revolting aspect of a
sublimated austerity, for that gracious though
regulated
exterior, by which all in the body may best
illustrate their hopes or exhibit their gratitude.
The peculiar air of those of whom we write was
generated by the error of the times and of the
country, though something of its singularly rigid
character might have been derived from the
precepts
and example of the individual who had the
direction of the spiritual interests of the parish. As
this person will have further connexion with the
matter of the legend, he shall be more familiarly
introduced in its pages.
The Reverend Meek Wolfe was, in spirit, a rare
combination of the humblest self-abasement and of
fierce spiritual denunciation. Like so many others
of his sacred calling in the Colony he inhabited, he
was not only the descendant of a line of priests, but
it was his greatest earthly hope that he should also
become the progenitor of a race in whom the
ministry
was to be perpetuated as severely as if the
regulated formula of the Mosaic dispensation were
still in existence. He had been educated in the
infant
college of Harvard, an institution that the
emigrants
from England had the wisdom and enterprise
to found, within the first five-and-twenty years of
their colonial residence. Here this scion of so pious
and orthodox a stock had abundantly qualified
himself
for the intellectual warfare of his future life,
by regarding one set of opinions so steadily, as to
leave little reason to apprehend he would ever
abandon
the most trifling of the outworks of his faith.
No citadel ever presented a more hopeless curtain
to the besieger, than did the mind of this zealot to
the efforts of conviction; for on the side of his
opponents
,
he contrived that every avenue should be
closed by a wall blank as indomitable obstinacy
could oppose. He appeared to think that all the
minor conditions of argument and reason had been
disposed of by his ancestors, and that it only
remained
for him to strengthen the many defences of his
subject, and, now and then, to scatter by a fierce
sortie the doctrinal skirmishers who might
occasionally
approach his parish. There was a remarkable
singleness of mind in this religionist, which, while it
in some measure rendered even his bigotry
respectable
,
greatly aided in clearing the knotty subject,
with which he dealt, of much embarrassing matter.
In his eyes, the strait and narrow path would hold
but few besides his own flock. He admitted some
fortuitous exceptions, in one or two of the nearest
parishes, with whose clergymen he was in the habit
of exchanging pulpits; and perhaps, and there,
in a saint of the other hemisphere, or of the more
distant towns of the Colonies, the brightness of whose
faith was something aided, in his eyes, by distance,
as this opake globe of ours is thought to appear a
ball of light to those who inhabit its satellite. In
short, there was an admixture of seeming charity
with an exclusiveness of hope, an unweariness of
exertion with a coolness of exterior, a disregard of
self with the most complaisant security, and an
uncomplaining
submission to temporal evils with the
loftiest spiritual pretensions, that in some measure
rendered him a man as difficult to comprehend as to
describe.
At an early hour in the forenoon, a little bell,
that was suspended in an awkward belfry perched
on the roof of the meeting-house, began to summon
the congregation to the place of worship. The call
was promptly obeyed, and ere the first notes had
reached the echoes of the hills, the wide and grassy
street was covered with family groups, all taking
the same direction. Foremost in each little party
walked the austere father, perhaps bearing on his
arm a suckled infant, or some child yet too young
to sustain its own weight; while at a decent
distance
followed the equally grave matron, casting
Vol. II. 7
oblique and severe glances at the little troop around
her, in whom acquired habits had yet some
conquests
to obtain over the lighter impulses of vanity.
Where there was no child to need support, or where
the mother chose to assume the office of bearing her
infant in person, the man was seen to carry one of
the heavy muskets of the day; and when his arms
were otherwise employed, the stoutest of his boys
served in the capacity of armor-bearer. But in no
instance was this needful precaution neglected, the
state of the Province and the character of the
enemy
requiring that vigilance should mingle even with
their devotions. There was no loitering on the path,
no light and worldly discourse by the way, nor even
any salutations, other than those grave and serious
recognitions by hat and eye, which usage tolerated
as the utmost limit of courtesy on the weekly
festival
.
When the bell changed its tone, Meek appeared
from the gate of the fortified house, where he
resided
,
in quality of castellan, on account of its public
character, its additional security, and the
circumstance
that his studious habits permitted him to
discharge
the trust with less waste of manual labor
than it would cost the village were the responsible
office confided to one of more active habits. His
consort followed, but at even a greater distance
than that taken by the wives of other men, as if she
felt the awful necessity of averting even the
remotest
possibility of scandal from one of so sacred
a profession. Nine offspring of various ages, and
one female assistant, of years too tender to be a
wife herself, composed the household of the divine;
and it was a proof of the salubrious air of the
valley
that all were present, since nothing but illness
was ever deemed a sufficient excuse for absence
from the common worship. As this little flock issued
from the palisadoes, a female, in whose pale cheek
the effects of recent illness might yet be traced, held
open the gate for the entrance of Reuben Ring, and
a stout youth, who bore the prolific consort of the
former, with her bounteous gift, into the citadel of
the village; a place of refuge that nothing but the
undaunted resolution of the woman prevented her
from occupying before, since more than half of the
children of the valley had first seen the light within
the security of its defences.
The family of Meek preceded him into the
temple
,
and when the feet of the minister himself crossed
its threshold, there was no human form visible
without
its walls. The bell ceased its monotonous and
mournful note, and the tall, gaunt form of the divine
moved through the narrow aisle to its usual post,
with the air of one who had already more than
half rejected the burthen of bodily encumbrance.
A searching and stern glance was thrown around,
as if he possessed an instinctive power to detect all
delinquents; and then seating himself, the deep
stillness, that always preceded the exercises, reigned
in the place.
When the divine next showed his austere
countenance
to his expecting people, its meaning was
expressive
rather of some matter of worldly import,
than of that absence of carnal interest with which
he usually strove to draw near to his Creator in
prayer.
Captain Content Heathcote, he said with grave
severity, after permitting a short pause to awaken
reverence, there has one ridden through this
valley
on the Lord's day, making thy habitation his
halting-place. Hath the traveller warranty for this
disrespect of the Sabbath, and canst thou find
sufficient
reason in his motive, for permitting the
stranger
within thy gates to neglect the solemn ordinance
delivered on the mount?
He rideth on especial commission, answered
Content, who had respectfully arisen, when thus
addressed by name; for matter of grave interest
to the well-being of the Colony is contained in the
subject of his errand.
There is nought more deeply connected with
the well-being of man, whether resident in this
Colony or in more lofty empires, than reverence to
God's declared will, returned Meek, but
half-appeased
by the apology. It would have been
expedient
for one, who, in common, not only setteth so
good an example himself, but who is also charged
with the mantle of authority, to have looked with
distrust into the pretences of a necessity that may
be only seeming.
The motive shall be declared to the people, at
a fitting moment; but it hath seemed more wise to
retain the substance of the horseman's errand, until
worship hath been offered, without the alloy of
temporal concerns.
Therein hast thou acted discreetly; for a
divided
mind giveth but little joy above. I hope there
is equal reason why all of thy household are not
with thee in the temple?
Notwithstanding the usual self-command of
Content
,
he did not revert to this subject without
emotion
.
Casting a subdued glance at the empty seat
where she whom he so much loved was wont to
worship at his side, he said, in a voice that
evidently
struggled to maintain its customary equanimity
There has been powerful interest awakened
beneath my roof this day; and it may be that the
duty of the Sabbath has been overlooked by minds
so exercised. If we have therein sinned, I hope
he that looketh kindly on the penitent will forgive!
She, of whom thou speakest, hath been shaken by
the violence of griefs renewed; though willing in
spirit, a feeble and sinking frame is not equal to
support the fatigue of appearing here, even though
it be the house of God.
This extraordinary exercise of pastoral authority
was uninterrupted, even by the breathings of the
congregation. Any incident of an unusual character
had attraction for the inhabitants of a village so
remote; but here was deep, domestic interest,
connected
with breach of usage and indeed of law
and all heightened by that secret influence that
leads us to listen, with singular satisfaction, to those
emotions in others, which it is believed to be
natural
to wish to conceal. Not a syllable that fell from
the lips of the divine, or of Content, not a deep
tone of severity in the former, nor a struggling
accent
of the latter, escaped the dullest ear in that
assembly. Notwithstanding the grave and regulated
air that was common to all, it is needless to say
there was pleasure in the little interruption of this
scene; which, however, was far from being
extraordinary
in a community where it was not only
believed
that spiritual authority might extend itself
to the most familiar practices, but where few
domestic
interests were deemed so exclusive, or
individual
feelings considered so sacred, that a very
large proportion of the whole neighborhood might
not claim a right to participate largely in both.
The Reverend Mr. Wolfe was appeased by the
explanation
,
and after allowing a sufficient time to
elapse, in order that the minds of the congregation
should recover their tone, he proceeded with the
regular services of the morning.
It is needless to recount the well-known manner
of the religious exercises of the Puritans. Enough
of their forms and of their substance has been
transmitted to us, to render both manner and
doctrine
familiar to most of our readers. We shall
therefore confine our duty to a relation of such
portions
of the ceremonies, if that which sedulously
7*
avoided every appearance of form can thus be
termed, as have an immediate connexion with the
incidents.
The divine had gone through the short opening
prayer, had read the passage of holy writ, had
given out the verses of the psalm, and had joined
in the strange nasal melody with which his flock
endeavored to render it doubly acceptable, and had
ended his long and fervent wrestling of the spirit in
a colloquial petition of some forty minutes' duration,
in which direct allusion had been made not only to
the subject of his recent examination, but to divers
other familiar interests of his parishioners; and all
without any departure from the usual zeal on his
own part, or of the customary attention and grave
decorum on that of his people. But when, for the
second time, he arose to read another song of
worship
and thanksgiving, a form was seen in the centre
or principal aisle, that, as well by its attire and
aspect
,
as by the unusual and irreverent tardiness of
its appearance, attracted general observation.
Interruptions
of this nature were unfrequent, and
even the long practised and abstracted minister
paused, for an instant, ere he proceeded with the
hymn, though there was a suspicion current among
the more instructed of his parishioners, that the
sonorous version was an effusion of his own muse.
The intruder was Whittal Ring. The witless
young man had strayed from the abode of his sister,
and found his way into that general receptacle,
where most of the village was congregated. During
his former residence in the valley, there had been
no temple; and the edifice, its interior arrangements,
the faces of those it contained, and the business on
which they had assembled, appeared alike strangers
to him. It was only when the people lifted up their
voices in the song of praise, that some glimmerings
of his ancient recollections were discoverable in his
inactive countenance. Then, indeed, he betrayed
a portion of the delight which powerful sounds can
quicken, even in beings of his unhappy mental
construction
.
As he was satisfied, however, to remain
in a retired part of the aisle, listening with dull
admiration, even the grave Ensign Dudley, whose
eye had once or twice seemed ominous of
displeasure
,
saw no necessity for interference.
Meek had chosen for his text, on that day, a
passage from the book of Judges: And the children
of Israel did evil in the sight of the Lord; and the
Lord delivered them into the hands of Midian seven
years. With this text the subtle-minded divine
dealt powerfully, entering largely into the
mysterious
and allegorical allusions then so much in
vogue. In whatever manner he viewed the subject,
he found reason to liken the suffering, bereaved and
yet chosen dwellers of the Colonies, to the race of
the Hebrews. If they were not set apart and marked
from all others of the earth, in order that one
mightier than man should spring from their loins,
they were led into that distant wilderness, far from
the temptations of licentious luxury, or the
worldly-mindedness
of those who built their structure of
faith on the sands of temporal honors, to preserve
the word in purity. As there appeared no reason
on the part of the divine himself to distrust this
construction of the words he had quoted, so it was
evident that most of his listeners willingly lent their
ears to so soothing an argument.
In reference to Midian, the preacher was far less
explicit. That the great father of evil was in some
way intended by this allusion, could not be doubted;
but in what manner the chosen inhabitants of those
regions were to feel his malign influence, was matter
of more uncertainty. At times, the greedy ears of
those who had long been wrought up into the
impression
that visible manifestations of the anger or
of the love of Providence were daily presented to
their eyes, were flattered with the stern joy of
believing that the war which then raged around
them was intended to put their moral armor to the
proof, and that out of the triumph of their victories
were to flow honor and security to the church.
Then came ambiguous qualifications, which left
it questionable whether a return of the invisible
powers, that had been known to be so busy in the
Provinces, were not the judgment intended. It is
not to be supposed that Meek himself had the
clearest mental intelligence on a point of this
subtlety
,
for there was something of misty
hallucination
in the manner in which he treated it, as will
be seen by his closing words.
To imagine that Azazel regardeth the
long-suffering
and stedfastness of a chosen people with
a pleasant eye, he said, is to believe that the
marrow of righteousness can exist in the carrion of
deceit. We have already seen his envious spirit
raging in many tragical instances. If required to
raise a warning beacon to your eyes, by which the
presence of this treacherous enemy might be known,
I should say, in the words of one learned and
ingenious
in this craftiness, that, `when a person,
having
full reason, doth knowingly and wittingly seek
and obtain of the Devil, or any other God besides
the true God Jehovah, an ability to do or know
strange things, which he cannot by his own human
abilities arrive unto,' that then he may distrust his
gifts and tremble for his soul. And, oh! my brethren,
how many of ye cling at this very moment to those
tragical delusions, and worship the things of the
world, instead of fattening on the famine of the
desert, which is the sustenance of them that would
live for ever! Lift your eyes upward, my
brethren
Rather turn them to the earth! interrupted a
deep, authoritative voice from the body of the
church; there is present need of all your faculties
to save life, and even to guard the tabernacle of the
Lord!
Religious exercises composed the recreation of
the dwellers in that distant settlement. When they
met in companies to lighten the load of life, prayer
and songs of praise were among the usual
indul-gences
of the entertainment. To them, a sermon
was like a gay scenic exhibition in other and vainer
communities, and none listened to the word with
cold and inattentive ears. In literal obedience to
the command of the preacher, and sympathizing
with his own action, every eye in the congregation
had been turned towards the naked rafters of the
roof, when the unknown tones of him who spoke
broke the momentary delusion. It is needless to say
that, by a common movement, they sought an
explanation
of this extraordinary appeal. The divine
became mute, equally with wonder and with
indignation
.
A first glance was enough to assure all present,
that new and important interests were likely to be
awakened. A stranger of grave aspect, and of a
calm but understanding eye, stood at the side of
Whittal Ring. His attire was of the simple guise
and homely materials of the country. Still he bore
about his person enough of the equipments of one
familiar with the wars of the eastern hemisphere,
to strike the senses. His hand was armed with a
shining broadsword, such as were then used by the
cavaliers of England, and at his back was slung the
short carabine of one who battled in the saddle.
His mien was dignified and even commanding, and
there was no second look necessary to show that he
was an intruder of a character altogether different
from the moping innocent at his side.
Why is one of an unknown countenance come
to disturb the worship of the temple? demanded
Meek, when astonishment permitted utterance.
Thrice hath this holy day been profaned by the
foot of the stranger, and well may it be doubted
whether we live not under an evil agency.
Arm, men of the Wish-Ton-Wish! arm, and to
your defences!
A cry arose without, that seemed to circle the
whole valley; and then a thousand whoops rolled
out of the arches of the forest, and appeared to
meet in one hostile din above the devoted hamlet.
These were sounds that had been too often heard,
or too often described, not to be generally understood.
A scene of wild confusion followed.
Each man, on entering the church, had deposited
his arms at the door, and thither most of the stout
borderers were now seen hastening, to resume their
weapons. Women gathered their children to their
sides, and the wails of horror and alarm were
beginning
to break through the restraints of habit.
Peace! exclaimed the pastor, seemingly
excited
to a degree above human emotion. Ere we
go forth, let there be a voice raised to our heavenly
Father. The asking shall be as a thousand men of
war battling in our behalf!
The commotion ceased as suddenly as if a
mandate
had been issued from that place to which their
petition was to be addressed. Even the stranger,
who had regarded the preparations with a stern but
anxious eye, bowed his head, and seemed to join in
the prayer, with a devoted and confiding heart.
Lord! said Meek, stretching his meagre arms,
with the palms of the hands open, high above the
heads of his flock, at thy bidding, we go forth;
with thy aid, the gates of hell shall not prevail
against us; with thy mercy, there is hope in heaven
and on earth. It is for thy tabernacle that we shed
blood; it is for thy word that we contend. Battle in
our behalf, King of Kings! send thy heavenly legions
to our succor, that the song of victory may be
incense
at thy altars, and a foul hearing to the ears
of the enemyAmen.
There was a depth in the voice of the speaker, a
supernatural calmness in the tones, and so great a
confidence in the support of the mighty ally
implored
,
that the words went to every heart. It was
impossible that Nature should not be powerful
within
,
but a high and exciting enthusiasm began to lift
the people far above its influence. Thus awakened
by an appeal to feelings that had never slumbered,
and stimulated by all the moving interests of life,
the men of the valley poured out of the temple in
defence of person and fire-side, and, as they
believed
,
of religion and of God.
There was pressing necessity, not only for this
zeal, but for all the physical energies of the stoutest
of their numbers. The spectacle that met the view,
on issuing into the open air, was one that might have
appalled the hearts of warriors more practised, and
have paralyzed the efforts of men less susceptible to
the impressions of a religious excitement.
Dark forms were leaping through the fields, on
the hill-sides; and all adown the slopes that
conducted
to the valley, armed savages were seen
pouring
madly forward, on their path of destruction and
vengeance. Behind them, the brand and the knife
had been already used; for the log tenement, the
stacks and the out-buildings of Reuben Ring, and
of several others who dwelt in the skirts of the
settlement
,
were sending forth clouds of murky smoke,
in which forked and angry flames were already
flashing fiercely. But danger most pressed still
nearer. A long line of fierce warriors was even in
the meadows; and in no direction could the eye be
turned, that it did not meet with the appalling proof
that the village was completely surrounded by an
overwhelming superiority of force.
To the garrison! shouted some of the foremost
of those who first saw the nature and imminency of
the danger, pressing forward themselves in the
direction
of the fortified house. To the garrison, or
we are lost!
Hold! exclaimed that voice which was so
strange to the ears of most of those who heard it,
but which spoke in a manner that by its compass
and firmness commanded obedience. With this
mad disorder, we are truly lost! Let Captain
Content
Heathcote come to my councils.
Notwithstanding the tumult and confusion which
had now in truth begun to rage fearfully around
him, the quiet and self-restrained individual to whom
the legal and perhaps moral right to command
belonged
,
had lost none of his customary composure.
It was plain, by the look of powerful amazement
with which he had at first regarded the stranger, on
his sudden interruption of the service, and by the
glances of secret intelligence and of recognition
they exchanged, that they had met before. But
this was no time for greetings or explanations, nor
was that a scene in which to waste the precious
moments in useless contests about opinions.
I am here, said he who was thus called for;
ready to lead whither thy prudence and
experience
shall point the way.
Speak to the people, and separate the
combatants
in three bodies of equal strength. One shall
press forward to the meadows, and beat back the
savage, ere he encircle the palisadoed house; the
second shall proceed with the feeble and tender, in
their flight to its covers; and with the thirdbut
thou knowest that which I would do with the third.
Hasten, or we lose all by tardiness.
It was perhaps fortunate that orders so necessary
and so urgent were given to one little accustomed
to superfluity of speech. Without offering either
commendation or dissent, Content obeyed.
Accustomed
to his authority, and conscious of the critical
situation of all that was dear, the men of the village
yielded an obedience more prompt and effective
than it is usual to meet in soldiers who are not
familiar
with habits of discipline. The fighting men
were quickly separated in three bodies, consisting
of rather more than a score of combatants in each.
One, commanded by Eben Dudley, advanced at
quick time towards the meadows in the rear of the
fortress, that the whooping body of savages, who
were already threatening to cut off the retreat of
the women and children, should be checked; while
another departed in a nearly opposite direction,
taking the street of the hamlet, for the purpose of
meeting those who advanced by the southern
entrance
of the valley. The third and last of these
small but devoted bodies, remained stationary, in
attendance for more definite orders.
At the moment when the first of these little
divisions
of force was ready to move, the divine
appeared
in its front, with an air in which spiritual
reliance on the purposes of Providence, and some
show of temporal determination, were singularly
united. In one hand he bore a Bible, which he
raised on high as the sacred standard of his
followers
,
and in the other he brandished a short
broadsword
,
in a manner that proved there might be
danger in encountering its blade. The volume was
open, and at brief intervals the divine read, in a
high and excited voice, such passages as accidentally
met his eye, the leaves blowing about in a manner
to produce a rather remarkable admixture of
doctrine
and sentiment. But to these trifling moral
incongruities
,
both the pastor and his parishioners
were alike indifferent; their subtle mental
exercises
Vol. II. 8
having given birth to a tendency of aptly
reconciling
all seeming discrepancies, as well as of
accommodating
the most abstruse doctrines to the more
familiar interests of life.
Israel and the Philistines had put their battle
in array, army against army, commenced Meek, as
the troop he led began its advance. Then, reading
at short intervals, he continued, Behold, I will do
a thing in Israel, at which both the ears of every
one that heareth it shall tingle.Oh house of
Aaron, trust in the Lord; he is thy help and thy
shield. Deliver me, O Lord, from the evil man;
preserve me from the violent man.Let burning
coals fall upon them; let them be cast into the fire;
into deep pits, that they rise not again.Let the
wicked fall into their own nets, whilst that I, withal,
escape.Therefore doth my father love me,
because
I lay down my life, that I may take it again.
He that hateth me, hateth my father also.
Father, forgive them, for they know not what they
do.They have heard that it hath been said, an
eye for an eye, and a tooth for a tooth.For
Joshua drew not his hand back, wherewith he
stretched out the spear, until he had utterly
destroyed
all the inhabitants of Ai Thus far the
words of Meek were intelligible to those who
remained
,
but distance soon confounded the syllables.
Then nought was audible but the yells of the
enemy
,
the tramp of the men who pressed in the rear
of the priest, with a display of military pomp as
formidable as their limited means would allow, and
those clear high tones, which sounded in the ears
and quickened the blood at the hearts of his
followers
,
as though they had been trumpet-blasts. In a
few more minutes the little band was scattered
behind
the covers of the fields, and the rattling of
fire-arms
succeeded to the quaint and characteristic
manner of their march.
While this movement was made in front, the
party ordered to cover the village was not idle.
Commanded by a sturdy yeoman, who filled the
office of Lieutenant, it advanced with less of
religious
display, but with equal activity, in the
direction
of the South; and the sounds of contention
were quickly heard, proclaiming both the urgency
of the measure and the warmth of the conflict.
In the mean time, equal decision, though
tempered
by some circumstances of deep personal interest,
was displayed by those who had been left in front
of the church. As soon as the band of Meek had
got to such a distance as to promise security to
those who followed, the stranger commanded the
children to be led towards the fortified house. This
duty was performed by the trembling mothers,
who had been persuaded, with difficulty, to defer
it until cooler heads should pronounce that the
proper moment had come. A few of the women
dispersed among the dwellings in quest of the infirm,
while all the boys of proper age were actively
employed
in transporting indispensable articles from
the village, within the palisadoes. As these several
movements were simultaneous, but a very few
minutes elapsed between the time when the orders
were issued and the moment when they were
accomplished
.
I had intended that thou shouldst have had the
charge in the meadows, said the stranger to
Content
,
when nought remained to be performed, but
that which had been reserved for the last of the
three little bands of fighting men. But as the
work proceedeth bravely in that quarter, we will
move in company. Why doth this maiden tarry?
Truly I know not, unless it may be of fear
There is an opening for thy passage into the fort,
Martha, with others of thy sex.
I will follow the fighters that are about to
march to the rescue of them that remain in our
habitation, said the girl, in a low but steady voice.
And how know'st thou that such is the service
intended for those here arrayed? demanded the
stranger, with a little show of displeasure that his
military purposes should have been anticipated.
I see it in the countenances of them that tarry,
returned the other, gazing furtively towards Mark,
who, posted in the little line, could with difficulty
brook a delay which threatened his father's house,
and those whom it held, with so much jeopardy.
Forward! cried the stranger. Here is no
leisure for dispute. Let the maiden take wisdom,
and hasten to the fort. Follow, men stout of heart!
or we come too late to the succor.
Martha waited until the party had advanced a
few paces, and then, instead of obeying the
repeated
mandate to consult her personal safety, she took
the direction of the armed band.
I fear me that 'twill exceed our strength,
observed
the stranger, who marched in front at the
side of Content, to make good the dwelling, at so
great distance from further aid.
And yet the visitation will be heavy, that shall
drive us for a second time to the fields for a
resting-place
.
In what manner didst get warning of this
inroad?
The savages believed themselves concealed in
the cunning place, where thou know'st that my
eye had opportunity to overlook their artifices.
There is a Providence in our least seeming
calculations
:
an imprisonment of weary years hath its
reward in this warning!
Content appeared to acquiesce, but the situation
of affairs prevented the discourse from becoming
more minute.
As they approached the dwelling of the
Health-cotes
,
better opportunity of observing the condition
of things, in and around the house, was of course
obtained. The position of the building would have
rendered any attempt, on the part of those in it,
to gain the fort ere the arrival of assistance,
desperately
hazardous, since the meadows that lay
between them were already alive with the
ferocious
warriors of the enemy. But it was evident
that the Puritan, whose infirmities kept him within
doors, entertained no such design; for it was shortly
apparent that those within were closing and
barring
the windows of the habitation, and that other
provisions for defence were in the course of active
preparation. The feelings of Content, who knew
that the house contained only his wife and father,
with one female assistant, were excited to agony,
as the party he commanded drew near on one side,
at a distance about equal to that of a band of the
enemy, who were advancing diagonally from the
woods, on the other. He saw the efforts of those
so dear to him, as they had recourse to the means
of security provided to repel the very danger which
now threatened; and, to his eyes, it appeared that
the trembling hands of Ruth had lost their power,
when haste and confusion more than once defeated
the object of her exertions.
We must break and charge, or the savage will
be too speedy! he said, in tones that grew thick
from breathing quicker than was wont for one of
his calm temperament. See! they enter the
orchard
!
in another minute, they will be masters of
the dwelling!
But his companion marched with a firmer step,
and looked with a cooler eye. There was, in his
gaze, the understanding of a man practised in scenes
of sudden danger, and in his mien the authority of
one accustomed to command.
Fear not, he answered; the art of old Mark
Heathcote hath departed from him, or he still
8 *
knoweth how to make good his citadel against a
first onset. If we quit our order, the superiority of
concert will be lost, and being few in numbers,
defeat
will be certain; but with this front, and a
fitting
steadiness, our march may not be repulsed. To
thee, Captain Content Heathcote, it need not be
told, that he who now counsels hath seen the strife
of savages ere this hour.
I know it wellbut dost not see my Ruth,
laboring
at the ill-fitted shutter of the chamber? The
woman will be slain, in her heedlessnessfor, hark!
there beginneth the volley of the enemy!
No, 'tis he who led my troop in a far different
warfare! exclaimed the stranger, whose form grew
more erect, and whose thoughtful and
deeply-furrowed
features assumed something like the stern
pleasure which kindles in the soldier as the sounds
of contention increase. 'Tis old Mark Heathcote,
true to his breeding and his name! he hath let off
the culverin upon the knaves! behold, they are
already disposed to abandon one who speaketh so
boldly, and are breaking through the fences to the
left, that we may taste something of their quality.
Now, bold Englishmen, strong of hand and stout of
heart, you have training in your duty, and you shall
not be wanting in example. You have wives and
children at hand, looking at your deeds; and there
is one above, that taketh note of the manner in
which you serve in his cause. Here is an opening
for your skill; scourge the cannibals with the hand
of death! On, on to the onset, and to victory!
CHAPTER VI.
Hect
. Is this Achilles?
Achil
. I am Achilles.
Hect
. Stand fair, I pray thee; let me look on thee.
Troilus
AND
Cressida
.
It
may now be necessary to take a rapid glance
at the situation of the whole combat, which had
begun to thicken in different parts of the valley.
The party led by Dudley, and exhorted by Meek,
had broken its order on reaching the meadows
behind
the fort, and, seeking the covers of the stumps
and fences, it had thrown in its fire, with good
effect
,
on the irregular band that pressed into the
fields. This decision quickly caused a change in
the manner of the advance. The Indians took to
covers, in their turn, and the struggle assumed that
desultory but dangerous character, in which the
steadiness and resources of the individual are put
to the severest trial. Success appeared to vacillate;
the white men at one time widening the distance
between them and their friends in the dwelling,
and, at another, falling back as if disposed to seek
the shelter of the palisadoes. Although numbers
were greatly in favor of the Indians, weapons and
skill supported the cause of their adversaries. It
was the evident wish of the former to break in
upon the little band that opposed their progress to
the village, in and about which they saw that scene
of hurried exertion which has already been
described
a
spectacle but little likely to cool the
furious
ardor of an Indian onset. But the wary
manner
in which Dudley conducted his battle, rendered
this an experiment of exceeding hazard.
However heavy of intellect the Ensign might
appear on other occasions, the present was one
every way adapted to draw out his best and most
manly qualities. Of large and powerful stature, he
felt, in moments of strife, a degree of confidence
in himself, that was commensurate with the amount
of physical force he wielded. To this hardy
assurance
was to be added no trifling portion of the sort
of enthusiasm that can be awakened in the most
sluggish bosoms, and which, like the anger of an
even-tempered man, is only the more formidable
from the usually quiet habits of the individual.
Nor was this the first, by many, of Ensign Dudley's
warlike deeds. Besides the desperate affair already
related in these pages, he had been engaged in
divers hostile expeditions against the aborigines,
and on all occasions had he shown a cool head and
a resolute mind.
There was pressing necessity for both these
essential
qualities, in the situation in which the
Ensign
now found himself. By properly extending his
little force, and yet keeping it at the same time
perfectly within supporting distance, by emulating
the caution of his foes in consulting the covers, and
by reserving a portion of his fire throughout the
broken and yet well-ordered line, the savages were
finally beaten back, from stump to stump, from
hillock to hillock, and fence to fence, until they had
fairly entered the margin of the forest. Further,
the experienced eye of the borderer saw he could
not follow. Many of his men were bleeding, and
growing weaker as their wounds still flowed. The
protection of the trees gave the enemy too great
an advantage for their position to be forced, and
destruction would have been the inevitable
consequence
of the close struggle which must have
followed
a charge. In this stage of the combat, Dudley
began to cast anxious and inquiring looks behind
him. He saw that support was not to be expected,
and he also saw, with regret, that many of the
women and children were still busy, transporting
necessaries from the village into the fort. Falling
back to a better line of covers, and to a distance
that materially lessened the danger of the arrows,
the weapons used by quite two-thirds of his enemies,
he awaited, in sullen silence, the proper moment to
effect a further retreat.
It was while the party of Dudley stood thus at
bay, that a fierce yell rung in the arches of the
forest. It was an exclamation of pleasure, uttered in
the wild manner of those people; as if the tenants
of the woods were animated by some sudden and
general impulse of joy. The crouching yeomen
regarded
each other in uneasiness, but seeing no sign
of wavering in the steady mien of their leader,
each man kept close, awaiting some further
exhibition
of the devices of their foes. Ere another minute
had passed, two warriors appeared at the margin
of the wood, where they stood apparently in
contemplation
of the different scenes that were acting
in various parts of the valley. More than one
musket
was levelled with intent to injure them, but a
sign from Dudley prevented attempts that would
most probably have been frustrated by the
never-slumbering
vigilance of a North American Indian.
There was however something in the air and port
of these two individuals, that had its share in
producing
the forbearance of Dudley. They were
evidently both chiefs, and of far more than usual
estimation. As was common with the military
leaders
of the Indians, they were men also of large and
commanding stature. Viewed at the distance from
which they were seen, one seemed a warrior who
had reached the meridian of his days, while the
other had the lighter step and more flexible
movement
of a much briefer existence. Both were well
armed, and, as was usual with people of their origin
on the war-path, they were clad only in the
customary
scanty covering of waist-cloths and leggings.
The former, however, were of scarlet, and the
latter
were rich in the fringes and bright colors of
Indian
ornaments. The elder of the two wore a gay
belt of wampum around his head, in the form of a
turban; but the younger appeared with a shaven
crown, on which nothing but the customary
chivalrous
scalp-lock was visible.
The consultation, like most of the incidents that
have been just related, occupied but a very few
minutes. The eldest of the chiefs issued some
orders
.
The mind of Dudley was anxiously
endeavoring
to anticipate their nature, when the two
disappeared
together. The Ensign would now have
been left entirely to vague conjectures, had not the
rapid execution of the mandates that had been
issued
to the youngest of the Indians, soon left him
in no doubt of their intentions. Another loud and
general shout drew his attention towards the right;
and when he had endeavored to strengthen his
position
by calling three or four of the best marksmen
to that end of his little line, the youngest of the
chiefs was seen bounding across the meadow,
leading
a train of whooping followers to the covers that
commanded its opposite extremity. In short, the
position of Dudley was completely turned; and the
stumps and angles of the fences, which secreted his
men, were likely to become of no further use. The
emergency demanded decision. Collecting his
yeomen
,
ere the enemy had time to profit by his
advantage
,
the Ensign ordered a rapid retreat towards
the fort. In this movement he was favored by the
formation of the ground, a circumstance that had
been well considered on the advance; and in a very
few minutes, the party found itself safely posted
under the protection of a scattering fire from the
palisadoes, which immediately checked the pursuit
of the whooping and exulting foe. The wounded
men, after a stern or rather sullen halt, that was
intended to exhibit the unconquerable
determination
of the whites, withdrew into the works for
succor, leaving the command of Dudley reduced by
nearly one-half of its numbers. With this
diminished
force, however, he promptly turned his
attention
towards the assistance of those who combated
at the opposite extremity of the village.
Allusion has already been made to the manner in
which the houses of a new settlement were
clustered
near each other, at the commencement of the
colonial establishments. In addition to the more
obvious and sufficient motive, which has given rise
to the same inconvenient and unpicturesque
manner
of building, over nine-tenths of the continent
of Europe, there had been found a religious
inducement
for the inconvenient custom. One of the
enactments
of the Puritans said, that no man shall
set his dwelling-house, above the distance of
half-a-mile
,
or a mile at farthest, from the meeting of the
congregation where the church doth usually
assemble
for the worship of God. The support of the
worship of God, in church fellowship, was the
reason
alleged for this arbitrary provision of the law;
but it is quite probable that support against danger
of a more temporal character was another motive.
There were those within the fort who believed the
smoking piles that were to be seen, here and there
in the clearings on the hills, owed their destruction
to a disregard of that protection which was thought
to be yielded to those who leaned with the greates
confidence, even in the forms of earthly transactions
on the sustaining power of an all-seeing and
all-directing
Providence. Among this number was
Reuben
Ring, who submitted to the loss of his
habitation
,
as to a merited punishment for the
light-mindedness
that had tempted him to erect a dwelling at
the utmost limits of the prescribed distance.
As the party of Dudley retreated, that sturdy
yeoman stood at a window of the chamber in which
his prolific partner with her recent gift were safely
lodged, for in that moment of confusion, the
husband
was compelled to discharge the double duty
of sentinel and nurse. He had just fired his piece,
and he had reason to think with success, on the
enemies that pressed too closely on the retiring
party
,
and as he reloaded the gun, he turned a
melancholy
eye on the pile of smoking embers, that now
lay where his humble but comfortable habitation
had so lately stood.
I fear me, Abundance, he said, shaking his
head with a sigh, that there was error in the
measurement
between the meeting and the clearing.
Some misgivings of the lawfulness of stretching
the chain across the hollows, came over me at the
time; but the pleasant knoll, where the dwelling
stood, was so healthful and commodious, that, if it
were a sin, I hope it is one that is forgiven! There
doth not seem so much as the meanest of its logs,
that is not now melted into white ashes by the fire!
Raise me, husband, returned the wife, in the
weak voice natural to her feeble situation; raise
me with thine arm, that I may look upon the place
where my babes first saw the light.
Her request was granted, and, for a minute, the
woman gazed in mute grief at the destruction of
her comfortable home. Then, as a fresh yell from
the foe rose on the air without, she trembled, and
turned with a mother's care towards the unconscious
beings that slumbered at her side.
Thy brother hath been driven by the heathen
to the foot of the palisadoes, observed the other,
after regarding his companion with manly kindness
for a moment, and he hath lessened his force by
many that are wounded.
A short but eloquent pause succeeded. The
woman
turned her tearful face upwards, and
stretching
out a bloodless hand, she answered
I know what thou wouldst doit is not meet
that Sergeant Ring should be a woman-tender, when
the Indian enemy is in his neighbor's fields! Go to
thy duty, and that which is to be done, do manfully!
and yet would I have thee remember how many
there are who lean upon thy life for a father's
care.
The yeoman first cast a cautious look around
him, for this the decent and stern usages of the
Puritans
exacted, and perceiving that the girl who
occasionally
entered to tend the sick was not present,
he stooped, and impressing his lips on the cheek of
his wife, he threw a yearning look at his offspring,
shouldered his musket, and descended to the court.
When Reuben Ring joined the party of Dudley,
the latter had just issued an order to march to the
support of those who still stoutly defended the
southern entrance of the village. The labor of
securing
necessaries was not yet ended, and it was on
every account an object of the last importance to
make good the hamlet against the enemy. The
task, however, was not as difficult as the force of
the Indians might, at first, have given reason to
believe
.
The conflict, by this time, had extended to
the party which was headed by Content, and, in
consequence, the Indians were compelled to contend
with a divided force. The buildings themselves,
with the fences and out-houses, were so many
breast-works
,
and it was plain that the assailants acted
with a caution and concert, that betrayed the
direction
of some mind more highly gifted than those
which ordinarily fall to the lot of uncivilized men.
The task of Dudley was not so difficult as before,
Vol. II. 9
since the enemy ceased to press upon his march,
preferring to watch the movements of those who
held the fortified house, of whose numbers they
were ignorant, and of whose attacks they were
evidently
jealous. As soon as the reinforcement
reached
the Lieutenant who defended the village, he
commanded the charge, and his men advanced with
shouts and clamor, some singing spiritual songs,
others lifting up their voice in prayer, while a few
availed themselves of the downright and perhaps
equally effective means of raising sounds as
fearful
as possible. The whole being backed by spirited
and well-directed discharges of musketry, the effort
was successful. In a few minutes the enemy fled,
leaving that side of the valley momentarily free
from danger.
Pursuit would have been folly. After posting a
few look-outs in secret and safe positions among the
houses, the whole party returned, with an intention
of cutting off the enemy who still held the
meadows
near the garrison. In this design, however,
their intentions were frustrated. The instant they
were pressed, the Indians gave way, evidently for
the purpose of gaining the protection of the woods;
and when the whites returned to their works, they
were followed in a manner to show that they could
make no further movement without the hazard of
a serious assault. In this condition, the men in and
about the fort were compelled to be inefficient
spectators of the scene that was taking place
around the Heathcote-house, as the dwelling of
old Mark was commonly called.
The fortified building had been erected for the
protection of the village and its inhabitants, an
object
that its position rendered feasible; but it could
offer no aid to those who dwelt without the range of
musketry. The only piece of artillery belonging to
the settlement, was the culverin which had been
discharged
by the Puritan, and which served for the
moment to check the advance of his enemies. But
the exclamations of the stranger, and the appeal
to his men, with which the last chapter closed,
sufficiently proclaimed that the attack was diverted
from the house, and that work of a bloody
character
now offered itself to those he and his
companion
led.
The ground around the dwelling of the
Heathcotes
admitted of closer and more deadly conflict
than that on which the other portions of the
combat
had occurred. Time had given size to the
orchards, and wealth had multiplied and rendered
more secure the inclosures and out-buildings. It
was in one of the former that the hostile parties
met, and came to that issue which the warlike
stranger had foreseen.
Content, like Dudley, caused his men to separate,
and they threw in their fire with the same guarded
reservation that had been practised by the other
party. Success again attended the efforts of
discipline
;
the whites gradually beating back their
enemies
,
until there was a probability of forcing them
entirely into the open ground in their rear, a
success
that would have been tantamount to a victory.
But at this flattering moment, yells were heard
behind
the leaping and whooping band, that was still
seen gliding through the openings of the smoke,
resembling
so many dark and malignant spectres
acting their evil rites. Then, as a chief with a
turbaned
head, terrific voice, and commanding stature,
appeared in their front, the whole of the wavering
line received an onward impulse. The yells
redoubled
;
another warrior was seen brandishing a
tomahawk on one flank, and the whole of the deep
phalanx came rushing in upon the whites,
threatening
to sweep them away, as the outbreaking
torrent carries desolation in its course.
Men, to your square! shouted the stranger,
disregarding cover and life, together, in such a
pressing emergency; to your square, Christians,
and be firm!
The command was repeated by Content, and echoed
from mouth to mouth. But before those on the flanks
could reach the centre, the shock had come. All
order being lost, the combat was hand to hand,
one party fighting fiercely for victory, and the other
knowing that they stood at the awful peril of their
lives. After the first discharge of the musket and
the twang of the bow, the struggle was maintained
with knife and axe; the thrust of the former, or the
descent of the keen and glittering tomahawk, being
answered by sweeping and crushing blows of the
musket's but, or by throttling grasps of hands that
were clenched in the death-gripe. Men fell on each
other in piles, and when the conqueror rose to shake
off the bodies of those who gasped at his feet, his
frowning eye rested alike on friend and enemy. The
orchard rang with the yells of the Indians, but the
Colonists fought in mute despair. Sullen resolution
only gave way with life; and it happened more than
once, that fearful day, that the usual reeking token
of an Indian triumph was swung before the stern
and still conscious eyes of the mangled victim from
whose head it had been torn.
In this frightful scene of slaughter and ferocity,
the principal personages of our legend were not idle.
By a tacit but intelligent understanding, the stranger
with Content and his son placed themselves back to
back, and struggled manfully against their luckless
fortune. The former showed himself no soldier of
parade; for, knowing the uselessness of orders when
each one fought for life, he dealt out powerful blows
in silence. His example was nobly emulated by
Content
;
and young Mark moved limb and muscle with
the vigorous activity of his age. A first onset of the
enemy was repelled, and for a moment there was a
faint prospect of escape. At the suggestion of the
stranger, the three moved, in their order, towards
the dwelling, with the intention of trusting to their
personal activity when released from the throng.
But at this luckless instant, when hope was
beginning
to assume the air of probability, a chief came
stalking through the horrible mle, seeking on each
side some victim for his uplifted axe. A crowd of
the inferior herd pressed at his heels, and a first
glance told the assailed that the decisive moment
had come.
At the sight of so many of their hated enemies
still living, and capable of suffering, a common and
triumphant shout burst from the lips of the Indians.
Their leader, like one superior to the more vulgar
emotions of his followers, alone approached in silence.
As the band opened and divided to encircle the
victims
,
chance brought him, face to face, with Mark.
Like his foe, the Indian warrior was still in the
freshness
and vigor of young manhood. In stature, years,
and agility, the antagonists seemed equal; and, as
the followers of the chief threw themselves on the
stranger and Content, like men who knew their
leader
needed no aid, there was every appearance of a
fierce and doubtful struggle. But, while neither of
the combatants showed any desire to avoid the
contest
,
neither was in haste to give the commencing
blow. A painter, or rather sculptor, would have
seized the attitudes of these young combatants for
a rich exhibition of the power of his art.
Mark, like most of his friends, had cast aside all
superfluous vestments ere he approached the scene
of strife. The upper part of his body was naked to
the shirt, and even this had been torn asunder by
the rude encounters through which he had already
passed. The whole of his full and heaving chest was
bare, exposing the white skin and blue veins of one
9 *
whose fathers had come from towards the rising
sun. His swelling form rested on a leg that seemed
planted in defiance, while the other was thrown in
front, like a lever, to control the expected
movements
.
His arms were extended to the rear, the
hands grasping the barrel of a musket, which
threatened
death to all who should come within its sweep.
The head, covered with the short, curling, yellow
hair of his Saxon lineage, was a little advanced
above the left shoulder, and seemed placed in a
manner to preserve the equipoise of the whole frame.
The brow was flushed, the lips compressed and
resolute
,
the veins of the neck and temples swollen nearly
to bursting, and the eyes contracted, but of a gaze
that bespoke equally the feelings of desperate
determination
and of entranced surprise.
On the other hand, the Indian warrior was a man
still more likely to be remarked. The habits of his
people had brought him, as usual, into the field, with
naked limbs and nearly uncovered body. The
position
of his frame was that of one prepared to leap;
and it would have been a comparison tolerated by
the license of poetry, to have likened his straight
and agile form to the semblance of a crouching
panther. The projecting leg sustained the body,
bending
under its load more with the free play of muscle
and sinew than from any weight, while the slightly
stooping head was a little advanced beyond the
perpendicular
.
One hand was clenched on the helve
of an axe, that lay in a line with the right thigh,
while the other was placed, with a firm gripe, on the
buck-horn handle of a knife, that was still sheathed
at his girdle. The expression of the face was earnest,
severe, and perhaps a little fierce, and yet the whole
was tempered by the immovable and dignified calm
of a chief of high qualities. The eye, however, was
gazing and riveted; and, like that of the youth
whose life he threatened, it appeared singularly
contracted with wonder.
The momentary pause that succeeded the
movement
by which the two antagonists threw
themselves
into these fine attitudes, was full of meaning.
Neither spoke, neither permitted play of muscle,
neither even seemed to breathe. The delay was
not like that of preparation, for each stood ready
for his deadly effort, nor would it have been possible
to trace in the compressed energy of the
countenance
of Mark, or in the lofty and more practised
bearing of the front and eye of the Indian, any
thing like wavering of purpose. An emotion foreign
to the scene appeared to possess them both, each
active frame unconsciously accommodating itself
to the bloody business of the hour, while the
inscrutable
agency of the mind held them, for a brief
interval, in check.
A yell of death from the mouth of a savage who
was beaten to the very feet of his chief by a blow
of the stranger, and an encouraging shout from the
lips of the latter, broke the short trance. The
knees of the chief bent still lower, the head of the
tomahawk was a little raised, the blade of the knife
was seen glittering from its sheath, and the but
of Mark's musket had receded to the utmost tension
of his sinews, when a shriek and a yell, different
from any before heard that day, sounded near. At
the same moment, the blows of both the combatants
were suspended, though by the agency of very
different degrees of force. Mark felt the arms of
one cast around his limbs, with a power sufficient
to embarrass, though not to subdue him, while the
well-known voice of Whittal Ring sounded in his
ears
Murder the lying and hungry Pale-faces! They
leave us no food but airno drink but water!
On the other hand, when the chief turned in
anger, to strike the daring one who presumed to
arrest his arm, he saw at his feet the kneeling figure,
the uplifted hands, and agonized features, of Martha.
Averting the blow that a follower already aimed
at the life of the suppliant, he spoke rapidly in his
own language, and pointed to the struggling Mark.
The nearest Indians cast themselves on the already
half-captured youth. A whoop brought a hundred
more to the spot, and then a calm as sudden, and
almost as fearful, as the previous tumult, prevailed
in the orchard. It was succeeded by the long-drawn,
frightful, and yet meaning yell by which the
American warrior proclaims his victory.
With the end of the tumult in the orchard, the
sounds of strife ceased in all the valley. Though
conscious of the success of their enemies, the men
in the fort saw the certainty of destruction, not only
to themselves, but to those feeble ones whom they
should be compelled to leave without a sufficient
defence, were they to attempt a sortie to that
distance from their works. They were therefore
compelled to remain passive and grave spectators
of an evil they had not the means to avert.
CHAPTER VII.
Were such things here, as we do speak about?
Or have we eaten of the insane root
That takes the reason prisoner?
Macbeth
.
An
hour later presented a different scene. Bands
of the enemy, that in civilized warfare would be
called parties of observation, lingered in the skirts
of the forest nearest to the village; and the settlers
still stood to their arms, posted among the buildings,
or maintaining their array at the foot of the
palisadoes
.
Though the toil of securing the valuables
continued, it was evident that, as the first terrors
of alarm had disappeared, the owners of the hamlet
began to regain some assurance in their ability to
make it good against their enemies. Even the
women were now seen moving through its grassy
street with greater seeming confidence, and there
was a regularity in the air of the armed men, which
denoted a determination that was calculated to
impose on their wild and undisciplined assailants.
But the dwelling, the out-buildings, and all the
implements of domestic comfort, which had so lately
contributed to the ease of the Heathcotes, were
completely in the possession of the Indians. The
open shutters and doors, the scattered and
half-destroyed
furniture, the air of devastation and waste,
and the general abandonment of all interest in the
protection of the property, proclaimed the
licentious
disorder of a successful assault. Still the work
of destruction and plunder did not go on. Although
here and there might be seen some warrior,
decorated
,
according to the humors of his savage taste,
with the personal effects of the former inmates of
the building, every hand had been checked, and
the furious tempers of the conquerors had been
quieted, seemingly by the agency of some unseen
and extraordinary authority. The men, who so
lately had been moved by the fiercest passions of
our nature, were suddenly restrained if not
appeased
;
and, instead of that exulting indulgence of
vengeance which commonly accompanies an Indian
triumph, the warriors stalked about the buildings
and through the adjacent grounds, in a silence which,
though gloomy and sullen, was marked by their
characteristic submission to events.
The principal leaders of the inroad, and all the
surviving sufferers by the defeat, were assembled
in the piazza of the dwelling. Ruth, pale,
sorrowing
,
and mourning for others rather than for
herself
,
stood a little apart, attended by Martha and
the young assistant, whose luckless fortune it was to
be found at her post, on this eventful day. Content,
the stranger, and Mark, were near, subdued and
bound, the sole survivors of all that band they had
so recently led into the conflict. The gray hairs
and bodily infirmities of the Puritan spared him the
same degradation. The only other being present,
of European origin, was Whittal Ring. The
innocent
stalked slowly among the prisoners, sometimes
permitting ancient recollections and sympathies to
come over his dull intellect, but oftener taunting
the unfortunate with the injustice of their race,
and with the wrongs of his adopted people.
The chiefs of the successful party stood in the
centre, apparently engaged in some grave
deliberation
.
As they were few in number, it was evident
that the council only included men of the highest
importance. Chiefs of inferior rank, but of great
names in the limited renown of those simple tribes,
conversed in knots among the trees, or paced the
court at a respectful distance from the consultation
of their superiors.
The least practised eye could not mistake the
person of him on whom the greatest weight of
authority
had fallen. The turbaned warrior, already
introduced in these pages, occupied the centre of
the group, in the calm and dignified attitude of an
Indian who hearkens to or who utters advice. His
musket was borne by one who stood in waiting,
while the knife and axe were returned to his girdle.
He had thrown a light blanket, or it might be better
termed a robe of scarlet cloth, over his left
shoulder
,
whence it gracefully fell in folds, leaving the
whole of the right arm free, and most of his ample
chest exposed to view. From beneath this mantle,
blood fell slowly in drops, dying the floor on which
he stood. The countenance of this warrior was
grave, though there was a quickness in the
movements
of an ever-restless eye, that denoted great
mental activity, no less than the disquiet of
suspicion
.
One skilled in physiognomy might too have
thought, that a shade of suppressed discontent was
struggling with the self-command of habits that
had become part of the nature of the individual.
The two companions nearest this chief were, like
himself, men past the middle age, and of mien and
expression that were similar, though less strikingly
marked; neither showing those signs of displeasure,
which occasionally shot from organs that, in spite
of a mind so trained and so despotic, could not
always restrain their glittering brightness. One
was speaking, and by his glance, it was evident
that the subject of his discourse was the fourth and
last of their number, who had placed himself in a
position that prevented his being an auditor of what
was said.
In the person of the latter chief, the reader will
recognise the youth who had confronted Mark, and
whose rapid movement on the flank of Dudley had
first driven the Colonists from the meadows. The
eloquent expression of limb, the tension of sinews,
and the compression of muscles, as last exhibited,
were now gone. They had given place to the
peculiar repose that distinguishes the Indian
warrior
in his moments of inaction, quite as much as it
marks the manner of one schooled in the forms of
more polished life. With one hand he leaned lightly
on a musket, while from the wrist of the other,
which hung loose at his side, depended, by a thong
of deer's sinew, a tomahawk from which fell drops
of human blood. His person bore no other
covering
than that in which he had fought, and, unlike
his more aged companion in authority, his body had
escaped without a wound.
In form and in features, this young warrior might
be deemed a model of the excellence of Indian
manhood. The limbs were full, round, faultlessly
straight, and distinguished by an appearance of
extreme
activity, without being equally remarkable
for muscle. In the latter particular, in the upright
attitude, and in the distant and noble gaze which so
often elevated his front, there was a close affinity to
the statue of the Pythian Apollo; while in the full,
though slightly effeminate chest, there was an equal
resemblance to that look of animal indulgence, which
is to be traced in the severe representations of
Bacchus
.
This resemblance however to a Deity that is
little apt to awaken lofty sentiments in the
spectator
,
was not displeasing, since it in some measure
relieved the sternness of an eye that penetrated
like the glance of the eagle, and that might
otherwise
have left an impression of too little sympathy
with the familiar weaknesses of humanity. Still
the young chief was less to be remarked by this
peculiar fullness of chest, the fruit of intervals of
inaction, constant indulgence of the first wants of
nature, and a total exemption from toil, than most
of those, who either counselled in secret near, or
paced the grounds about the building. In him, it
was rather a point to be admired, than a blemish;
for it seemed to say, that notwithstanding the
evidences
of austerity which custom, and perhaps
character
,
as well as rank, had gathered in his air, there
was a heart beneath that might be touched by the
charities of humanity. On the present occasion, the
glances of his roving eye, though searching and full
of meaning, were evidently weakened by an
expression
that betrayed a strange and unwonted
confusion
of mind.
The conference of the three was ended, and the
warrior with a turbaned head advanced towards his
captives, with the step of a man whose mind had
come to a decision. As the dreaded chief drew near,
Whittal retired, stealing to the side of the younger
warrior, in a manner that denoted greater familiarity,
and perhaps greater confidence. A sudden thought
lighted the countenance of the latter. He led the
innocent to the extremity of the piazza, spoke low
and earnestly, pointing to the forest, and when he
saw that his messenger was already crossing the
fields, at the top of his speed, he moved, with calm
dignity, into the centre of the group, taking his
station
so near his friend, that the folds of the scarlet
blanket brushed his elbow. Until this movement,
the silence was not broken. When the great chief
felt the passage of the other, he glanced a look of
hesitation at his friends, but resuming his former air
of composure, he spoke:
Man of many winters, he commenced, in an
English that was quite intelligible, while it
betrayed
a difficulty of speech we shall not attempt
imitating
,
why hath the Great Spirit made thy race
like hungry wolves?why hath a Pale-face the
stomach of a buzzard, the throat of a hound, and the
Vol. II. 10
heart of a deer? Thou hast seen many meltings of
the snow: thou rememberest the young tree a
sapling
.
Tell me; why is the mind of a Yengeese so
big, that it must hold all that lies between the rising
and the setting sun? Speak, for we would know
the reason, why arms so long are found on so little
bodies?
The events of that day had been of a nature to
awaken all the latent energies of the Puritan. He
had lifted up his spirit, with the morning, in the
customary
warmth with which he ever hailed the
Sabbath
;
the excitement of the assault had found him
sustained above most earthly calamities, and while
it quickened feelings that can never become extinct
in one who has been familiar with martial usages,
it left him, stern in his manhood, and exalted in his
sentiments of submission and endurance. Under
such influences, he answered with an austerity that
equalled the gravity of the Indian.
The Lord hath delivered us into the bonds of
the heathen, he said, and yet his name shall be
blessed beneath my roof! Out of evil shall come
good; and from this triumph of the ignorant shall
proceed an everlasting victory!
The chief gazed intently at the speaker, whose
attenuated frame, venerable face, and long locks,
aided by the hectic of enthusiasm that played
beneath
a glazed and deep-set eye, imparted a
character
that seemed to rise superior to human
weakness
.
Bending his head in superstitious reverence,
he turned gravely to those who, appearing to
possess
more of the world in their natures, were more
fitting subjects for the designs he meditated.
The mind of my father is strong, but his body
is like a branch of the scorched hemlock! was the
pithy declaration with which he prefaced his next
remark. Why is this? he continued, looking
severely
at the three who had so lately been opposed
to him in deadly contest. Here are men with
skins like the blossom of the dog-wood, and yet
their hands are so dark that I cannot see them!
They have been blackened by toil, beneath a
burning sun, returned Content, who knew how to
discourse in the figurative language of the people in
whose power he found himself. We have labored,
that our women and children might eat.
Nothe blood of red men hath changed their
color.
We have taken up the hatchet, that the land
which the Great Spirit hath given might still be
ours, and that our scalps might not be blown about
in the smoke of a wigwam. Would a Narragansett
hide his arms, and tie up his hands, with the
war-whoop
ringing in his ears?
When allusion was made to the ownership of the
valley, the blood rushed into the cheek of the
warrior
in such a flood, that it deepened even the
natural
swarthy hue; but, clenching the handle of his
axe convulsively, he continued to listen, like one
accustomed to entire self-command.
What a red man does may be seen, he
answered
,
pointing with a grim smile towards the orchard;
exposing, by the movement of the blanket, as he
raised his arm, two of the reeking trophies of
victory
attached to his belt. Our ears are open very
wide. We listen, to hear in what manner the
hunting-grounds
of the Indian have become the plowed
fields of the Yengeese. Now let my wise men
hearken
,
that they may grow more cunning, as the snows
settle on their heads. The pale-men have a secret
to make the black seem white!
Narragansett
Wampanoag! interrupted the chief, with the
lofty air with which an Indian identifies himself
with the glory of his peoplethen glancing a milder
look at the young warrior at his elbow, he added,
hastily, and in the tone of a courtier; 'tis very
goodNarragansett, or WampanoagWampanoag,
or Narragansett. The red men are brothers and
friends. They have broken down the fences
between
their hunting-grounds, and they have cleared
the paths, between their villages, of briars. What
have you to say to the Narragansett?he has not
yet shut his ear.
Wampanoag, if such be thy tribe, resumed
Content, thou shalt hear that which my conscience
teacheth is language to be uttered. The God of an
Englishman is the God of men of all ranks, and
of all time. His listeners shook their heads
doubtingly
,
with the exception of the youngest chief,
whose eye never varied its direction while the
other spoke, each word appearing to enter deep
within the recesses of his mind. In defiance of
these signs of blasphemy, do I still proclaim the
power of him I worship! Content continued; My
God is thy God; and he now looketh equally on the
deeds, and searcheth, with inscrutable knowledge,
into the hearts of both. This earth is his footstool;
younder heaven his throne! I pretend not to enter
into his sacred mysteries, or to proclaim the reason
why one-half of his fair work hath been so long
left in that slough of ignorance and heathenish
abomination in which my fathers found it; why
these hills never before echoed the songs of praise,
or why the valleys have been so long mute. These
are truths hid in the secret designs of his sacred
purpose, and they may not be known, until the last
fulfilment. But a great and righteous spirit hath
led hither men, filled with the love of truth and
pregnant with the designs of a heavily-burthened
faith, inasmuch as their longings are for things pure,
while the consciousness of their transgressions bends
them in deep humility to the dust. Thou bringest
against us the charge of coveting thy lands, and
of bearing minds filled with the corruption of riches.
This cometh of ignorance of that which hath been
abandoned, in order that the spirit of the godly
might hold fast to the truth. When the Yengeese
came into this wilderness, he left behind him all
that can delight the eye, please the senses, and feed
the longing of the human heart, in the country of
his fathers: for fair as is the work of the Lord in
other lands, there is none that is so excellent as
that from which these pilgrims in the wilderness
have departed. In that favored isle, the earth
groaneth
with the abundance of its products; the odors
of its sweet savors salute the nostrils, and the eye
is never wearied in gazing at its loveliness.No:
the men of the Pale-faces have deserted home, and
all that sweeteneth life, that they might serve God;
and not at the instigations of craving minds, or of
evil vanities!
Content paused, for as he grew warm with the
spirit by which he was animated, he had insensibly
strayed from the closer points of his subject. His
conquerors maintained the decorous gravity with
which an Indian always listens to the speech of
another, until he had ended; and then the Great
Chief, or Wampanoag, as he had proclaimed
himself
to be, laid a finger lightly on the shoulder of
his prisoner, as he demanded
Why have the people of the Yengeese lost
themselves on a blind path? If the country they
have left is pleasant, cannot their God hear them
from the wigwams of their fathers? Seeif our
trees are but bushes, leave them to the red man;
he will find room beneath their branches to lie in
the shade. If our rivers are small, it is because the
Indians are little. If the hills are low and the
valleys narrow, the legs of my people are weary
with much hunting, and they will journey among
them the easier. Now what the Great Spirit hath
10 *
made for a red man, a red man should keep. They
whose skins are like the light of the morning should
go back towards the rising sun, out of which they
have come to do us wrong.
The chief spoke calmly, but it was like a man
much accustomed to deal in the subtleties of
controversy
,
according to the fashion of the people to
whom he belonged.
God hath otherwise decreed, said Content.
He hath led his servants hither, that the incense
of praise may arise from the wilderness.
Your Spirit is a wicked Spirit. Your ears have
been cheated. The counsel that told your young
men to come so far, was not spoken in the voice of
the Manitou. It came from the tongue of one that
loves to see game scarce, and the squaws hungry.
Goyou follow the mocker, or your hands would
not be so dark.
I know not what injury may have been done
the Wampanoags, by men of wicked minds, for
some such there are, even in the dwellings of the
well-disposed; but wrong to any hath never come
from those that dwell within my doors. For these
lands, a price hath been paid; and what is now seen
of abundance in the valley, hath been wrought by
much labor. Thou art a Wampanoag, and dost
know that the hunting-grounds of thy tribe have
been held sacred by my people. Are not the fences
standing, which their hands placed, that not even
the hoof of colt should trample the corn? and when
was it known that the Indian came for justice
against the trespassing ox, and did not find it?
The moose doth not taste the grass at the root;
he liveth on the tree! He doth not stoop to feed on
that which he treadeth under foot! Does the hawk
look for the musketoe? His eye is too big. He can
see a bird. Gowhen the deer have been killed,
the Wampanoags will break down the fence with
their own hands. The arm of a hungry man is
strong. A cunning Pale-face hath made that fence;
it shutteth out the colt, and it shutteth in the Indian.
But the mind of a warrior is too big; it will not be
kept at grass with the ox.
A low but expressive murmur of satisfaction from
the mouths of his grim companions, succeeded this
reply of the chief.
The country of thy tribe is far distant,
returned
Content, and I will not lay untruth to my soul,
by presuming to say whether justice or injustice
hath been done them in the partition of the lands.
But in this valley hath wrong never been done to
the red man. What Indian hath asked for food,
and not got it? If he hath been a-thirst, the cider
came at his wish; if he hath been a-cold, there was
a seat by the hearth; and yet hath there been
reason
why the hatchet should be in my hand, and why
my foot should be on the war-path! For many
seasons
we lived on lands, which were bought of both
red and white man, in peace. But though the sun
shone clear so long, the clouds came at last. There
was a dark night fell upon this valley, Wampanoag,
and death and the brand entered my dwelling,
together
.
Our young men were killed, andour
spirits were sorely tried.
Content paused, for his voice became thick, and
his eye had caught a glimpse of the pale and
drooping
countenance of her who leaned on the arm of
the still excited and frowning Mark for support.
The young chief listened with a charmed ear. As
Content had proceeded, his body was inclined a
little
forward, and his whole attitude was that which
men unconsciously assume when intensely occupied
in listening to sounds of the deepest interest.
But the sun rose again! said the great chief,
pointing at the evidence of prosperity which were
everywhere apparent in the settlement, casting at
the same time an uneasy and suspicious glance at
his youngest companion. The morning was clear,
though the night was so dark. The cunning of a
Pale-face knows how to make corn grow on a rock.
The foolish Indian eats roots, when crops fail and
game is scarce.
God ceased to be angry; returned Content
meekly, folding his arms in a manner to show he
wished to speak no more.
The great chief was about to continue, when his
younger associate laid a finger on his naked
shoulder
,
and, by a sign, indicated that he wished to hold
communication with him apart. The former met
the request with respect, though it might be
discovered
that he little liked the expression of his
companion's
features, and that he yielded with
reluctance
,
if not with disgust. But the countenance of
the youth was firm, and it would have needed more
than usual hardihood to refuse a request seconded
by so steady and so meaning an eye. The elder
spoke to the warrior nearest his elbow, addressing
him by the name of Annawon, and then, by a
gestue
so natural and so dignified that it might have
graced the air of a courtier, he announced his
readiness
to proceed. Notwithstanding the habitual
reverence of the aborigines for age, the others gave
way for the passage of the young man, in a manner
to proclaim that merit or birth, or both, had united
to purchase for him a personal distinction, which
far exceeded that shown, in common, to men of his
years. The two chiefs left the piazza in the
noiseless
manner of the moccasoned foot.
The passage of these dignified warriors towards
the grounds in the rear of the dwelling, as it was
characteristic of their habits, is worthy of being
mentioned. Neither spoke, neither manifested any
womanish impatience to pry into the musings of the
other's mind, and neither failed in those slight but
still sensible courtesies by which the path was
rendered
commodious and the footing sure. They had
reached the summit of the elevation so often named,
ere they believed themselves sufficiently retired to
indulge in a discourse which might otherwise have
enlightened profane ears. When beneath the shade
of the fragrant orchard which grew on the hill, the
senior of the two stopped, and throwing about him
one of those quick, nearly imperceptible, and yet
wary glances, by which an Indian understands his
precise position, as it were by instinct, he commenced
the dialogue. The discourse was in the dialect of
their race, but as it is not probable that many who
read these pages would be much enlightened were
we to record it in the precise words in which it has
been transmitted to us, a translation into English,
as freely as the subject requires, and the geniuses
of the two languages will admit, shall be attempted.
What would my brother have? commenced he
with the turbaned head, uttering the guttural sounds
in the low, soothing tones of friendship, and even of
affection. What troubles the Great Sachem of
the Narragansetts? His thoughts seem uneasy. I
think there is more before his eye, than one whose
sight is getting dim can see. Doth he behold the
spirit of the brave Miantonimoh, who died, like a
dog, beneath the blows of cowardly Pequots and
false-tongued Yengeese? Or does his heart swell,
with longing, to see the scalps of treacherous
Pale-faces
hanging at his belt? Speak, my son; the
hatchet hath long been buried in the path between
our villages, and thy words will enter the ears of a
friend.
I do not see the spirit of my father, returned
the young Sachem; he is afar off, in the
hunting-grounds
of just warriors. My eyes are too weak to
look over so many mountains, and across so many
rivers. He is chasing the moose in grounds where
there are no briars; he needeth not the sight of a
young man to tell him which way the trail leadeth.
Why should I look at the place where the Pequot
and the Pale-face took his life? The fire which
scorched this hill hath blackened the spot, and I can
no longer find the marks of blood.
My son is very wisecunning beyond his
winters
!
That which hath been once revenged, is
forgotten
.
He looks no further than six moons. He
sees the warriors of the Yengeese coming into his
village, murdering his old women, and slaying the
Narragansett girls; killing his warriors from behind,
and lighting their fires with the bones of red men.
I will now stop my ears, for the groans of the
slaughtered
make my soul feel weak.
Wampanoag, answered the other, with a fierce
flashing of his eagle eye, and laying his hand firmly
on his breast, the night the snows were red with
the blood of my people, is here! my mind is dark:
none of my race have since looked upon the place
where the lodges of the Narragansetts stood, and
yet it hath never been hid from our sight. Since
that time have we travelled in the woods, bearing
on our backs all that is left but our sorrow; that
we carry in our hearts.
Why is my brother troubled? There are many
scalps among his people, and see, his own tomahawk
is very red! Let him quiet his anger till the night
cometh, and there will be a deeper stain on the axe.
I know he is in a hurry, but our councils say it is
better to wait for darkness, since the cunning of the
Pale-faces is too strong for the hands of our young
men.
When was a Narragansett slow to leap, after
the whoop was given; or unwilling to stay, when
men of gray heads say 'tis better? I like your
counsel
;
it is full of wisdom. Yet an Indian is but a
man! Can he fight with the God of the Yengeese?
He is too weak. An Indian is but a man, though his
skin he red!
I look into the clouds, at the trees, among the
lodges, said the other, affecting to gaze curiously
at the different objects he named, but I cannot
see the white Manitou. The pale-men were talking
to him when we raised the whoop in their fields,
and yet he has not heard them. Gomy son has
struck their warriors with a strong hand; has he
forgotten to count how many dead lie among the
trees with the sweet-smelling blossoms?
Metacom, returned he who has been called
the Sachem of the Narragansetts, stepping
cautiously
nearer to his friend, and speaking lower, as
if he feared an invisible auditor; thou hast put
hate into the bosoms of the red men, but canst thou
make them more cunning than the Spirits? Hate
is very strong, but cunning hath a longer arm.
See, he added, raising the fingers of his two
hands before the eyes of his attentive companion,
ten snows have come and melted, since there stood
a lodge of the Pale-faces on this hill. Conanchet
was then a boy. His hand had struck nothing but
deer. His heart was full of wishes. By day he
thought of Pequot scalps, at night he heard the
dying words of Miantonimoh. Though slain by
cowardly Pequots and lying Yengeese, his father
came with the night into his wigwam, to talk to his
son. `Does the child of so many great Sachems
grow big?' would he say; `is his arm getting strong,
his foot light, his eye quick, his heart valiant? Will
Conanchet be like his fathers?when will the young
Sachem of the Narragansetts become a man?' Why
should I tell my brother of these visits? Metacom
hath often seen the long line of Wampanoag Chiefs,
in his sleep? The brave Sachems sometimes enter
into the heart of their son?
The lofty-minded, though wily Philip struck his
hand heavily upon his naked breast, as he
answered
They are always here. Metacom has no soul
but the spirit of his fathers!
When he was tired of silence, the murdered
Miantonimoh spoke aloud, continued Conanchet,
after permitting the customary courteous pause to
succeed the emphatic words of his companion. He
bade his son arise, and go among the Yengeese,
that he might return with scalps to hang in his
wigwam; for the eyes of the dead chief liked not
to see the place so empty. The voice of Conanchet
was then too feeble for the council-fire; he said
nothinghe went alone. An evil spirit gave him
into the hands of the Pale-faces. He was a captive
many moons. They shut him in a cage, like a tamed
panther! It was here. The news of his ill-luck
passed from the mouths of the young men of the
Yengeese, to the hunters; and from the hunters it
came to the ears of the Narragansetts. My people
had lost their Sachem, and they came to seek him.
Metacom, the boy had felt the power of the God of
the Yengeese! His mind began to grow weak; he
thought less of revenge; the spirit of his father
came no more at night. There was much talking
with the unknown God, and the words of his enemies
were kind. He hunted with them. When he met
the trail of his warriors in the woods, his mind was
troubled, for he knew their errand. Still he saw
his father's spirit, and waited. The whoop was
heard that night; many died, and the Narragansetts
took scalps. Thou seest this lodge of stone, over
which fire has passed. There was then a cunning
place above, and in it the pale-men went to fight
for their lives. But the fire kindled, and then
there was no hope. The soul of Conanchet was
moved at that sight, for there was much honesty in
them within. Though their skins were so white,
they had not slain his father. But the flames would
not be spoken to, and the place became like the
coals of a deserted council-fire. All within were
turned to ashes. If the spirit of Miantonimoh
rejoiced
,
it was well; but the soul of his son was very
heavy. The weakness was on him, and he no longer
thought of boasting of his deeds at the war-post.
That fire scorched the stain of blood from the
Sachem's plain?
It did. Since that time I have not seen the
marks of my father's blood. Gray heads and boys
were in that fire, and when the timbers fell, nothing
was left but coals. Yet do they, who were in the
blazing lodge, stand there!
The attentive Metacom started, and glanced a
hasty look at the ruin.
Does my son see spirits in the air? he asked
hastily.
No, they live; they are bound for the torments.
In the white head, is he who talked much with his
God. The elder chief, who struck our young men
so hard, was then also a captive in this lodge. He
who spoke, and she, who seems even paler than
her race, died that night; and yet are they now
here! Even the brave youth, that was so hard to
conquer, looks like a boy that was in the fire! The
Yengeese deal with unknown Gods; they are too
cunning for an Indian!
Philip heard this strange tale, as a being educated
in superstitious legends would be apt to listen; and
yet it was with a leaning to incredulity, that was
generated by his fierce and indomitable desire for
the destruction of the hated race. He had prevailed,
in the councils of his nation, over many similar signs
of the supernatural agency that was exercised in
favor of his enemies, but never before had facts so
imposing come so directly and from so high a source
before his mind. Even the proud resolution and
farsighted
Vol. II. 11
wisdom of this sagacious chief were shaken
by such testimony, and there was a single moment
when the idea of abandoning a league that seemed
desperate took possession of his brain. But true to
himself and his cause, second thoughts and a firmer
purpose restored his resolution, though they could
not remove the perplexity of his doubts.
What does Conanchet wish? he said. Twice
have his warriors broke into this valley, and twice
have the tomahawks of his young men been redder
than the head of the woodpecker. The fire was
not good fire; the tomahawk will kill surer. Had
not the voice of my brother said to his young men,
`let the scalps of the prisoners alone,' he could not
now say `yet do they now stand here!'
My mind is troubled, friend of my father. Let
them be questioned, artfully, that the truth be
known.
Metacom mused an instant; then smiling, in a
friendly manner, on his young and much moved
companion, he made a sign to a youth who was
straying about the fields, to approach. This young
warrior was made the bearer of an order to lead
the captives to the hill, after which the two chiefs
stalked to and fro in silence, each brooding over
what had passed, in a humor that was suited to his
particular character and more familiar feelings.
CHAPTER VIII.
No wither'd witch shall here be seen,
No goblins lead their nightly crew;
The female fays shall haunt the green,
And dress thy grave with pearly dew.
Collins
It
is rare indeed that the philosophy of a
dignified
Indian is so far disturbed, as to destroy the
appearance
of equanimity. When Content and the
family of the Heathcotes appeared on the hill, they
found the chiefs still pacing the orchard, with the
outward composure of men unmoved, and with the
gravity that was suited to their rank. Annawon,
who had acted as their conductor, caused the
captives
to be placed in a row, choosing the foot of the
ruin for their position, and then he patiently
awaited
the moment when his superiors might be pleased
to renew the examination. In this habitual silence,
there was nothing of the abject air of Asiatic
deference
.
It proceeded from the habit of
self-command
,
which taught the Indian to repress all
natural
emotions. A very similar effect was produced
by the religious abasement of those whom fortune
had now thrown into their power. It would have
been a curious study, for one interested in the
manners
of the human species, to note the difference
between the calm, physical, and perfect
self-possession
of the wild tenants of the forest, and the
ascetic
,
spiritually sustained, and yet meek submission
to Providence, that was exhibited by most of the
prisoners. We say of most, for there was an
exception
.
The brow of young Mark still retained its
frown, and the angry character of his eye was only
lost, when by chance it lighted on the drooping form
and pallid features of his mother. There was
ample
time for these several and peculiar qualities to
be thus silently exhibited, many minutes passing
before either of the Sachems seemed inclined to
recommence
the conference. At length Philip, or
Metacom, as we shall indifferently call him, drew
near and spoke.
This earth is a good earth, he said; it is of
many colors, to please the eyes of him who made
it. In one part it is dark, and as the worm taketh
the color of the leaf on which he crawls, there the
hunters are black; in another part it is white, and
that is the part where pale-men were born, and
where they should die; or they may miss the road
which leads to their happy hunting-grounds. Many
just warriors, who have been killed on distant
war-paths
,
still wander in the woods, because the trail
is hid, and their sight dim. It is not good to trust
so much to the cunning of
Wretched and blind worshipper of Apollyon!
interrupted the Puritan, we are not of the
idolatrous
and foolish-minded! It hath been accorded to
us to know the Lord; to his chosen worshippers, all
regions are alike. The spirit can mount, equally,
through snows and whirlwinds; the tempest and
the calm; from the lands of the sun, and the lands
of frosts; from the depths of the ocean, from fire,
from the forest
He was interrupted, in his turn. At the word fire,
the finger of Metacom fell meaningly on his
shoulder
;
and when he had ceased, for until then no
Indian
would have spoken, the other gravely asked
And when a man of a pale skin hath gone up
in the fire, can he again walk upon earth? Is the
river between this clearing and the pleasant fields
of a Yengeese so narrow, that the just men can step
across it when they please?
This is the conceit of one wallowing in the
slough of heathenish abominations! Child of
ignorance
!
know that the barriers which separate heaven
from earth are impassable; for what purified being
could endure the wickedness of the flesh?
This is a lie of the false Pale-faces, said the
wily Philip; it is told that the Indian might not
learn their cunning, and become stronger than a
Yengeese. My father, and those with him, were
once burnt in this lodge, and now he standeth here,
ready to take the tomahawk!
To be angered at this blasphemy, would ill
denote
the pity that I feel, said Mark, more excited
at the charge of necromancy, than he was willing
to own; and yet to suffer so fatal an error to
spread among these deluded victims of Satan, would
be neglect of duty. Thou hast heard some legend
of thy wild people, man of the Wampanoags, which
may heap double perdition on thy soul, lest thou
shouldst happily be rescued from the fangs of the
deceiver. It is true, that I and mine were in
exceeding
jeopardy in this tower, and that to the eyes
of men without we seemed melted with the heat
of the flames; but the Lord put it into our spirits to
seek refuge whither fire could not come. The well
was made the instrument of our safety, for the
fulfilment
of his own inscrutable designs.
Notwithstanding the long practised and
exceeding
subtlety of the listeners, they heard this simple
explanation of that which they had deemed a
miracle
,
with a wonder that could not readily be
concealed
.
Delight at the excellence of the artifice
was evidently the first and common emotion of them
both; nor would they yield implicit faith, until
assured
,
beyond a doubt, that what they heard was
true. The little iron door, which had permitted
access to the well, for the ordinary domestic
purposes
of the family, was still there; and it was only
11 *
after each had cast a look down the deep shaft, that
he appeared satisfied of the practicability of the
deed. Then a look of triumph gleamed in the
swarthy visage of Philip, while the features of his
associate expressed equally his satisfaction and his
regret. They walked apart, musing on what they
had just seen and heard; and when they spoke, it
was again in the language of their people.
My son hath a tongue that cannot lie, observed
Metacom, in a soothing, flattering accent. What
he hath seen, he tells; and what he tells, is true.
Conanchet is not a boy, but a chief whose wisdom
is gray, while his limbs are young. Now, why shall
not his people take the scalps of these Yengeese, that
they may never go any more into holes in the earth,
like cunning foxes?
The Sachem hath a very bloody mind,
returned
the young chief, quicker than was common for
men of his station. Let the arms of the warriors
rest, till they meet the armed hands of the
Yengeese
,
or they will be too tired to strike heavily.
My young men have taken scalps, since the sun
came over the trees, and they are satisfiedWhy
does Metacom look so hard? What does my father
see?
A dark spot in the middle of a white plain. The
grass is not green; it is red as blood. It is too dark
for the blood of a Pale-face. It is the rich blood of
a great warrior. The rains cannot wash it out; it
grows darker every sun. The snows do not whiten
it; it hath been there many winters. The birds
scream as they fly over it; the wolf howls; the
lizards creep another way.
Thine eyes are getting old; fire hath blackened
the place, and what thou seest is coal.
The fire was kindled in a well; it did not burn
bright. What I see, is blood.
Wampanoag, rejoined Conanchet, fiercely, I
have scorched the spot with the lodges of the
Yengeese
.
The grave of my father is covered with
scalps taken by the hand of his sonWhy does
Metacom look again? What does the chief see?
An Indian town burning in the midst of the
snow; the young men struck from behind; the girls
screaming; the children broiling on coals, and the
old men dying like dogs! It is the village of the
cowardly PequotsNo, I see better; the Yengeese
are in the country of the Great Narragansett, and
the brave Sachem is there, fighting! I shut my eyes,
for smoke blinds them!
Conanchet heard this allusion to the recent and
deplorable fate of the principal establishment of his
tribe, in sullen silence; for the desire of revenge,
which had been so fearfully awakened, seemed
now to be slumbering, if it were not entirely quelled
by the agency of some mysterious and potent
feeling
.
He rolled his eyes gloomily, from the
apparently
abstracted countenance of his artful
companion
,
to those of the captives, whose fate only
awaited his judgment, since the band which had
that morning broken in upon the Wish-Ton-Wish
was, with but few exceptions, composed of the
surviving
warriors of his own powerful nation. But,
while his look was displeased, faculties that were
schooled so highly, could not easily be mistaken, in
what passed, even in the most cursory manner,
before
his sight.
What sees my father, next? he asked, with
an interest he could not control, detecting another
change in the features of Metacom.
One who is neither white nor red. A young
woman, that boundeth like a skipping fawn; who
hath lived in a wigwam, doing nothing; who speaks
with two tongues; who holds her hands before the
eyes of a great warrior, till he is blind as the owl
in the sunI see her
Metacom paused, for at that moment a being that
singularly resembled this description appeared
before
him, offering the reality of the imaginary
picture
he was drawing with so much irony and art.
The movement of the timid hare is scarce more
hurried, or more undecided, than that of the
creature
who now suddenly presented herself to the
warriors. It was apparent, by the hesitating and
half-retreating step that succeeded the light bound
with which she came in view, that she dreaded to
advance, while she knew not how far it might be
proper to retire. For the first moment, she stood in
a suspended and doubting posture, such as one might
suppose a creature of mist would assume ere it
vanished
,
and then meeting the eye of Conanchet, the
uplifted foot retouched the earth, and her whole
form sunk into the modest and shrinking attitude of
an Indian girl, who stood in the presence of a Sachem
of her tribe. As this female is to enact no mean
part in that which follows, the reader may be
thankful
for a more minute description of her person.
The age of the stranger was under twenty. In
form she rose above the usual stature of an Indian
maid, though the proportions of her person were as
light and buoyant as at all comported with the
fullness
that properly belonged to her years. The limbs,
seen below the folds of a short kirtle of bright
scarlet
cloth, were just and tapering, even to the nicest
proportions of classic beauty; and never did foot of
higher instep, and softer roundness, grace a
feathered
moccason. Though the person, from the neck to
the knees, was hid by a tightly-fitting vest of calico
and the short kirtle named, enough of the shape
was visible to betray outlines that had never been
injured, either by the mistaken devices of art or by
the baneful effects of toil. The skin was only
visible
at the hands, face, and neck. Its lustre having
been a little dimmed by exposure, a rich, rosy tint
had usurped the natural brightness of a complexion
that had once been fair even to brilliancy. The eye
was full, sweet, and of a blue that emulated the sky
of evening; the brows, soft and arched; the nose,
straight, delicate, and slightly Grecian; the
forehead
,
fuller than that which properly belonged to a
girl of the Narragansetts, but regular, delicate, and
polished; and the hair, instead of dropping in long
straight tresses of jet black, broke out of the
restraints
of a band of beaded wampum, in ringlets
of golden yellow.
The peculiarities that distinguished this female
from the others of her tribe, were not confined alone
to the indelible marks of nature. Her step was more
clastic; her gait more erect and graceful; her foot
less inwardly inclined, and her whole movements
freer and more decided than those of a race doomed
from infancy to subjection and labor. Though
ornamented
by some of the prized inventions of the
hated race to which she evidently owed her birth,
she had the wild and timid look of those with whom
she had grown into womanhood. Her beauty would
have been remarkable in any region of the earth,
while the play of muscle, the ingenuous beaming of
the eye, and the freedom of limb and action, were
such as seldom pass beyond the years of childhood,
among people who, in attempting to improve, so
often mar the works of nature.
Although the color of the eye was so very
different
from that which generally belongs to one of
Indian
origin, the manner of its quick and searching
glance, and of the half-alarmed and yet
understanding
look with which this extraordinary creature
made herself mistress of the more general
character
of the assemblage before which she had been
summoned, was like the half-instinctive knowledge
of one accustomed to the constant and keenest
exercise
of her faculties. Pointing with a finger
towards
Whittal Ring, who stood a little in the
back-ground
,
a low, sweet voice was heard asking, in the
language of the Indians
Why has Conanchet sent for his woman from
the woods?
The young Sachem made no reply; an ordinary
spectator could not have detected about him even a
consciousness of the speaker's presence. On the
contrary
,
he maintained the lofty reserve of a chief
engaged in affairs of moment. However deeply his
thoughts might have been troubled, it was not easy
to trace any evidence of the state of his mind in
the calmness of features that appeared habitually
immovable. For a single treacherous instant, only,
was a glance of kindness shot towards the timid and
attentive girl, and then throwing the still bloody
tomahawk into the hollow of one arm, while the
hand of the other firmly grasped its handle, he
remained
unchanged in feature, as he was rigid in
limb. Not so, with Philip. When the intruder first
appeared, a dark and lowering gleam of discontent
gathered at his brow. It quickly changed to a look
of sarcastic and biting scorn.
Does my brother again wish to know what I
see? he demanded, when sufficient time had
passed
,
after the unanswered question of the female, to
show that his companion was not disposed to answer.
What does the Sachem of the Wampanoags
now behold? returned Conanchet, proudly;
unwilling
to show that any circumstance had
occurred
to interrupt the subject of their conference.
A sight that his eyes will not believe. He sees
a great tribe on the war-path. There are many
braves, and a chief whose fathers came from the
clouds. Their hands are in the air; they strike heavy
blows; the arrow is swift, and the bullet is not seen
to enter, but it kills. Blood runs from the wounds,
that is of the color of water. Now he does not see,
but he hears! 'Tis the scalp-whoop, and the
warriors
are very glad. The chiefs in the happy
hunting-grounds
are coming, with joy, to meet Indians
that are killed; for they know the scalp-whoop of
their children.
The expressive countenance of the young Sachem
involuntarily responded to this description of the
scene through which he had just passed; and it was
impossible for one so tutored, to prevent the blood
from rushing faster to a heart that ever beat
strongly
with the wishes of a warrior.
What sees my father, next? he asked, triumph
insensibly stealing into the tones of his voice.
A Messengerand then he hearsthe
moccasons
of squaws!
Enough;Metacom, the women of the
Narragansetts
have no lodges. Their villages are in coals,
and they follow the young men for food.
I see no deer. The hunter will not find venison
in a clearing of the Pale-faces. But the corn is full
of milk; Conanchet is very hungry; he hath sent
for his woman, that he may eat!
The fingers of that hand, which grasped the
handle of the tomahawk, appeared to bury
themselves
in the wood; the glittering axe itself was
slightly raised; but the fierce gleaming of
resentment
subsided, as the anger of the young Sachem
vanished, and a dignified calm again settled on his
countenance.
Go, Wampanoag, he said, waving a hand
proudly, as if determined to be no longer harassed
by the language of his wily associate. My young
men will raise the whoop, when they hear my
voice; and they will kill deer for their women.
Sachem, my mind is my own.
Philip answered to the look which accompanied
these words, with one that threatened vengeance;
but smothering his anger, with his accustomed
wisdom
,
he left the hill, assuming an air that affected
more of commiseration than of resentment.
Why has Conanchet sent for a woman from the
woods? repeated the same soft voice, nearer to
the elbow of the young Sachem, and which spoke
with less of the timidity of the sex, now that the
troubled spirit of the Indians of those regions had
disappeared.
Narra-mattah, come near; returned the young
chief, changing the deep and proud tones in which
he had addressed his restless and bold companion
in arms, to those which better suited the gentle
ear for which his words were intended. Fear not,
daughter of the morning, for those around us are
of a race used to see women at the council-fires.
Now look, with an open eyeis there anything
among these trees that seemeth like an ancient
tradition? Hast ever beheld such a valley, in thy
dreams? Have yonder Pale-faces, whom the
tomahawks
of my young men spared, been led before
thee by the Great Spirit, in the dark night?
The female listened, in deep attention. Her gaze
was wild and uncertain, and yet it was not
absolutely
without gleamings of a half-reviving
intelligence
.
Until that moment, she had been too much
occupied in conjecturing the subject of her visit, to
regard the natural objects by which she was
surrounded
:
but with her attention thus directly
turned
upon them, her organs of sight embraced each
and all, with the discrimination that is so
remarkable
in those whose faculties are quickened by
danger
and necessity. Passing from side to side, her
swift glances ran over the distant hamlet, with its
little fort; the buildings in the near grounds; the
soft and verdant fields; the fragrant orchard,
beneath
whose leafy shades she stood, and the
blackened
tower, that rose in its centre, like some gloomy
memorial, placed there to remind the spectator not
to trust too fondly to the signs of peace and
loveliness
that reigned around. Shaking back the ringlets
that had blown about her temples, the wondering
female returned thoughtfully and in silence to her
place.
'Tis a village of the Yengeese! she said, after
a long and expressive pause. A Narragansett
woman does not love to look at the lodges of the
hated race.
Listen.Lies have never entered the ears of
Narra-mattah. My tongue hath spoken like the
tongue of a chief. Thou didst not come of the
sumach
,
but of the snow. This hand of thine is not
like the hands of the women of my tribe; it is
little
,
for the Great Spirit did not make it for work;
it is of the color of the sky in the morning, for thy
fathers were born near the place where the sun
rises. Thy blood is like spring-water. All this
thou knowest, for none have spoken false in thy ear.
Speakdost thou never see the wigwam of thy
father? Does not his voice whisper to thee, in the
language of his people?
The female stood in the attitude which a sibyl
might be supposed to assume, while listening to the
occult mandates of the myterious oracle, every
faculty entranced and attentive.
Why does Conanchet ask these questions of his
wife? He knows what she knows; he sees what she
sees; his mind is her mind. If the Great Spirit
made her skin of a different color, he made her
heart the same. Narra-mattah will not listen to
the lying language; she shuts her ears, for there is
deceit in its sounds. She tries to forget it. One
tongue can say all she wishes to speak to Conanchet;
why should she look back in dreams, when a great
chief is her husband?
The eye of the warrior, as he looked upon the
ingenuous and confiding face of the speaker, was
Vol. II. 12
kind to fondness. The firmness had passed away,
and in its place was left the winning softness of
affection
,
which, as it belongs to nature, is seen, at
times, in the expression of an Indian's eye, as strongly
as it is ever known to sweeten the intercourse of a
more polished condition of life.
Girl, he said with emphasis, after a moment
of thought, as if he would recall her and himself to
more important duties, this is a war-path; all on
it are men. Thou wast like the pigeon before its
wing opens, when I brought thee from the nest; still
the winds of many winters had blown upon thee.
Dost never think of the warmth and of the food of
the lodge in which thou hast past so many seasons?
The wigwam of Conanchet is warm; no
woman
of the tribe hath as many furs as
Narra-mattah
.
He is a great hunter! when they hear his
moccason
,
the beavers lie down to be killed! But the
men of the Pale-faces hold the plow. Does not
`the driven snow' think of those who fenced the
wigwam of her father from the cold, or of the
manner
in which the Yengeese live?
His youthful and attentive wife seemed to reflect;
but raising her face, with an expression of content
that could not be counterfeited, she shook her head
in the negative.
Does she never see a fire kindled among the
lodges, or hear the whoops of warriors as they break
into a settlement?
Many fires have been kindled before her eyes.
The ashes of the Narragansett town are not yet
cold.
Does not Narra-mattah hear her father
speaking
to the God of the Yengeese? Listenhe is
asking
favor for his child!
The Great Spirit of the Narragansett has ears
for his people.
But I hear a softer voice! 'Tis a woman of the
Pale-faces among her children: cannot the
daughter
hear?
Narra-mattah, or `the driven snow,' laid her hand
lightly on the arm of the chief, and she looked
wistfully and long into his face, without an answer.
The gaze seemed to deprecate the anger that
might be awakened by what she was about to
reveal
.
Chief of my people, she said, encouraged by
his still calm and gentle brow, to proceed, what a
girl of the clearings sees in her dreams, shall not
be hid. It is not the lodges of her race, for the
wigwam of her husband is warmer. It is not the
food and clothes of a cunning people, for who is
richer than the wife of a great chief? It is not her
fathers speaking to their Spirit, for there is none
stronger than Manitou. Narra-mattah has
forgotten
all: she does not wish to think of things like
these. She knows how to hate a hungry and craving
race. But she sees one that the wives of the
Narragansetts
do not see. She sees a woman with a
white skin; her eye looks softly on her child in her
dreams; it is not an eye, it is a tongue! It says,
what does the wife of Conanchet wish?is she
cold? here are fursis she hungry? here is venison
is she tired? the arms of the pale woman open,
that an Indian girl may sleep. When there is
silence
in the lodges, when Conanchet and his young
men lie down, then does this pale woman speak.
Sachem, she does not talk of the battles of her
people, nor of the scalps that her warriors have
taken, nor of the manner in which the Pequots and
Mohicans fear her tribe. She does not tell how a
young Narragansett should obey her husband, nor
how the women must keep food in the lodges for
the hunters that are wearied; her tongue useth
strange words. It names a Mighty and Just Spirit;
it telleth of peace, and not of war; it soundeth as
one talking from the clouds; it is like the falling of
the water among rocks. Narra-mattah loves to
listen, for the words seem to her like the
Wish-Ton-Wish
,
when he whistles in the woods.
Conanchet had fastened a look of deep and
affectionate
interest on the wild and sweet countenance
of the being who stood before him. She had spoken
in that attitude of earnest and natural eloquence
that no art can equal; and when she ceased, he
laid a hand, in kind but melancholy fondness, on the
half-inclined and motionless head, as he answered.
This is the bird of night, singing to its young!
The Great Spirit of thy fathers is angry, that thou
livest in the lodge of a Narragansett. His sight is
too cunning to be cheated. He knows that the
moccason, and the wampum, and the robe of fur,
are liars; he sees the color of the skin beneath.
Conanchet, no; returned the female hurriedly,
and with a decision her timidity did not give reason
to expect. He seeth farther than the skin, and
knoweth the color of the mind. He hath forgotten
that one of his girls is missing.
It is not so. The eagle of my people was taken
into the lodges of the Pale-faces. He was young,
and they taught him to sing with another tongue.
The colors of his feathers were changed, and they
thought to cheat the Manitou. But when the door
was open, he spread his wings and flew back to his
nest. It is not so. What hath been done is good,
and what will be done is better. Come; there is a
straight path before us.
Thus saying, Conanchet motioned to his wife to
follow towards the group of captives. The foregoing
dialogue had occurred in a place where the two
parties were partially concealed from each other
by the ruin; but as the distance was so trifling, the
Sachem and his companion were soon confronted
with those he sought. Leaving his wife a little
without the circle, Conanchet advanced, and taking
the unresisting and half-unconscious Ruth by the
arm, he led her forward. He placed the two
females
in attitudes where each might look the other
full in the face. Strong emotion struggled in a
countenance which, in spite of its fierce mask of
war-paint, could not entirely conceal its workings.
See, he said in English, looking earnestly from
one to the other. The Good Spirit is not ashamed
of his work. What he hath done, he hath done;
Narragansett nor Yengeese can alter it. This is the
white bird that came from the sea, he added,
touching the shoulder of Ruth lightly with a finger,
and this the young, that she warmed under her
wing.
Then, folding his arms on his naked breast, he
appeared to summon his energy, lest, in the scene
that he knew must follow, his manhood might be
betrayed into some act unworthy of his name.
The captives were necessarily ignorant of the
meaning of the scene which they had just witnessed.
So many strange and savage-looking forms were
constantly passing and repassing before their eyes,
that the arrival of one, more or less, was not likely
to be noted. Until she heard Conanchet speak in
her native tongue, Ruth had lent no attention to the
interview between him and his wife. But the
figurative
language and no less remarkable action of the
Narragansett, had the effect to arouse her suddenly,
and in the most exciting manner, from her
melancholy
.
No child of tender age ever unexpectedly came
before the eyes of Ruth Heathcote, without painfully
recalling the image of the cherub she had lost. The
playful voice of infancy never surprised her ear,
without the sound conveying a pang to the heart;
nor could allusion, ever so remote, be made to
12*
persons or events that bore resemblance to the sad
incidents of her own life, without quickening the
never-dying pulses of maternal love. No wonder,
then, that when she found herself in the situation
and under the circumstances described, nature grew
strong within her, and that her mind caught glimpses,
however dim and indistinct they might be, of a truth
that the reader has already anticipated. Still, a
certain and intelligible clue was wanting. Fancy
had ever painted her child in the innocence and
infancy in which it had been torn from her arms;
and here, while there was so much to correspond
with reasonable expectation, there was little to
answer to the long and fondly-cherished picture.
The delusion, if so holy and natural a feeling may
thus be termed, had been too deeply seated to be
dispossessed at a glance. Gazing long, earnestly,
and with features that varied with every changing
feeling, she held the stranger at the length of her
two arms, alike unwilling to release her hold, or to
admit her closer to a heart which might rightfully
be the property of another.
Who art thou? demanded the mother, in a voice
that was tremulous with the emotions of that sacred
character. Speak, mysterious and lovely being
who art thou?
Narra-mattah had turned a terrified and imploring
look at the immovable and calm form of the chief,
as if she sought protection from him at whose hands
she had been accustomed to receive it. But a
different
sensation took possession of her mind, when she
heard sounds which had too often soothed the ear
of infancy, ever to be forgotten. Struggling ceased,
and her pliant form assumed the attitude of intense
and entranced attention. Her head was bent aside,
as if the ear were eager to drink in a repetition of
the tones, while her bewildered and delighted eye
still sought the countenance of her husband.
Vision of the woods!wilt thou not answer?
continued Ruth. If there is reverence for the
Holy One of Israel in thine heart, answer, that I
may know thee!
Hist! Conanchet! murmured the wife, over
whose features the glow of pleased and wild
surprise
continued to deepen. Come near, Sachem;
the Spirit that talketh to Narra-mattah in her
dreams, is nigh.
Woman of the Yengeese! said the husband,
advancing with dignity to the spot, let the clouds
blow from thy sight. Wife of a Narragansett! see
clearly. The Manitou of your race speaks strong.
He telleth a mother to know her child!
Ruth could hesitate no longer; neither sound nor
exclamation escaped her, but as she strained the
yielding frame of her recovered daughter to her
heart, it appeared as if she strove to incorporate
the two bodies into one. A cry of pleasure and
astonishment drew all around her. Then came the
evidence of the power of nature when strongly
awakened. Age and youth alike acknowledged its
potency, and recent alarms were overlooked in the
pure joy of such a moment. The spirit of even
the lofty-minded Conanchet was shaken. Raising
the hand, at whose wrist still hung the bloody
tomahawk
,
he veiled his face, and, turning aside, that
none might see the weakness of so great a warrior,
he wept.
CHAPTER IX.
One sees more devils than vast hell can hold;
That is, the madman:
Midsummer-Night's Dream
.
On
quitting the hill, Philip had summoned his
Wampanoags, and, supported by the obedient and
fierce Annawon, a savage that might, under better
auspices, have proved a worthy lieutenant to C
sar, he left the fields of Wish-Ton-Wish.
Accustomed
to see these sudden outbreakings of temper
in their leaders, the followers of Conanchet, who
would have preserved their air of composure under
far more trying circumstances, saw him depart.
equally without question and without alarm. But
when their own Sachem appeared on the ground
which was still red with the blood of the
combatants
,
and made known his intention to abandon a
conquest that seemed more than half achieved, he
was not heard without murmuring. The authority
of an Indian Chief is far from despotic, and though
there is reason to think it is often aided, if not
generated, by the accidental causes of birth and
descent, it receives its main support in the personal
qualities of him who rules. Happily for the
Narragansett
leader, even his renowned father, the hapless
Miantonimoh, had not purchased a higher name for
wisdom, or for daring, than that which had been
fairly won by his still youthful son. The savage
humors and the rankling desire for vengeance in
the boldest of his subalterns, were made to quail
before the menacing glances of an eye that seldom
threatened without performance; nor was there
one of them all, when challenged to come forth to
brave the anger or to oppose the eloquence of his
chief, who did not shrink from a contest which
habitual
respect had taught them to believe would
be far too unequal for success. Within less than an
hour after Ruth had clasped her child to her bosom,
the invaders had altogether disappeared. The dead
of their party were withdrawn and concealed, with
all the usual care, in order that no scalp of a warrior
might be left in the hands of his enemies.
It was not unusual for the Indians to retire
satisfied
with the results of their first blow. So much
of their military success was dependent on surprise,
that it oftener happened the retreat commenced
with its failure, than that victory was obtained by
perseverance.
So long as the battle raged, their courage was
equal to all its dangers; but among people who
made so great a merit of artifice, it is not at all
surprising that they seldom put more to the hazard
than was justified by the most severe discretion.
When it was known, therefore, that the foe had
disappeared in the forest, the inhabitants of the
village were more ready to believe the movement
was the result of their own manful resistance, than
to seek motives that might not prove so soothing to
their self-esteem. The retreat was thought to be
quite in rule, and though prudence forbade pursuit,
able and well-limbed scouts were sent on their trail,
as well to prevent a renewal of the surprise, as to
enable the forces of the Colony to know the tribe
of their enemies, and the direction which they had
taken.
Then came a scene of solemn ceremonies and of
deep affliction. Though the parties led by Dudley
and the Lieutenant had been so fortunate as to
escape with a few immaterial wounds, the soldiers
headed by Content, with the exception of those
already named, had fallen to a man. Death had
struck, at a blow, twenty of the most efficient
individuals
,
out of that isolated and simple
community-Under
circumstances in which victory was so barren
and so dearly bought, sorrow was a feeling far
stronger than rejoicing. Exultation took the aspect
of humility, and while men were conscious of their
well-deserving, they were the more sensible of their
dependence on a power they could neither influence
nor comprehend. The characteristic opinions of the
religionists became still more exalted, and the close
of the day was quite as remarkable for an
exhibition
of the peculiarly exaggerated impressions of
the Colonists, as its opening had been frightful in
violence and blood.
When one of the more active of the runners
returned
with the news that the Indians had retired
through the forest with a broad trail, a sure sign
that they meditated no further concealment near
the valley, and that they had already been traced
many miles on their retreat, the villagers returned
to their usual habitations. The dead were then
distributed
among those who claimed the nearest right
to the performance of the last duties of affection;
and it might have been truly said, that mourning
had taken up its abode in nearly every dwelling.
The ties of blood were so general in a society thus
limited, and, where they failed, the charities of life
were so intimate and so natural, that not an
individual
of them all escaped, without feeling that
the events of the day had robbed him, for ever, of
some one on whom he was partially dependent for
comfort or happiness.
As the day drew towards its close, the little bell
again summoned the congregation to the church.
On this solemn occasion, but few of those who still
lived to hear its sounds were absent. The moment
when Meek arose for prayer was one of general
and intense feeling. The places so lately occupied
by those who had fallen were now empty, and they
resembled so many eloquent blanks in the
description
of what had passed, expressing far more than
any language could impart. The appeal of the
divine
was in his usual strain of sublimated piety,
mysterious insights into the hidden purposes of
Providence being strangely blended with the more
intelligible wants and passions of man. While he
gave Heaven the glory of the victory, he spoke
with a lofty and pretending humility of the
instruments
of its power; and although seemingly willing
to acknowledge that his people abundantly deserved
the heavy blow which had alighted on them, there
was an evident impatience of the agents by which
it had been inflicted. The principles of the
sectarian
were so singularly qualified by the feelings of
the borderer, that one subtle in argument would
have found little difficulty in detecting flaws in the
reasoning of this zealot; but as so much was
obscured
by metaphysical mists, and so much was left
for the generalities of doctrine, his hearers, without
an exception, made such an application of what he
uttered, as apparently rendered every mind satisfied.
The sermon was as extemporaneous as the prayer,
if any thing can come extempore from a mind so
drilled and fortified in opinion. It contained much
the same matter, delivered a little less in the form
of an apostrophe. The stricken congregation, while
they were encouraged with the belief that they
were vessels set apart for some great and glorious
end of Providence, were plainly told that they merited
far heavier affliction than this which had now
befallen
;
and they were reminded that it was their
duty to desire even condemnation, that he who
framed the heavens and the earth might be
glorified
!
Then they heard comfortable conclusions, which
might reasonably teach them to expect, that though
in the abstract such were the obligations of the real
Christian, there was good reason to think that all
who listened to doctrines so pure would be
remembered
with an especial favor.
So useful a servant of the temple as Meek Wolfe
did not forget the practical application of his
subject
.
It is true, that no visible emblem of the
cross was shown to excite his hearers, nor were
they stimulated to loosen blood-hounds on the trail
of their enemies; but the former was kept
sufficiently
before the mind's eye by constant allusions
to its merits, and the Indians were pointed at as the
instruments by which the great father of evil hoped
to prevent `the wilderness from blossoming like the
rose,' and `yielding the sweet savors of godliness.'
Philip and Conanchet were openly denounced, by
name; some dark insinuations being made, that the
person of the former was no more than the favorite
tenement of Moloch; while the hearer was left to
devise a suitable spirit for the government of the
physical powers of the other, from among any of
the more evil agencies that were named in the
Bible
.
Any doubts of the lawfulness of the contest,
that might assail tender consciences, were brushed
away by a bold and decided hand. There was no
attempt at justification, however; for all difficulties
of this nature were resolved by the imperative
obligations
of duty. A few ingenious allusions to the
manner in which the Israelites dispossessed the
occupants
of Judea, were of great service in this
particular
part of the subject, since it was not difficult
to convince men, who so strongly felt the impulses
of religious excitement, that they were stimulated
rightfully. Fortified by this advantage, Mr. Wolfe
manifested no desire to avoid the main question.
He affirmed that if the empire of the true faith
could be established by no other means, a
circumstance
which he assumed it was sufficiently
apparent
to all understandings could not be done, he
pronounced
it the duty of young and old, the weak and
the strong, to unite in assisting to visit the former
possessors of the country with what he termed the
wrath of an offended Deity. He spoke of the
fearful
slaughter of the preceding winter, in which
neither
years nor sex had been spared, as a triumph
of the righteous cause, and as an encouragement to
persevere. Then, by a transition that was not
extraordinary
in an age so remarkable for religious
subtleties, Meek returned to the more mild and
obvious truths which pervade the doctrines of him
whose church he professed to uphold. His hearers
were admonished to observe lives of humility and
charity, and were piously dismissed, with his
benediction
,
to their several homes.
The congregation quitted the building with the
feelings of men who thought themselves favored by
peculiar and extraordinary intelligences with the
author of all truth, while the army of Mahomet
itself
was scarcely less influenced by fanaticism than
these blinded zealots. There was something so
grateful to human frailty in reconciling their
resentments
and their temporal interests to their
religious
duties, that it should excite little wonder
when we add that most of them were fully prepared
to become ministers of vengeance in the hands
of any bold leader. While the inhabitants of the
settlement were thus struggling between passions
so contradictory, the shades of evening gradually
fell upon their village, and then came darkness, with
the rapid strides with which it follows the setting
of the sun in a low latitude.
Some time before the shadows of the trees were
getting the grotesque and exaggerated forms which
precede the last rays of the luminary, and while
the people were still listening to their pastor, a
solitary
individual was placed on a giddy eyrie, whence
Vol. II. 13
he might note the movements of those who dwelt
in the hamlet, without being the subject of
observation
himself. A short spur of the mountain
projected
into the valley, on the side nearest to the
dwelling of the Heathcotes. A little tumbling
brook, which the melting of the snows and the
occasionally
heavy rains of the climate periodically
increased into a torrent, had worn a deep ravine in
its rocky bosom. Time, and the constant action of
water, aided by the driving storms of winter and
autumn, had converted many of the different faces
of this ravine into wild-looking pictures of the
residences
of men. There was however one spot, in
particular, around which a closer inspection than
that which the distance of the houses in the
settlement
offered, might have detected far more
plausible
signs of the agency of human hands, than any
that were afforded by the fancied resemblances of
fantastic angles and accidental formations.
Precisely at that point where a sweep of the
mountain permitted the best view of the valley, did
the rocks assume the wildest, the most confused, and
consequently the most favorable appearance for the
construction of any residence which it was desirable
should escape the curious eyes of the settlers, at
the same time that it possessed the advantage of
overlooking their proceedings. A hermit would
have chosen the place as a spot suited to distant
and calm observation of the world, while it was
every way adapted to solitary reflection and ascetic
devotion. All who have journeyed through the
narrow
and water-worn vineyards and meadows which
are washed by the Rhone, ere that river pours its
tribute into the Lake of Leman, have seen some
such site, occupied by one who has devoted his life
to seclusion and the altar, overhanging the village
of St. Maurice, in the Canton of le Valais. But
there is an air of obtrusiveness in the Swiss
hermitage
that did not belong to the place of which we
write, since the one is perched upon its high and
narrow ledge, as if to show the world in what
dangerous
and circumscribed limits God may be
worshipped
;
while the other sought exemption from
absolute solitude, while it courted secrecy with the
most jealous caution. A small hut had been erected
against the side of the rock, in a manner that
presented
an oblique angle. Care had been taken to
surround it with such natural objects as left little
reason to apprehend that its real character could
be known by any who did not absolutely mount to
the difficult shelf on which it stood. Light entered
into this primitive and humble abode by a window
that looked into the ravine, and a low door opened
on the side next the valley. The construction was
partly of stone and partly of logs, with a roof of
bark and a chimney of mud and sticks.
One who, by his severe and gloomy brow, was a
fit possessor of so secluded a tenement, was, at the
hour named, seated on a stone at the most salient
angle of the mountain, and at the place where the
eye commanded the widest and least-obstructed view
of the abodes of man in the distance. Stones had
been rolled together in a manner to form a little
breastwork in his front, so that, had there been any
wandering gaze sweeping over the face of the
mountain
,
it was far from probable that it would have
detected the presence of a man whose whole form,
with the exception of the superior parts, was so
effectually concealed.
It would have been difficult to say, whether this
secluded being had thus placed himself in order to
indulge in some habitual and fancied communication
with the little world of the valley, or whether he
sat at his post in watchfulness. There was an
appearance
of each of these occupations in his air;
for at times his eye was melancholy and softened,
as if his spirit found pleasure in the charities
natural
to the species; and at others, the brows
contracted
with sternness, while the lips became more
than usually compressed, like those of a man who
threw himself on his own innate resolution for
support
.
The solitude of the place, the air of universal
quiet which reigned above, the boundless leafy
carpet over which the eye looked from that elevated
point, and the breathing stillness of the bosom of
the woods, united to give grandeur to the scene.
The figure of the tenant of the ravine was as
immovable
as any other object of the view. It seemed,
in all but color and expression, of stone. An elbow
was leaning on the little screen in front, and the
head was supported by a hand. At the distance of
an arrow's flight, the eye might readily have
supposed
it no more than another of the accidental
imitations which had been worn in the rock by the
changes of centuries. An hour passed, and scarce
a limb had been changed, or a muscle relieved.
Either contemplation, or the patient awaiting of
some looked-for event, appeared to suspend the
ordinary
functions of life. At length, an interruption
occurred to this extraordinary inaction. A rustling,
not louder than that which would have been made
by the leap of a squirrel, was first heard in the
bushes above; it was succeeded by a crackling of
branches, and then a fragment of a rock came
bounding down the precipice, until it shot over the
head of the still motionless hermit, and fell, with a
noise that drew a succession of echoes from the
caverns of the place, into the ravine beneath.
Notwithstanding the suddenness of this
interruption
,
and the extraordinary fracas with which it was
accompanied, he, who might be supposed to be most
affected by it, manifested none of the usual
symptoms
of fear or surprise. He listened intently, until
the last sound had died away, but it was with
expectation
rather than with alarm. Arising slowly,
he looked warily about him, and then walking with a
quick step along the ledge which led to his hut, he
disappeared through its door. In another minute,
however, he was again seen at his former post; a
short carabine, such as was then used by mounted
warriors, lying across his knee. If doubt or
perplexity
beset the mind of this individual, at so
palpable
a sign that the solitude he courted was in
danger of being interrupted, it was not of a nature
sufficiently strong to disturb the equanimity of his
aspect. A second time the branches rustled, and the
sounds proceeded from a lower part of the precipice,
as if the foot that caused the disturbance was in
the act of descending. Though no one was visible,
the nature of the noise could no longer be mistaken.
It was evidently the tread of a human foot, for no
beast of a weight sufficient to produce so great an
impression, would have chosen to rove across a spot
where the support of hands was nearly as necessary
as that of the other limbs.
Come forward! said he who in all but the
accessories
of dress and hostile preparation might so
well be termed a hermitI am already here.
The words were not given to the air, for one
suddenly
appeared on the ledge at the side next the
settlement, and within twenty feet of the speaker.
When glance met glance, the surprise which
evidently
took possession of the intruder and of him
who appeared to claim a better right to be where
they met, seemed mutual. The carabine of the
latter, and a musket carried by the former, fell into
the dangerous line of aim at the same instant, and
in a moment they were thrown upwards again, as
if a common impulse controlled them. The resident
signed to the other to draw nigher, and then every
13 *
appearance of hostility disappeared in that sort of
familiarity which confidence begets.
How is it, said the former to his guest, when
both were calmly seated behind the little screen of
stones, that thou hast fallen upon this secret place?
The foot of stranger hath not often trod these rocks,
and no man before thee hath ever descended the
precipice.
A moccason is sure, returned the other with
Indian brevity. My father hath a good eye. He
can see very far from the door of his lodge.
Thou knowest that the men of my color speak
often to their Good Spirit, and they do not love to ask
his favor in the highways. This place is sacred to
his holy name.
The intruder was the young Sachem of the
Narragansetts
,
and he who, notwithstanding this
plausible
apology, so palpably sought secrecy rather than
solitude, was the man that has often been introduced
into these pages under the shade of mystery. The
instant recognition and the mutual confidence
require
no further explanation, since enough has
already
been developed in the course of the narrative,
to show that they were no strangers to each other.
Still the meeting had not taken place without
uneasiness
on the one part, and great though admirably
veiled surprise on the other. As became his high
station and lofty character, the bearing of
Conanchet
betrayed none of the littleness of a vulgar
curiosity
.
He met his ancient acquaintance with the
calm dignity of his rank, and it would have been
difficult for the most inquiring eye to have detected
a wandering glance, a single prying look, or any
other sign that he deemed the place at all
extraordinary
for such an interview. He listened to the little
explanation of the other, with grave courtesy, and
suffered a short time to elapse before he made any
reply.
The Manitou of the pale-men, he then said,
should be pleased with my father. His words are
often in the ears of the Great Spirit! The trees
and the rocks know them.
Like all of a sinful and fallen race, returned
the stranger with the severe air of the age, I have
much need of my askings. But why dost thou think
that my voice is so often heard in this secret place?
The finger of Conanchet pointed to the worn rock
at his feet, and his eye glanced furtively at the
beaten path which led between the spot and the
door of the lodge.
A Yengeese hath a hard heel, but it is softer
than stone. The hoof of the deer would pass many
times, to leave such a trail.
Thou art quick of eye, Narragansett, and yet
thy judgment may be deceived. My tongue is not
the only one that speaketh to the God of my
people.
The Sachem bent his head slightly, in
acquiescence
,
as if unwilling to press the subject. But his
companion was not so easily satisfied, for he felt the
consciousness of a fruitless attempt at deception
goading him to some plausible means of quieting
the suspicions of the Indian.
That I am now alone, may be matter of pleasure
or of accident, he added; thou knowest that this
hath been a busy and a bloody day among the
pale-men
,
and there are dead and dying in their lodges.
One who hath no wigwam of his own may have
found time to worship by himself.
The mind is very cunning, returned Conanchet;
it can hear when the ear is deafit can see when
the eye is shut. My father hath spoken to the Good
Spirit, with the rest of his tribe.
As the chief concluded, he pointed significantly
towards the distant church, out of which the excited
congregation we have described was at that moment
pouring into the green and little-trodden street of
the hamlet. The other appeared to understand his
meaning, and, at the same instant, to feel the folly,
as well as the uselessness, of attempting any longer
to mislead one that already knew so much of his
former mode of life.
Indian, thou sayest true, he rejoined gloomily:
the mind seeth far, and it seeth often in the
bitterness
of sorrow. My spirit was communing with the
spirits of those thou seest, when thy step was first
heard; besides thine own, the feet of man never
mounted to this place, except it be of those who
minister to my bodily wants. Thou sayest true; the
mental sight is keen; and far beyond those distant
hills, on which the last rays of the setting sun are
now shining so gloriously, doth mine often bear me
in spirit. Thou wast once my fellow-lodger, youth,
and much pleasure had I in striving to open thy
young mind to the truths of our race, and to teach
thee to speak with the tongue of a Christian; but
years have passed awayhark! There cometh one
up the path. Hast thou dread of a Yengeese?
The calm mien with which Conanchet had been
listening, changed to a cold smile. His hand had
felt for the lock of the musket, some time before his
companion had betrayed any consciousness of the
approaching footstep; but until questioned, no change
of countenance was visible.
Is my father afraid for his friend? he asked,
pointing in the direction of him who approached.
Is it an armed warrior?
No: he cometh with the means of sustaining a
burthen that must be borne, until it pleaseth him
who knoweth what is good for all his creatures to
ease me of it. It may be the parent of her thou
hast this day restored to her friends, or it may be
the brother; for, at times, I owe this kindness to
different members of that worthy family.
A look of intelligence shot across the swarthy
features of the chief. His decision appeared taken.
Arising, he left his weapon at the feet of his
companion
,
and moved swiftly along the ledge, as if to
meet the intruder. In another instant he returned,
bearing a little bundle closely enveloped in belts of
richly-beaded wampum. Placing the latter gently
by the side of the old man, for time had changed
the color of the solitary's hair to gray, he said, in a
low, quick voice, pointing with significance at what
he had done
The Messenger will not go back with an empty
hand. My father is wise; he will say what is good.
There was little time for further explanation.
The door of the hut had scarcely closed on
Conanchet
,
before Mark Heathcote appeared at the
point where the path bent around the angle of the
precipice.
Thou knowest what hath passed, and wilt suffer
me to depart with brief discourse, said the young
man, placing food at the feet of him he came to
seek; ha! what hast here?didst gain this in the
fray of the morning?
It is booty that I freely bestow; take it to the
house of thy father. It is left with that object. Now
tell me of the manner in which death hath dealt
with our people, for thou knowest that necessity
drove me from among them, so soon as liberty was
granted.
Mark showed no disposition to gratify the other's
wish. He gazed on the bundle of Conanchet, as if
his eye had never before looked on a similar object,
and keenly contending passions were playing about
a brow that was seldom as tranquil as suited the
self-denying habits of the times and country.
It shall be done, Narragansett! he said, speaking
between his clenched teeth; it shall be done!
Then turning on his heel, he stalked along the giddy
path with a rapidity of stride that kept the other
in fearful suspense for his safety, until his active
form had disappeared.
The recluse arose, and sought the occupant of his
humble abode.
Come forth, he said, opening the narrow door
for the passage of the Chief. The youth hath
departed with thy burthen, and thou art now alone
with an ancient associate.
Conanchet reappeared at the summons, but it
was with an eye less glowing and a brow less stern
than when he entered the little cabin. As he moved
slowly to the stone he had before occupied, his step
was arrested for a moment, and a look of
melancholy
regret seemed to be cast at the spot where
he had laid the bundle. Conquering his feelings,
however, in the habitual self-command of his people,
he resumed his seat, with the air of one that was
grave by nature, while he appeared to exert no
effort in order to preserve the admirable equanimity
of his features. A long and thoughtful silence
succeeded
,
and then the solitary spoke.
We have made a friend of the Narragansett
Chief, he said, and this league with Philip is
broken?
Yengeese, returned the other, I am full of
the blood of Sachems.
Why should the Indian and the white do each
other this violence? The earth is large, and there
is place for men of all colors and of all nations on
its surface.
My father hath found but little, said the other,
bestowing such a cautious glance at the narrow
limits of his host, as at once betrayed the sarcastic
purport of his words, while it equally bespoke the
courtesy of his mind.
A light-minded and vain prince is seated on the
throne of a once-godly nation, Chief, and darkness
has again come over a land which of late shone
with a clear and shining light! The just are made
to flee from the habitations of their infancy, and the
temples of the elect are abandoned to the
abominations
of idolatry. Oh England! England! when
will thy cup of bitterness be full?when shall this
judgment pass from thee? My spirit groaneth over
thy fallyea, my inmost soul is saddened with the
spectacle of thy misery!
Conanchet was too delicate to regard the glazed
eye and flushed forehead of the speaker, but he
listened in amazement and in ignorance. Such
expressions
had often met his ear before, and though
his tender years had probably prevented their
producing
much effect, now, that he again heard them
in his manhood, they conveyed no intelligible
meaning
to his mind. Suddenly laying a finger on the
knee of his companion, he said
The arm of my father was raised on the side
of the Yengeese, to-day; yet they give him no seat
at their council-fire!
The sinful man, who ruleth in the island whence
my people came, hath an arm that is long as his
mind is vain. Though debarred from the councils
of this valley, Chief, time hath been, when my voice
was heard in councils that struck heavily at the
power of his race. These eyes have seen justice
done on him who gave existence to the
double-tongued
instrument of Belial, that now governeth
a rich and glorious realm!
My father hath taken the scalp of a great
chief!
I helped to take his head! returned the
solitary
,
a ray of bitter exultation gleaming through
the habitual austerity of his brow.
Come.The eagle flies above the clouds, that
he may move his wings freely. The panther leaps
longest on the widest plain; the biggest fish swim
in the deep water. My father cannot stretch
himself
between these rocks. He is too big to lie down
in a little wigwam. The woods are wide; let him
change the color of his skin, and be a gray head at
the council-fire of my nation. The warriors will
listen to what he says, for his hand hath done a
strong deed!
It may not beit may not be, Narragansett.
That which hath been generated in the spirit, must
abide, and it would be `easier for the blackamoor
to become white, or for the leopard to change his
spots,' than for one who hath felt the power of the
Lord, to cast aside his gifts. But I meet thy
proffers
of amity in a charitable and forgiving spirit.
My mind is ever with my people; yet is there place
for other friendships. Break then this league with
the evil-minded and turbulent Philip, and let the
hatchet be for ever buried in the path between thy
village and the towns of the Yengeese.
Where is my village? There is a dark place
near the islands on the shores of the Great Lake;
but I see no lodges.
We will rebuild thy towns, and people them
anew. Let there be peace between us.
My mind is ever with my people; returned
the Indian, repeating the other's words, with an
emphasis that could not be mistaken.
A long and melancholy pause succeeded; and
when the conversation was renewed, it had
reference
to those events which had taken place in the
fortunes of each, since the time when they were
both tenants of the block-house that stood amid the
ancient habitations of the Heathcotes. Each
appeared
too well to comprehend the character of the
other, to attempt any further efforts towards
producing
a change of purpose; and darkness had
gathered about the place, before they arose to enter
the hut of the solitary.
CHAPTER X.
Sleep, thou hast been a grandsire, and begot
A father to me: and thou hast created
A mother and two brothers.
Cymbeline
.
The
short twilight was already passed, when old
Mark Heathcote ended the evening prayer. The
mixed character of the remarkable events of that
day had given birth to a feeling, which could find
no other relief than that which flowed from the
usual zealous, confiding, and exalted outpouring of
the spirit. On the present occasion, he had even
resorted to an extraordinary, and, what one less
devout might be tempted to think, a supererogatory
offering of thanksgiving and praise. After
dismissing
the dependants of the establishment, supported
by the arm of his son, he had withdrawn into an
inner apartment, and there, surrounded only by
those who had the nearest claims on his affections,
the old man again raised his voice to laud the Being,
who, in the midst of so much general grief, had
deigned to look upon his particular race with the
eyes of remembrance and of favor. He spoke of
his recovered grand-child by name, and he dealt
with the whole subject of her captivity among the
heathen, and her restoration to the foot of the altar,
with the fervor of one who saw the wise decrees
of Providence in the event, and with a tenderness
of sentiment that age was far from having
extinguished
.
It was at the close of this private and
peculiar worship, that we return into the presence
of the family.
The spirit of reform had driven those, who so
Vol. II. 14
violently felt its influence, into many usages that,
to say the least, were quite as ungracious to the
imagination, as the customs they termed idolatrous
were obnoxious to the attacks of their own
unaccommodating
theories. The first Protestants had
expelled so much from the service of the altar, that
little was left for the Puritan to destroy, without
incurring the risk of leaving it naked of its
loveliness
.
By a strange substitution of subtlety for
humility
,
it was thought pharisaical to bend the knee
in public, lest the great essential of spiritual worship
might be supplanted by the more attainable merit
of formula; and while rigid aspects, and prescribed
deportments of a new character, were observed
with all the zeal of converts, ancient and even
natural practices were condemned, chiefly, we
believe
,
from that necessity of innovation which
appears
to be an unavoidable attendant of all plans of
improvement, whether they are successful or the
reverse. But though the Puritans refused to bow
their stubborn limbs when the eye of man was on
them, even while asking boons suited to their own
sublimated opinions, it was permitted to assume in
private an attitude which was thought to admit of
so gross an abuse, inasmuch as it infers a claim to
a religious vitality, while in truth the soul might
only be slumbering in the security of mere moral
pretension.
On the present occasion, they who worshipped
in secret had bent their bodies to the humblest
posture of devotion. When Ruth Heathcote arose
from her knees, it was with a hand clasped in that
of the child whom her recent devotion was well
suited to make her think had been rescued from a
condition far more gloomy than that of the grave.
She had used a gentle violence to force the
wondering
being at her side to join, so far as externals
could go, in the prayer; and, now it was ended, she
sought the countenance of her daughter, in order
to read the impression the scene had produced, with
all the solicitude of a Christian, heightened by the
tenderest maternal love.
Narra-mattah, as we shall continue to call her,
in air, expression, and attitude, resembled one who
had a fancied existence in the delusion of some
exciting
dream. Her ear remembered sounds which
had so often been repeated in her infancy, and her
memory recalled indistinct recollections of most of
the objects and usages that were so suddenly
replaced
before her eyes; but the former now
conveyed
their meaning to a mind that had gained its
strength under a very different system of theology,
and the latter came too late to supplant usages that
were rooted in her affections by the aid of all those
wild and seductive habits, that are known to become
nearly unconquerable in those who have long been
subject to their influence. She stood, therefore, in
the centre of the grave, self-restrained group of
her nearest kin, like an alien to their blood,
resembling
some timid and but half-tamed tenant of
the air, that human art had endeavored to
domesticate
,
by placing it in the society of the more
tranquil
and confiding inhabitants of the aviary.
Notwithstanding the strength of her affections,
and her devotion to all the natural duties of her
station, Ruth Heathcote was not now to learn the
manner in which she was to subdue any violence
in their exhibition. The first indulgence of joy and
gratitude was over, and in its place appeared the
never-tiring, vigilant, engrossing, but regulated
watchfulness, which the events would naturally
create. The doubts, misgivings, and even fearful
apprehensions, that beset her, were smothered in
an appearance of satisfaction; and something like
gleamings of happiness were again seen playing
about a brow that had so long been clouded with
an unobtrusive but corroding care.
And thou recallest thine infancy, my Ruth?
asked the mother, when the respectful period of
silence, which ever succeeded prayer in that family,
was passed; thy thoughts have not been altogether
strangers to us, but nature hath had its place in thy
heart. Tell us, child, of thy wanderings in the forest,
and of the sufferings that one so tender must have
undergone among a barbarous people. There is
pleasure in listening to all thou hast seen and felt,
now that we know there is an end to unhappiness.
She spoke to an ear that was deaf to language like
this. Narra-mattah evidently understood her words,
while their meaning was wrapped in an obscurity
that she neither wished to nor was capable of
comprehending
.
Keeping a gaze, in which pleasure and
wonder were powerfully blended, on that soft look
of affection which beamed from her mother's eye,
she felt hurriedly among the folds of her dress, and
drawing a belt that was gaily ornamented after the
most ingenious fashion of her adopted people, she
approached her half-pleased, half-distressed parent,
and, with hands that trembled equally with timidity
and pleasure, she arranged it around her person in
a manner to show its richness to the best advantage.
Pleased with her performance, the artless being
eagerly sought approbation in eyes that bespoke
little else than regret. Alarmed at an expression she
could not translate, the gaze of Narra-mattah
wandered
,
as if it sought support against some sensation
to which she was a stranger. Whittal Ring had
stolen into the room, and missing the customary
features of her own cherished home, the looks of
the startled creature rested on the countenance of
the witless wanderer. She pointed eagerly at the
work of her hands, appealing by an eloquent and
artless gesture to the taste of one who should know
whether she had done well.
Bravely! returned Whittal, approaching
nearer
to the subject of his admiration'tis a brave
belt, and none but the wife of a Sachem could make
so rare a gift!
The girl folded her arms meekly on her bosom,
and again appeared satisfied with herself and with
the world.
Here is the hand of him visible who dealeth in
all wickedness, said the Puritan. To corrupt the
heart with vanities, and to mislead the affections by
luring them to the things of life, is the guile in
which he delighteth. A fallen nature lendeth but
too ready aid. We must deal with the child in fervor
and watchfulness, or better that her bones were lying
by the side of those little ones of thy flock, who are
already inheritors of the promise.
Respect kept Ruth silent; but, while she sorrowed
over the ignorance of her child, natural affection
was strong at her heart. With the tact of a woman,
and the tenderness of a mother, she both saw and
felt that severity was not the means to effect the
improvement they desired. Taking a seat herself,
she drew her child to her person, and, first imploring
silence by a glance at those around her, she
proceeded
,
in a manner that was dictated by the
mysterious
influence of nature, to fathom the depth of
her daughter's mind.
Come nearer, Narra-mattah; she said, using
the name to which the other would alone answer.
Thou art still in thy youth, my child; but it hath
pleased him whose will is law, to have made thee
the witness of many changes in this varying life.
Tell me if thou recallest the days of infancy, and
if thy thoughts ever returned to thy father's house,
during those weary years thou wast kept from our
view?
14*
Ruth used gentle force to draw her daughter
nearer while speaking, and the latter sunk into that
posture from which she had just arisen, kneeling, as
she had often done in infancy, at her mother's side.
The attitude was too full of tender recollections
not to be grateful, and the half-alarmed being of
the forest was suffered to retain it during most of
the dialogue that followed. But while she was thus
obedient in person, by the vacancy or rather wonder
of an eye that was so eloquent to express all the
emotions and knowledge of which she was the
mistress
,
Narra-mattah plainly manifested that little
more than the endearment of her mother's words
and manner was intelligible. Ruth saw the
meaning
of her hesitation; and, smothering the pang it
caused, she endeavored to adapt her language to the
habits of one so artless.
Even the gray heads of thy people were once
young, she resumed; and they remember the
lodges of their fathers. Does my daughter ever think
of the time when she played among the children of
the Pale-faces?
The attentive being at the knee of Ruth listened
greedily. Her knowledge of the language of her
childhood had been sufficiently implanted before
her captivity, and it had been too often exercised
by intercourse with the whites, and more
particularly
with Whittal Ring, to leave her in any doubt
of the meaning of what she now heard. Stealing
a timid look over a shoulder, she sought the
countenance
of Martha, and, studying her lineaments
for near a minute with intense regard, she laughed
aloud in the contagious merriment of an Indian girl.
Thou hast not forgotten us! That glance at her
who was the companion of thy infancy assures me,
and we shall soon again possess our Ruth in
affection
,
as we now possess her in the body. I will not
speak to thee of that fearful night when the
violence
of the savage robbed us of thy presence, nor
of the bitter sorrow which beset us at thy loss; but
there is one who must still be known to thee, my
child; He who sitteth above the clouds, who
holdeth
the earth in the hollow of his hand, and who
looketh in mercy on all that journey on the path to
which his own finger pointeth. Hath he yet a place
in thy thoughts? Thou rememberest His Holy Name,
and still thinkest of his power?
The listener bent her head aside, as if to catch
the full meaning of what she heard, the shadows of
deep reverence passing over a face that had so lately
been smiling. After a pause, she audibly murmured
the word
Manitou.
Manitou, or Jehovah; God, or King of Kings,
and Lord of Lords! it mattereth little which term is
used to express his power. Thou knowest him then,
and hast never ceased to call upon his name?
Narra-mattah is a woman. She is afraid to speak
to the Manitou aloud. He knows the voices of the
chiefs, and opens his ears when they ask help.
The Puritan groaned, but Ruth succeeded in
quelling her own anguish, lest she should disturb the
reviving confidence of her daughter.
This may be the Manitou of an Indian, she
said, but it is not the Christian's God. Thou art
of a race which worships differently, and it is proper
that thou shouldst call on the name of the Deity of
thy fathers. Even the Narragansett teacheth this
truth! Thy skin is white, and thy ears should
hearken
to the traditions of the men of thy blood.
The head of the daughter drooped at this allusion
to her color, as if she would fain conceal the
mortifying
truth from every eye; but she had not time
for answer, ere Whittal Ring drew near, and
pointing
to the burning color of her cheeks, that were
deepened as much with shame as with the heats of
an American sun, he said
The wife of the Sachem hath begun to change.
She will soon be like Nipset, all redSee, he added,
laying a finger on a part of his own arm where the
sun and the winds had not yet destroyed the original
color; the Evil Spirit poured water into his blood
too, but it will come out again. As soon as he is so
dark that the Evil Spirit will not know him, he will
go on the war-path; and then the lying Pale-faces
may dig up the bones of their fathers, and move
towards the sun-rise, or his lodge will be lined with
hair of the color of a deer!
And thou, my daughter! canst thou hear this
threat against the people of thy nationof thy
bloodof thy Godwithout a shudder?
The eye of Narra-mattah seemed in doubt; still
it regarded Whittal with its accustomed look of
kindness. The innocent, full of his imaginary glory,
raised his hand in exultation, and by gestures that
could not easily be misunderstood, he indicated the
manner in which he intended to rob his victims of
the usual trophy. While the youth was enacting
the disgusting but expressive pantomime, Ruth
watched the countenance of her child in nearly
breathless agony. She would have been relieved
by a single glance of disapprobation, by a solitary
movement of a rebellious muscle, or by the smallest
sign that the tender nature of one so lovely, and
otherwise so gentle, revolted at so unequivocal
evidence
of the barbarous practices of her adopted
people. But no Empress of Rome could have
witnessed
the dying agonies of the hapless gladiator,
no consort of a more modern prince could read the
bloody list of the victims of her husband's triumph,
nor any betrothed fair listen to the murderous deeds
of him her imagination had painted as a hero, with
less indifference to human suffering, than that with
which the wife of the Sachem of the Narragansetts
looked on the mimic representation of those exploits
which had purchased for her husband a renown so
highly prized. It was but too apparent that the
representation, rude and savage as it was, conveyed
to her mind nothing but pictures in which the
chosen companion of a warrior should rejoice. The
varying features and answering eye too plainly
proclaimed the sympathy of one taught to exult in
the success of the combatant; and when Whittal,
excited by his own exertions, broke out into an
exhibition
of a violence more ruthless even than
common
,
he was openly rewarded by another laugh.
The soft, exquisitely feminine tones of this
involuntary
burst of pleasure, sounded in the ears of Ruth
like a knell over the moral beauty of her child.
Still subduing her feelings, she passed a hand
thoughtfully over her own pallid brow, and
appeared
to muse long on the desolation of a mind that
had once promised to be so pure.
The colonists had not yet severed all those natural
ties which bound them to the eastern hemisphere.
Their legends, their pride, and in many instances
their memories, aided in keeping alive a feeling of
amity, and it might be added of faith, in favor of
the land of their ancestors. With some of their
descendants, even to the present hour, the
beau
ideal
of excellence, in all that pertains to human
qualities and human happiness, is connected with
the images of the country from which they sprung.
Distance is known to cast a softening mist, equally
over the moral and physical vision. The blue
outline
of mountain which melts into its glowing
back-ground
of sky, is not more pleasing than the pictures
which fancy sometimes draws of less material things;
but, as he draws near, the disappointed traveller
too often finds nakedness and deformity, where he
so fondly imagined beauty only was to be seen. No
wonder then that the dwellers of the simple
provinces
of New-England blended recollections of the
country they still called home, with most of their
poetical pictures of life. They retained the
language
,
the books, and most of the habits, of the
English. But different circumstances, divided
interests
,
and peculiar opinions, were gradually
beginning
to open those breaches which time has since
widened, and which promises soon to leave little in
common between the two people, except the same
forms of speech and a common origin: it is to be
hoped that some charity may be blended with these
ties.
The singularly restrained habits of the
religionists
,
throughout the whole of the British provinces,
were in marked opposition to the mere
embellishments
of life. The arts were permitted only as they
served its most useful and obvious purposes. With
them, music was confined to the worship of God,
and, for a long time after the original settlement,
the song was never known to lead the mind astray
from what was conceived to be the one great object
of existence. No verse was sung, but such as
blended
holy ideas with the pleasures of harmony; nor
were the sounds of revelry ever heard within their
borders. Still, words adapted to their particular
condition had come into use, and though poetry was
neither a common nor a brilliant property of the
mind, among a people thus disciplined in ascetic
practices, it early exhibited its power in quaint
versification, that was always intended, though with
a success it is almost pardonable to doubt, to
redound
to the glory of the Deity. It was but a
natural
enlargement of this pious practice, to adapt
some of these spiritual songs to the purposes of the
nursery.
When Ruth Heathcote passed her hand
thoughtfully
across her brow, it was with a painful
conviction
that her dominion over the mind of her child
was sadly weakened, if not lost for ever. But the
efforts of maternal love are not easily repulsed.
An idea flashed upon her brain, and she proceeded
to try the efficacy of the experiment it suggested.
Nature had endowed her with a melodious voice,
and an ear that taught her to regulate sounds in a
manner that seldom failed to touch the heart. She
possessed the genius of music, which is melody,
unweakened by those exaggerated affectations with
which it is often encumbered by what is pretendingly
called science. Drawing her daughter nearer to her
knee, she commenced one of the songs then much
used by the mothers of the Colony, her voice scarcely
rising above the whispering of the evening air, in
its first notes, but gradually gaining, as she
proceeded
,
the richness and compass that a strain so
simple required.
At the first low breathing notes of this nursery
song, Narra-mattah became as motionless as if her
rounded and unfettered form had been wrought in
marble. Pleasure lighted her eyes, as strain
succeeded
strain; and ere the second verse was ended,
her look, her attitude, and every muscle of her
ingenuous features, were eloquent in the expression
of delight. Ruth did not hazard the experiment
without trembling for its result. Emotion imparted
feeling to the music, and when, for the third time
in the course of her song, she addressed her child,
she saw the soft blue eyes that gazed wistfully on
her face swimming in tears. Encouraged by this
unequivocal evidence of success, nature grew still
more powerful in its efforts, and the closing verse
was sung to an ear that nestled near her heart, as
it had often done during the early years of
Narra-mattah
while listening to its melancholy melody.
Content was a quiet but an anxious witness of
this touching evidence of a reviving intelligence
between his wife and child. He best understood
the look that beamed in the eyes of the former,
while her arms were, with extreme caution, folded
around her who still leaned upon her bosom, as if
fearful one so timid might be frightened from her
security by any sudden or unaccustomed
interruption
.
A minute passed in the deepest silence. Even
Whittal Ring was lulled into quiet, and long and
sorrowing years had passed since Ruth enjoyed
moments of happiness so pure and unalloyed. The
stillness was broken by a heavy step in the outer
room; a door was thrown open by a hand more
violent than common, and then young Mark
appeared
,
his face flushed with exertion, his brow
seemingly retaining the frown of battle, and with
a tread that betrayed a spirit goaded by some fierce
and unwelcome passion. The burthen of Conanchet
was on his arm. He laid it upon a table; then
pointing, in a manner that appeared to challenge
attention, he turned, and left the room as abruptly
as he had entered.
A cry of joy burst from the lips of Narra-mattah,
the instant the beaded belts caught her eye. The
arms of Ruth relaxed their hold in surprise, and
before amazement had time to give place to more
connected ideas, the wild being at her knee had
flown to the table, returned, resumed her former
posture, opened the folds of the cloth, and was
holding before the bewildered gaze of her mother
the patient features of an Indian babe.
It would exceed the powers of the unambitious
pen we wield, to convey to the reader a just idea
of the mixed emotions that struggled for mastery
in the countenance of Ruth. The innate and
never-dying
sentiment of maternal joy was opposed by all
those feelings of pride, that prejudice could not fail
to implant even in the bosom of one so meek. There
was no need to tell the history of the parentage of
the little suppliant, who already looked up into
her face, with that peculiar calm which renders
his race so remarkable. Though its glance was
weakened by infancy, the dark glittering eye of
Conanchet was there; there were also to be seen
the receding forehead and the compressed lip of
the father; but all these marks of his origin were
softened by touches of that beauty which had
rendered the infancy of her own child so
remarkable
.
See! said Narra-mattah, raising the infant still
nearer to the riveted gaze of Ruth;  'tis a Sachem
of the red men! The little eagle hath left his nest
too soon.
Ruth could not resist the appeal of her beloved.
Bending her head low, so as entirely to conceal her
own flushed face, she imprinted a kiss on the
forehead
of the Indian boy. But the jealous eye of the
young mother was not to be deceived. Narra-mattah
detected the difference between the cold salute and
those fervent embraces she had herself received,
and disappointment produced a chill about her own
heart. Replacing the folds of the cloth with quiet
dignity, she arose from her knees, and withdrew in
sadness to a distant corner of the room. There she
took a seat, and with a glance that might almost be
termed reproachful, she commenced a low Indian
song to her infant.
The wisdom of Providence is in this, as in all
its dispensations; whispered Content over the
shoulder
of his nearly insensible partner. Had we
received
her as she was lost, the favor might have
exceeded our deservings. Our daughter is grieved
that thou turnest a cold eye on her babe.
The appeal was sufficient for one whose affections
had been wounded rather than chilled. It recalled
Ruth to recollection, and it served at once to
dissipate
the shades of regret that had been
unconsciously
Vol. II. 15
permitted to gather around her brow. The
displeasure, or it would be more true to term it
sorrow, of the young mother was easily appeased.
A smile on her infant brought the blood back to
her heart in a swift and tumultuous current; and
Ruth, herself, soon forgot that she had any reason
for regret, in the innocent delight with which her
own daughter now hastened to display the physical
excellence of the boy. From this scene of natural
feeling, Content was too quickly summoned by the
intelligence that some one without awaited his
presence, on business of the last importance to the
welfare of the settlement.
CHAPTER XI.
It will have blood; they say, blood
Will have blood!
Macbeth
.
The
visiters were Dr. Ergot, the Reverend Meek
Wolfe, Ensign Dudley, and Reuben Ring. Content
found these four individuals seated in an outer room,
in a grave and restrained manner, that would have
done no discredit to the self-command of an Indian
council. He was saluted with those staid and
composed
greetings which are still much used in the
intercourse of the people of the Eastern States of
this Republic, and which have obtained for them a
reputation, where they are little known, of a want
of the more active charities of our nature. But that
was peculiarly the age of sublimated doctrines, of
self-mortification, and of severe moral government,
and most men believed it a merit to exhibit, on all
occasions, the dominion of the mind over the mere
animal impulses. The usage, which took its rise in
exalted ideas of spiritual perfection, has since grown
into a habit, which, though weakened by the
influence
of the age, still exists to a degree that often
leads to an erroneous estimate of character.
At the entrance of the master of the house, there
was some such decorous silence as that which is
known to precede the communications of the
aborigines
.
At length Ensign Dudley, in whom matter,
most probably in consequence of its bulk, bore
more than an usual proportion to his less material
part, manifested some evidences of impatience that
the divine should proceed to business. Thus
admonished
,
or possibly conceiving that a sufficient
concession had been made to the dignity of man's
nature, Meek opened his mouth to speak.
Captain Content Heathcote, he commenced,
with that mystical involution of his subject which
practice had rendered nearly inseparable from all
his communications; Captain Content Heathcote,
this hath been a day of awful visitations, and of
gracious temporal gifts. The heathen hath been
smitten severely by the hand of the believer, and
the believer hath been made to pay the penalty of
his want of faith, by the infliction of a savage
agency
.
Azazel hath been loosened in our village, the
legions of wickedness have been suffered to go at
large in our fields, and yet the Lord hath
remembered
his people, and hath borne them through a
trial of blood as perilous as was the passage of his
chosen nation through the billows of the Red Sea.
There is cause of mourning, and cause of joy, in
this manifestation of his will; of sorrow that we
have merited his anger, and of rejoicing that enough
of redeeming grace hath been found to save the
Gomorrah of our hearts. But I speak to one trained
in spiritual discipline, and schooled in the vicissitudes
of the world, and further discourse is not necessary
to quicken his apprehension. We will therefore
turn to more instant and temporal exercises. Have
all of thy household escaped unharmed throughout
the strivings of this bloody day?
We praise the Lord that such hath been his
pleasure, returned Content. Other than as
sorrow
hath assailed us through the mourning of friends,
the blow hath fallen lightly on me and mine.
Thou hast had thy season; the parent ceaseth
to chastise, while former punishments are
remembered
.
But here is Sergeant Ring, with matter to
communicate, that may still leave business for thy
courage and thy wisdom.
Content turned his quiet look upon the yeoman,
and seemed to await his speech. Reuben Ring,
who was a man of many solid and valuable
qualities
,
would most probably have been exercising the
military functions of his brother-in-law, at that
very moment, had he been equally gifted with a
fluent discourse. But his feats lay rather in doing
than in speaking, and the tide of popularity had in
consequence set less strongly in his favor than might
have happened had the reverse been the case. The
present, however, was a moment when it was
necessary
to overcome his natural reluctance to speak,
and it was not long before he replied to the
inquiring
glance of his commander's eye.
The Captain knows the manner in which we
scourged the savages at the southern end of the
valley, the sturdy yeoman began, and it is not
necessary to deal with the particulars at length.
There were six-and-twenty red-skins slain in the
meadows, besides as many more that left the ground
in the arms of their friends. As for the people, we
got a few hurts, but each man came back on his
own limbs.
This is much as the matter hath been reported.
Then there was a party sent to brush the woods
on the trail of the Indians, resumed Reuben,
without
appearing to regard the interruption. The
scouts broke off in pairs in the duty, and finally
men got to searching singly, of which number I
was one. The two men of whom there is
question
Of what men dost speak? demanded Content.
The two men of whom there is question,
returned
the other, continuing the direct course of his
own manner of relating events, without appearing
to see the necessity of connecting the threads of
his communication; the men of whom I have
spoken
to the Minister and the Ensign
Proceed, said Content, who understood his man.
After one of these men was brought to his end,
I saw no reason for making the day bloodier than
it already was, the more especially as the Lord had
caused it to begin with a merciful hand which shed
its bounties on my own dwelling. Under such an
opinion of right-doing, the other was bound and led
into the clearings.
Thou hast made a captive?
The lips of Reuben scarce severed as he
muttered
a low assent; but the Ensign Dudley took upon
himself the duty of entering into further
explanations
,
which the point where his kinsman left the
narrative enabled him to do with sufficient
intelligence
.
As the Sergeant hath related, he said, one
of the heathen fell, and the other is now without,
awaiting a judgment in the matter of his fortune.
I trust there is no wish to harm him, said
Content
,
glancing an eye uneasily around at his
companions
.
Strife hath done enough in our
settlement
this day. The Sergeant hath a right to claim
the scalp-bounty, for the man that is slain; but for
him that liveth, let there be mercy!
15 *
Mercy is a quality of heavenly origin, replied
Meek Wolfe, and it should not be perverted to
defeat the purposes of heavenly wisdom. Azazel
must not triumph, though the tribe of the
Narragansetts
should be swept with the besom of
destruction
.
Truly, we are an erring and a fallible race,
Captain Heathcote; and the greater, therefore, the
necessity that we submit, without rebellion, to the
inward monitors that are implanted, by grace, to
teach us the road of our duty
I cannot consent to shed blood, now that the
strife hath ceased, hastily interrupted Content.
Praised be Providence! we are victors; and it is
time to lean to councils of charity.
Such are the deceptions of a short-sighted
wisdom
!
returned the divine, his dim, sunken eye
shining with the promptings of an exaggerated and
subtle spirit. The end of all is good, and we may
not, without mortal danger, presume to doubt the
suggestions of heavenly gifts. But there is not
question
here concerning the execution of the captive.
since he proffereth to be of service in far greater
things than any that can depend on his life or death.
The heathen rendered up his liberty with little
struggle, and hath propositions that may lead us to
a profitable conclusion of this day's trials.
If he can aid in aught that shall shorten the
perils and wantonness of this ruthless war, he shall
find none better disposed to listen than I.
He professeth ability to do that service.
Then, of Heaven's mercy! let him be brought
forth, that we counsel on his proposals.
Meek made a gesture to Sergeant Ring, who
quitted
the apartment for a moment, and shortly after
returned followed by his captive. The Indian was
one of those dark and malignant-looking savages
that possess most of the sinister properties of their
condition, with few or none of the redeeming
qualities
.
His eye was lowering and distrustful, bespeak
ing equally apprehension and revenge; his form of
that middling degree of perfection which leaves as
little to admire as to condemn, and his attire such
as denoted him one who might be ranked among
the warriors of a secondary class. Still, in the
composure
of his mien, the tranquillity of his step, and
the self-possession of all his movements, he displayed
that high bearing, his people rarely fail to exhibit,
ere too much intercourse with the whites begins to
destroy their distinctive traits.
Here is the Narragansett, said Reuben Ring,
causing his prisoner to appear in the centre of the
room; he is no chief, as may be gathered from his
uncertain look.
If he effect that of which there hath been
question
,
his rank mattereth little. We seek to stop the
currents of blood that flow like running water, in
these devoted Colonies.
This will he do, rejoined the divine, or we
shall hold him answerable for breach of promise.
And in what doth he profess to aid in stopping
the work of death?
By yielding the fierce Philip, and his savage
ally, the roving Conanchet, to the judgment. Those
chiefs destroyed, our temple may be entered in
peace, and the voice of thanksgiving shall again
rise in our Bethel, without the profane interruption
of savage shrieks.
Content started, and even recoiled a step, as he
listened to the nature of the proposed
peace-offering
.
And have we warranty for such a proceeding,
should this man prove true? he asked, in a voice
that sufficiently denoted his own doubts of the
propriety
of such a measure.
There is the law, the necessities of a suffering
nature, and God's glory, for our justification, drily
returned the divine.
This outsteppeth the discreet exercise of a
delegated
authority. I like not to assume so great power,
without written mandates for its execution.
The objection hath raised a little difficulty in
my own mind, observed Ensign Dudley; and as
it hath set thoughts at work, it is possible that what
I have to offer will meet the Captain's good
approbation
.
Content knew that his ancient servitor was,
though often uncouth in its exhibition, at the
bottom
a man of humane heart. On the other hand,
while he scarce admitted the truth to himself, he
had a secret dread of the exaggerated sentiments
of his spiritual guide; and he consequently listened
to the interruption of Eben, with a gratification he
scarcely wished to conceal.
Speak openly, he said; when men counsel in
a matter of this weight, each standeth on the surety
of his proper gifts.
Then may this business be dispatched without
the embarrassment the Captain seems to dread. We
have an Indian, who offers to lead a party through
the forests to the haunts of the bloody chiefs, therein
bringing affairs to the issue of manhood and
discretion
.
And wherein do you propose any departure
from the suggestions that have already been made?
Ensign Dudley had not risen to his present rank,
without acquiring a suitable portion of the reserve
which is so often found to dignify official sentiments.
Having ventured the opinion already placed,
however
vaguely, before his hearers, he was patiently
awaiting its effects on the mind of his superior, when
the latter, by his earnest and unsuspecting
countenance
,
no less than by the question just given,
showed
that he was still in the dark as to the expodient
the subaltern wished to suggest.
I think there will be no necessity for making
more captives, resumed Eben, since the one we
have appears to create difficulties in our councils.
If there be any law in the Colony, which says that
men must strike with a gentle hand in open battle,
it is a law but little spoken of in common discourse;
and though no pretender to the wisdom of
legislators
,
I will make bold to add, it is a law that may as
well be forgotten until this outbreaking of the
savages
shall be quelled.
We deal with an enemy that never stays his
hand at the cry of mercy, observed Meek Wolfe,
and though charity be the fruit of Christian
qualities
,
there is a duty greater than any which
belongeth
to earth. We are no more than weak and feeble
instruments in the hands of Providence, and as such
our minds should not be hardened to our inward
promptings. If evidence of better feeling could be
found in the deeds of the heathen, we might raise
our hopes to the completion of things; but the
Powers
of Darkness still rage in their hearts, and we
are taught to believe that the tree is known by its
fruits.
Content signed to all to await his return, and left
the room. In another minute, he was seen leading
his daughter into the centre of the circle. The
half-alarmed
young woman clasped her swaddled boy to
her bosom, as she gazed timidly at the grave faces
of the borderers; and her eye recoiled in fear, when
its hurried glance met the sunken, glazed, excited,
and yet equivocal-looking organ of the Reverend
Mr. Wolfe.
Thou hast said that the savage never hearkens
to the cry of mercy, resumed Content; here is
living evidence that thou hast spoken in error. The
misfortune that early befell my family, is not
unknown
to any in this settlement; thou seest in this
trembling creature the daughter of our loveher
we have so long mourned. The wept of my
household
is again with us; our hearts have been
oppressed
,
they are now gladdened. God hath returned our
child!
There was a deep, rich pathos in the tones of
the father, that affected most of his auditors, though
each manifested his sensibilities in a manner suited
to his particular habits of mind. The nature of the
divine was touched, and all the energies of his
severe
principles were wanting to sustain him above
the manifestation of a weakness that he might have
believed derogatory to his spiritual exaltation of
character. He therefore sat mute, with hands folded
on his knee, betraying the struggles of an
awakened
sympathy only by a firmer compression of the
interlocked fingers, and an occasional and
involuntary
movement of the stronger muscles of the face.
Dudley suffered a smile of pleasure to lighten his
broad, open countenance; and the physician, who
had hitherto been merely a listener, uttered a few
low syllables of admiration of the physical
perfection
of the being before him, with which there was
mingled some evidence of natural good feeling.
Reuben Ring was the only individual who openly
betrayed the whole degree of the interest he took
in the restoration of the lost female. The stout
yeoman arose, and, moving to the entranced
Narra-mattah
,
he took the infant into his large hands, and
for a moment the honest borderer gazed at the boy
with a wistful and softened eye. Then raising the
diminutive face of the infant to his own expanded
and bold features, he touched it cheek with his
lips, and returned the babe to its mother, who
witnessed
the whole proceeding in some such
tribulation
as the startled wren exhibits when the foot of
the urchin is seen to draw too near the nest of its
young.
Thou seest that the hand of the Narragansett
hath been stayed, said Content, when a deep silence
had succeeded this little movement, and speaking in
a tone which betrayed hopes of victory.
The ways of Providence are mysterious!
returned
Meek; wherein they bring comfort to the
heart, it is right that we exhibit gratitude; and
wherein they are charged with present affliction, it
is meet to bow with humbled spirits to their
orderings
.
But the visitations on families are merely
He paused, for at that moment a door opened,
and a party entered bearing a burthen, which they
deposited, with decent and grave respect, on the
floor, in the very centre of the room. The
unceremonious
manner of the entrance, the assured and
the common gravity of their air, proclaimed that
the villagers felt their errand to be a sufficient
apology for this intrusion. Had not the business of
the past day naturally led to such a belief, the
manner
and aspects of those who had borne the burthen
would have announced it to be a human body.
I had believed that none fell in this day's strife,
but those who met their end near my own door,
said Content, after a long, respectful, and sorrowing
pause. Remove the face-cloth, that we may know
on whom the blow hath fallen.
One of the young men obeyed. It was not easy
to recognise, through the mutilations of savage
barbarity
,
the features of the sufferer. But a second
and steadier look showed the gory and still agonized
countenance of the individual who had, that
morning
,
left the Wish-Ton-Wish on the message of the
colonial authorities. Even men as practised as those
present, in the horrible inventions of Indian cruelty,
turned sickening away from a spectacle that was
calculated to chill the blood of all who had not
become
callous to human affliction. Content made a
sign to cover the miserable remnants of mortality,
and hid his face, with a shudder.
It is not necessary to dwell on the scene that
followed
.
Meek Wolfe availed himself of this
unexpected
event, to press his plan on the attention of
the commanding officer of the settlement, who was
certainly far better disposed to listen to his
proposals
,
than before this palpable evidence of the
ruthless
character of their enemies was presented to
his view. Still Content listened with reluctance,
nor was it without the intention of exercising an
ulterior discretion in the case, that he finally
consented
to give orders for the departure of a body of
men, with the approach of the morning light. As
much of the approach was managed with those
half-intelligible allusions that distinguished men of
their habits, it is probable that every individual
present had his own particular views of the subject;
though it is certain, one and all faithfully believed
that he was solely influenced by a justifiable regard
to his temporal interest, which was in some degree
rendered still more praiseworthy by a reference to
the service of his Divine Master.
As the party returned, Dudley lingered a moment,
alone, with his former master. The face of the
honest-meaning Ensign was charged with more than
its usual significance; and he even paused a little,
after all were beyond hearing, ere he could muster
resolution to propose the subject that was so
evidently
uppermost in his mind.
Captain Content Heathcote, he at length
commenced
,
evil or good comes not alone in this life.
Thou hast found her that we sought with so much
pain and danger, but thou hast found with her more
than a Christian gentleman can desire. I am a man
of humble station, but I may make bold to know
what should be the feelings of a father, whose child
is restored, replenished by such an over-bountiful
gift.
Speak plainer, said Content, firmly.
Then I would say, that it may not be grateful
to one who taketh his place among the best in this
Colony, to have an offspring with an Indian cross of
blood, and over whose birth no rite of Christian
marriage hath been said. Here is Abundance, a
woman of exceeding usefulness in a newly-settled
region, hath made Reuben a gift of three noble
boys this very morning. The accession is little
known, and less discoursed of, in that the good wife
is accustomed to such liberality, and that the day
hath brought forth still greater events. Now a child,
more or less, to such a woman, can neither raise
question among the neighbors, nor make any
extraordinary
difference to the household. My brother
Ring would be happy to add the boy to his stock;
and should there be any remarks concerning the color
of the younker, at a future day, it should give no
reason of surprise, had the whole four been born, on
the day of such an inroad, red as Metacom himself!
Content heard his companion to the end, without
interruption. His countenance, for a single instant,
as the meaning of the Ensign became unequivocal,
reddened with a worldly feeling to which he had
long been a stranger; but the painful expression as
quickly disappeared, and in its place reigned the
meek submission to Providence that habitually
characterized
his mien.
That I have been troubled with this vain thought.
I shall not deny, he answered; but the Lord
hath given me strength to resist. It is his will that
one sprung of heathen lineage shall come beneath
my roof, and let his will be done! My child, and all
that are hers, are welcome.
Ensign Dudley pressed the point no further, and
they separated.
Vol. II. 16
CHAPTER XII.
Tarry a little;there is something else.
Merchant of Venice
.
We
shift the scene. The reader will transport
himself from the valley of the Wish-Ton-Wish, to the
bosom of a deep and dark wood.
It may be thought that such scenes have been
too often described to need any repetition. Still, as
it is possible that these pages may fall into the hands
of some who have never quitted the older members
of the Union, we shall endeavor to give them a
faint impression concerning the appearance of the
place to which it has become our duty to transfer
the action of the tale.
Although it is certain that inanimate, like animate
nature, has its period, the existence of the tree has
no fixed and common limit. The oak, the elm, and
the linden, the quick-growing sycamore and the tall
pine, has each its own laws for the government of
its growth, its magnitude, and its duration. By this
provision of nature, the wilderness, in the midst of
so many successive changes, is always maintained
at the point nearest to perfection, since the
accessions
are so few and gradual as to preserve its
character.
The American forest exhibits in the highest
degree the grandeur of repose. As nature never
does violence to its own laws, the soil throws out
the plant which it is best qualified to support, and
the eye is not often disappointed by a sickly
vegetation
.
There ever seems a generous emulation in
the trees, which is not to be found among others of
different families, when left to pursue their quiet
existence in the solitude of the fields. Each struggles
towards the light, and an equality in bulk and a
similarity in form are thus produced, which scarce
belong to their distinctive characters. The effect
may easily be imagined. The vaulted arches
beneath
are filled with thousands of high, unbroken
columns, which sustain one vast and trembling
canopy of leaves. A pleasing gloom and an
imposing
silence have their interminable reign below,
while an outer and another atmosphere seems to
rest on the cloud of foliage.
While the light plays on the varying surface
of the tree-tops, one sombre and little-varied hue
colors the earth. Dead and moss-covered logs;
mounds covered with decomposed vegetable
substances
,
the graves of long-past generations of trees;
cavities left by the fall of some uprooted trunk;
dark fungi, that flourish around the decayed roots
of those about to lose their hold, with a few slender
and delicate plants of a minor growth, and which
best succeed in the shade, form the
accompaniments
of the lower scene. The whole is tempered,
and in summer rendered grateful, by a freshness
which equals that of the subterranean vault,
without
possessing any of its chilling dampness. In the
midst of this gloomy solitude, the foot of man is
rarely heard. An occasional glimpse of the
bounding
deer or trotting moose, is almost the only
interruption
on the earth itself; while the heavy
bear or leaping panther, is, at long intervals, met
seated on the branches of some venerable tree.
There are moments, too, when troops of hungry
wolves are found hunting on the trail of the deer;
but these are seen rather as exceptions to the
stillness
of the place, than as accessories that should
properly be introduced into the picture. Even the
birds are, in common, mute, or when they do break
the silence, it is in a discordance that suits the
character of their wild abode.
Through such a scene two men were industriously
journeying, on the day which succeeded the inroad
last described. They marched as wont, one after
the other, the younger and more active leading the
way through the monotony of the woods, as
accurately
and as unhesitatingly as the mariner directs
his course by the aid of the needle over the waste
of waters. He in front was light, agile, and
seemingly
unwearied; while the one who followed was
a man of heavy mould, whose step denoted less
practice in the exercise of the forest, and possibly
some failing of natural vigor.
Thine eye, Narragansett, is an unerring compass
by which to steer, and thy leg a never-wearied
steed; said the latter, casting the but of his musket
on the end of a mouldering log, while he leaned on
the barrel for support. If thou movest on the
war-path
with the same diligence as thou usest in our
errand of peace, well may the Colonists dread thy
enmity.
The other turned, and, without seeking aid from
the gun which rested against his shoulder, he pointed
at the several objects he named, and answered
My father is this aged sycamore; it leans against
the young oakConanchet is a straight pine. There
is great cunning in gray hairs, added the chief,
stepping lightly forward until a finger rested on
the arm of Submission; can they tell the time
when we shall lie under the moss like a dead
hemlock
?
That exceedeth the wisdom of man. It is enough,
Sachem, if when we fall, we may say with truth,
that the land we shadowed is no poorer for our
growth. Thy bones will lie in the earth where thy
fathers trod, but mine may whiten in the vault of
some gloomy forest.
The quiet of the Indian's face was disturbed. The
pupils of his dark eyes contracted, his nostrils dilated,
and his full chest heaved; and then all reposed, like
the sluggish ocean, after a vain effort to heave its
waters into some swelling wave, during a general
calm.
Fire hath scorched the prints of my father's
moccasons from the earth, he said, with a smile
that was placid though bitter, and my eyes cannot
find them. I shall die under that shelter, pointing
through an opening in the foliage to the blue void;
the falling leaves will cover my bones.
Then hath the Lord given us a new bond of
friendship. There is a yew-tree and a quiet
church-yard
in a country afar, where generations of my
race sleep in their graves. The place is white with
stones that bear the name of
Submission suddenly ceased to speak, and when
his eye was raised to that of his companion, it was
just in time to detect the manner in which the
curious interest of the latter changed suddenly to
cold reserve, and to note the high courtesy of the
air with which the Indian turned the discourse.
There is water beyond the little hill, he said,
Let my father drink and grow stronger, that he
may live to lie in the clearings.
The other bowed, and they proceeded to the spot
in silence. It would seem, by the length of time that
was now lost in taking the required refreshment, that
the travellers had journeyed long and far. The
Narragansett
ate more sparingly, however, than his
companion
,
for his mind appeared to sustain a weight
that was far more grievous than the fatigue which
had been endured by the body. Still his composure
was little disturbed outwardly, for during the silent
repast he maintained the air of a dignified warrior,
rather than that of a man whose air could be much
affected by inward sorrow. When nature was
appeased
,
16 *
they both arose, and continued their route
through the pathless forest.
For an hour after quitting the spring, the progress
of our two adventurers was swift, and
uninterrupted
by any passing observation or momentary pause.
At the end of that time, however, the speed of
Conanchet
began to slacken, and his eye, instead of
maintaining its steady and forward direction, was
seen to wander with some of the appearance of
indecision
.
Thou hast lost those secret signs by which we
have so far threaded the woods, observed his
companion
;
one tree is like another, and I see no
difference
in this wilderness of nature; but if thou art
at fault, we may truly despair of our object.
Here is the nest of the eagle, returned
Conanchet
,
pointing at the object he named perched on the
upper and whitened branches of a dead pine; and
my father may see the council-tree in this oakbut
there are no Wampanoags!
There are many eagles in this forest, nor is that
oak one that may not have its fellow. Thine eye
hath been deceived, Sachem, and some false sign
hath led us astray.
Conanchet looked at his companion attentively.
After a moment, he quietly asked
Did my father ever mistake his path, in going
from his wigwam to the place where he looked upon
the house of his Great Spirit?
The matter of that often-travelled path was
different, Narragansett. My foot had worn the rock
with many passings, and the distance was a span.
But we have journeyed through leagues of forest,
and our route hath lain across brook and hill, through
brake and morass, where human vision hath not
been able to detect the smallest sign of the presence
of man.
My father is old, said the Indian, respectfully.
His eye is not as quick as when he took the scalp
of the Great Chief, or he would know the print of a
moccasonsee, making his companion observe the
mark of a human foot that was barely discernible
by the manner in which the dead leaves had been
displaced; his rock is worn, but it is harder than
the ground. He cannot tell by its signs who passed,
or when.
Here is truly that which ingenuity may
portray
as the print of man's foot; but it is alone, and
may be some accident of the wind.
Let my father look on every side; he will see
that a tribe hath passed.
This may be true, though my vision is unequal
to detect that thou wouldst show. But if a tribe
hath passed, let us follow.
Conanchet shook his head, and spread the fingers
of his two hands in a manner to describe the radii
of a circle.
Hugh! he said, starting even while he was
thus significantly answering by gestures, a
moccason
comes!
Submission, who had so often and so recently
been arrayed against the savages, involuntarily
sought the lock of his carabine. His look and action
were menacing, though his roving eye could see no
object to excite alarm.
Not so Conanchet. His quicker and more
practised
vision soon caught a glimpse of the warrior
who was approaching, occasionally concealed by the
trunks of trees, and whose tread on the dried leaves
had first betrayed his proximity. Folding his arms
on his naked bosom, the Narragansett chief awaited
the coming of the other, in an attitude of calmness
and dignity. Neither did he speak nor suffer a muscle
to play, until a hand was placed on one of his arms,
and he who had drawn near said, in tones of amity
and respect
The young Sachem hath come to look for his
brother?
Wampanoag, I have followed the trail, that
your ears may listen to the talk of a Pale-face.
The third person in this interview was Metacom.
He shot a haughty and fierce glance at the stranger,
and then turned to his companion in arms, with
recovered
calmness, to reply.
Has Conanchet counted his young men since
they raised the whoop? he asked, in the language
of the aborigines. I saw many go into the fields,
that never came back. Let the white man die.
Wampanoag, he is led by the wampum of a
Sachem. I have not counted my young men; but
I know that they are strong enough to say, that what
their chief hath promised shall be done.
If the Yengeese is a friend of my brother, he is
welcome. The wigwam of Metacom is open; let
him enter it.
Philip made a sign for the others to follow, and
led the way to the place he had named.
The spot chosen by Philip for his temporary
encampment
,
was suited to such a purpose. There
was a thicket, denser than common, on one of its
sides; a steep and high rock protected and sheltered
its rear; a swift and wide brook dashed over
fragments
that had fallen, with time, from the
precipice
in its front; and towards the setting sun, a
whirlwind had opened a long and melancholy glade
through the forest. A few huts of brush leaned
against the base of the hill, and the scanty
implements
of their domestic economy were scattered
among the habitations of the savages. The whole
party did not number twenty; for, as has been said,
the Wampanoag had acted latterly more by the
agency of his allies, than with the materials of his
own proper force.
The three were soon seated on a rock, whose foot
was washed by the rapid current of the tumbling
water. A few gloomy-looking and fierce Indians
watched the conference, in the back-ground.
My brother hath followed my trail, that my
ears may hear the words of a Yengeese, Philip
commenced, after a sufficient period had elapsed to
escape the imputation of curiosity. Let him speak.
I have come singly into the jaws of the lion,
restless and remorseless leader of the savages,
returned
the bold exile, that you may hear the words
of peace. Why hath the son seen the acts of the
English so differently from the father? Massassoit
was a friend of the persecuted and patient pilgrims
who have sought rest and refuge in this Bethel of
the faithful; but thou hast hardened thy heart to
their prayers, and seekest the blood of those who
wish thee no wrong. Doubtless thy nature is one of
pride and mistaken vanities, like that of all thy race,
and it hath seemed needful to the vain-glory of thy
name and nation to battle against men of a
different
origin. But know there is one who is master of
all here on earth, as he is King of Heaven! It is
his pleasure that the sweet savor of his worship
should arise from the wilderness. His will is law,
and they that would withstand do but kick against
the pricks. Listen then to peaceful counsels, that
the land may be parcelled justly to meet the wants
of all, and the country be prepared for the incense
of the altar.
This exhortation was uttered in a deep and almost
unearthly voice, and with a degree of excitement
that was probably increased by the intensity with
which the solitary had lately been brooding over his
peculiar opinions, and the terrible scenes in which
he had so recently been an actor. Philip listened
with the high courtesy of an Indian prince.
Unintelligible
as was the meaning of the speaker, his
countenance betrayed no gleaming of impatience,
his lip no smile of ridicule. On the contrary, a noble
and lofty gravity reigned in every feature; and
ignorant
as he was of what the other wished to say,
his attentive eye and bending head expressed every
wish to comprehend.
My pale friend hath spoken very wisely, he
said, when the other ceased to speak. But he doth
not see clearly in these woods; he sits too much in
the shade. His eye is better in a clearing. Metacom
is not a fierce beast. His claws are worn out, his
legs are tired with travelling. He cannot jump far.
My pale friend wants to divide the land. Why
trouble the Great Spirit to do his work twice? He
gave the Wampanoags their hunting-grounds, and
places on the salt lake to catch their fish and clams,
and he did not forget his children the Narragansetts.
He put them in the midst of the water, for he saw
that they could swim. Did he forget the Yengeese?
or did he put them in a swamp, where they would
turn into frogs and lizards?
Heathen, my voice shall never deny the bounties
of my God! His hand hath placed my fathers in a
fertile land, rich in the good things of the world,
fortunate in position, sea-girt and impregnable.
Happy is he who can find justification in dwelling
within its borders!
An empty gourd lay on the rock at the side of
Metacom. Bending over the stream, he filled it to
the brim with water, and held the vessel before the
eyes of his companions.
See, he said, pointing to the even surface of
the fluid: so much hath the Great Spirit said it
shall hold. Now, he added, filling the hollow of
the other hand from the brook, and casting its
contents
into the gourd, now my brother knows that
some must come away. It is so with his country.
There is no longer room in it for my pale friend.
Did I attempt to deceive thine ears with this
tale, I should lay falsehood to my soul. We are
many, and sorry am I to say that some among us
are like unto them that were called Legion. But
to say that there is not still place for all to die where
they are born, is to utter damning untruth.
The land of the Yengeese is then goodvery
good, returned Philip; but their young men like
one that is better.
Thy nature, Wampanoag, is not equal to
comprehend
the motives which have led us hither, and
our discourse is getting vain.
My brother Conanchet is a Sachem. The leaves
that fall from the trees of his country, in the season
of frosts, blow into my hunting-grounds. We are
neighbors and friends, slightly bending his head to
the Narragansett. When a wicked Indian runs
from the islands to the wigwams of my people, he is
whipt and sent back. We keep the path between us
open, only for honest red men.
Philip spoke with a sneer, that his habitual
loftiness
of manner did not conceal from his associate
chief, though it was so slight as entirely to escape
the observation of him who was the subject of his
sarcasm. The former took the alarm, and for the
first time during the dialogue did he break silence.
My pale father is a brave warrior, said the
young Sachem of the Narragansetts. His hand
took the scalp of the Great Sagamore of his
people
!
The countenance of Metacom changed instantly.
In place of the ironical scorn that was gathering
about his lip, its expression became serious and
respectful
.
He gazed steadily at the hard and
weatherbeaten
features of his guest, and it is probable that
words of higher courtesy than any he had yet used
would have fallen from him, had not, at that
moment
,
a signal been given, by a young Indian set to
watch on the summit of the rock, that one
approached
.
Both Metacom and Conanchet appeared to hear
this cry with some uneasiness. Neither however
arose, nor did either betray such evidence of alarm
as denoted a deeper interest in the interruption,
than the circumstances might very naturally create.
A warrior was shortly seen entering the
encampment
,
from the side of the forest which was known
to lie in the direction of the Wish-Ton-Wish.
The moment Conanchet saw the person of the
newly-arrived man, his eye and attitude resumed
their former repose, though the look of Metacom
still continued gloomy and distrustful. The
difference
in the manner of the chiefs was not however
sufficiently strong to be remarked by Submission,
who was about to resume the discourse, when the
new-comer moved past the cluster of warriors in
the encampment, and took his seat near them, on a
stone so low, that the water laved his feet. As
usual there was no greeting between the Indians for
some moments, the three appearing to regard the
arrival as a mere thing of course. But the
uneasiness
of Metacom prompted a communication sooner
than common.
Mohtucket, he said, in the language of their
tribe, hath lost the trail of his friends. We thought
the crows of the pale-men were picking his bones!
There was no scalp at his belt, and Mohtucket
was ashamed to be seen among the young men with
an empty hand.
He remembered that he had too often come
back without striking a dead enemy, returned
Metacom, about whose firm mouth lurked an
expression
of ill-concealed contempt. Has he now
touched a warrior?
The Indian, who was merely a man of the
inferior
class, held up the trophy which hung at his
girdle to the examination of his chief. Metacom
looked at the disgusting object with the calmness,
and nearly with the interest, that a virtuoso would
lavish on an antique memorial of some triumph of
former ages. His finger was thrust through a hole
in the skin, and then, while he resumed his former
position, he observed drily
A bullet hath hit the head. The arrow of
Mohtucket doth little harm!
Metacom hath never looked on his young man
like a friend, since the brother of Mohtucket was
killed.
The glance that Philip cast at his underling, though
it was not unmingled with suspicion, was one of
princely and savage scorn. Their white auditor
had not been able to understand the discourse, but
the dissatisfaction and uneasiness of the eyes of both
were too obvious not to show that the conference
was far from being amicable.
The Sachem hath discontent with his young
man, he observed, and from this may he
understand
the nature of that which leadeth many to quit
the land of their fathers, beneath the rising sun, to
come to this wilderness in the west. If he will now
listen, I will touch further on the business of my
errand
,
and deal more at large with the subject we
have but so lightly skimmed.
Philip manifested attention. He smiled on his
guest, and even bowed his assent to the proposal;
still his keen eye seemed to read the soul of his
subordinate, through the veil of his gloomy visage.
There was a play of the fingers of his right hand,
when the arm fell from its position across his bosom,
to his thigh, as if they itched to grasp the knife
whose buck-horn handle lay within a few inches of
their reach. Yet his air to the white man was
composed and dignified. The latter was again about
to speak, when the arches of the forest suddenly
rung with the report of a musket. All in and near
the encampment sprung to their feet at the
well-known
Vol. II. 17
sound, and yet all continued as motionless as
if so many dark but breathing statues had been
planted there. The rustling of leaves was heard,
and then the body of the young Indian, who had
been posted on the rock, rolled to the edge of the
precipice, whence it fell, like a log, on the yielding
roof of one of the lodges beneath. A shout issued
from the forest behind, a volley roared among the
trees, and glancing lead was whistling through the
air, and cutting twigs from the undergrowth on
every side. Two more of the Wampanoags were
seen rolling on the earth, in the death-agony.
The voice of Annawon was heard in the
encampment
,
and at the next instant the place was
deserted.
During this startling and fearful moment, the
four individuals near the stream were inactive.
Conanchet and his Christian friend stood to their
arms, but it was rather as men cling to the means
of defence in moments of great jeopardy, than with
any intention of offensive hostilities. Metacom
seemed undecided. Accustomed to receive and
inflict
surprises, a warrior so experienced could not
be disconcerted; still he hesitated as to the course
he ought to take. But when Annawon, who was
nearer the scene, sounded the signal of retreat, he
sprung towards the returned straggler, and with a
single blow of his tomahawk brained the traitor.
Glances of fierce revenge, and of inextinguishable
though disappointed hatred, were exchanged
between
the victim and his chief, as the former lay
on the rock gasping for breath; and then the latter
turned in his tracks, and raised the dripping weapon
over the head of the white man.
Wampanoag, no! said Conanchet, in a voice
of thunder. Our lives are one.
Philip hesitated. Fierce and dangerous passions
were struggling in his breast, but the habitual
self-command
of the wily politician of those woods
prevailed
.
Even in that scene of blood and alarm, he
smiled on his powerful and fearless young ally; then
pointing to the deepest shades of the forest, he
bounded towards them with the activity of a deer.
CHAPTER XIII.
But, peace be with him!
That life is better life, past fearing death,
Than that which lives to fear.
Measure for Measure
.
Courage
is both a comparative and an improvable
virtue. If the fear of death be a weakness common to
the race, it is one that is capable of being diminished
by frequent exposure, and even rendered extinct by
reflection. It was therefore with sensibilities
entirely
changed from their natural course, that the
two individuals who were left alone by the retreat
of Philip, saw the nature and the approach of the
danger that now beset them. Their position near
the brook had so far protected them from the bullets
of the assailants; but it was equally obvious to both,
that in a minute or two the Colonists would enter
an encampment that was already deserted. Each,
in consequence, acted according to those opinions
which had been fostered by the habits of their
respective
lives.
As Conanchet had no act of vengeance, like that
which Metacom had performed, immediately before
his eyes, he had, at the first alarm, given all his
faculties to the nature of the attack. The first
minute was sufficient to understand its character,
and the second enabled him to decide.
Come, he said hastily, but with perfect
self-possession
,
pointing as he spoke to the swift-running
stream at his feet; we will go with the water; let
the marks of our trail run before.
Submission hesitated. There was something like
haughty military pride in the stern determination
of his eye, which seemed reluctant to incur the
disgrace of a flight so unequivocal, and, as he might
have believed, so unworthy of his character.
No, Narragansett! he answered; flee for thy
life, but leave me to reap the harvest of my deeds.
They can but leave my bones by the side of those
of this traitor at my feet.
The mien of Conanchet was neither excited nor
displeased. He quietly drew the corner of his light
robe over a shoulder, and was about to resume his
seat on the stone from which he had but a minute
before arisen, when his companion again urged him
to fly.
The enemies of a chief must not say that he
led his friend into a trap, and that when his leg was
fast he ran away himself, like a lucky fox. If my
brother stays to be killed, Conanchet will be found
near him.
Heathen, heathen! returned the other, moved
nearly to tears by the loyalty of his guide; many
a Christian man might take lessons from thy faith.
Lead onI will follow, at the utmost of my speed.
The Narragansett sprung into the brook, and
took its downward coursea direction opposite to
that which Philip had chosen. There was wisdom
in this expedient, for though their pursuers might
see that the water was troubled, there was no
certainty
as to the direction of the fugitives. Conanchet
had foreseen this little advantage, and, with the
instinctive
readiness of his people, he did not fail to
make it of service. Metacom had been influenced
by the course taken by his warriors, who had
retired
under shelter of the rocks.
Ere the two fugitives had gone any great distance,
they heard the shouts of their enemies in the
encampment
;
and soon after, scattering shot announced
that Philip had already rallied his people to
resistance
.
There was an assurance of safety in the
latter
circumstance, which caused them to relax their
speed.
My foot is not as active as in days that are past,
said Submission; we will therefore recover strength
while we may, lest we be yet taken at emergency.
Narragansett, thou hast ever kept thy faith with
me, and come of what race or worship in what
manner thou mayst, there is one to remember it.
My father looked with the eye of a friend on
the Indian boy, that was kept like a young bear in
a cage. He taught him to speak with the tongue of
a Yengeese.
We passed weary months together in our prison,
Chief; and Apollyon must have been strong in a
heart, to resist the opportunity of friendship in such
a situation. But, even there, my confidence and care
were repaid, for without thy mysterious hints,
gathered
from signs thou hadst gleaned thyself during
the hunt, it would not have been in my power to
warn my friends that thy people contemplated an
attack, the unhappy night of the burning.
Narragansett
,
we have done many acts of kindness,
each in his own fashion, and I am ready to confess
this last not to be the least of thy favors. Though
of white blood and of Christian origin, I can almost
say that my heart is Indian.
Then die an Indian's death! shouted a voice,
within twenty feet of the spot where they were
wading down the stream.
The menacing words were rather accompanied
17 *
than seconded by a shot, and Submission fell.
Conanchet
cast his musket into the water, and turned
to raise his companion.
It was merely age dealing with the slippery
stones of the brook; said the latter, as he recovered
his footing. That had well-nigh been a fatal
discharge
!
but God, for his own purpose, hath still
averted the blow.
Conanchet did not speak. Seizing his gun, which
lay at the bottom of the stream, he drew his friend
after him to the shore, and plunged into the thicket
that lined its banks. Here they were momentarily
protected from missiles. But the shouts that
succeeded
the discharge of the muskets, were
accompanied
by yells that he knew to proceed from
Pequots
and Mohegans, tribes that were in deadly
hostility to his own people. The hope of concealing
their trail from such pursuers was not to be indulged,
and for his companion to escape by flight he knew
to be impossible. There was no time to lose. In
such emergencies, with an Indian, thought takes the
character of instinct. The fugitives stood at the
foot of a sapling, whose top was completely
concealed
by masses of leaves, which belonged to the
under-brush that clustered around its trunk. Into
this tree he assisted Submission to ascend, and then,
without explaining his own views, he instantly left
the spot, rendering his own trail as broad and
perceptible
as possible, by beating down the bushes as
he passed.
The expedient of the faithful Narragansett was
completely successful. Before he had got a hundred
yards from the place, he saw the foremost of the
hostile Indians hunting like blood-hounds on his
footsteps. His movement was slow, until he saw
that, having his person in view, all of the pursuers
had passed the tree. Then, the arrow parting from
the bow was scarce swifter than his flight.
The pursuit now partook of all the exciting
incidents
and ingenious expedients of an Indian chase.
Conanchet was soon hunted from his cover, and
obliged to trust his person in the more open parts
of the forest. Miles of hill and ravine, of plain, of
rocks, of morass and stream, were crossed, and still
the trained warrior held on his way, unbroken in
spirit and scarce wearied in limb. The merit of a
savage, in such an employment, rests more on his
bottom than on his speed. The three or four
Colonists
,
who had been sent with the party of amicable
Indians to intercept those who might attempt to
escape down the stream, were early thrown out;
and the struggle was now entirely between the
fugitive and men equally practised in limb and
ingenious
in expedient.
The Pequots had a great advantage in their
number
.
The frequent doublings of the fugitive kept
the chase within the circle of a mile, and as each
of his enemies tired, there were always fresh
pursuers
to take his place. In such a contest, the result
could not be questionable. After more than two
hours of powerful exertion, the foot of Conanchet
began to fail, and his speed very sensibly to flag.
Exhausted by efforts that had been nearly
supernatural
,
the breathless warrior cast his person
prostrate
on the earth, and lay for several minutes as
if he were dead.
During this breathing-time, his throbbing pulses
grew more calm, his heart beat less violently, and
the circulation was gradually returning to the
tranquil
flow of nature in a state of rest. It was at this
moment, when his energies were recruited by rest,
that the chief heard the tread of the moccasons on
his trail. Rising, he looked back on the course over
which he had just passed with so much pain. But
a single warrior was in view. Hope for an instant
regained the ascendancy, and he raised his musket
to fell his approaching adversary. The aim was
cool, long, and it would have been fatal, had not the
useless tick of the lock reminded him of the
condition
of the gun. He cast the wet and unserviceable
piece away, and grasped his tomahawk; but a band
of Pequots rushed in to the rescue, rendering
resistance
madness. Perceiving the hopelessness of his
situation, the Sachem of the Narragansetts dropped
his tomahawk, loosened his belt, and advanced
unarmed
,
with a noble resignation, to meet his foes.
In the next instant, he was their prisoner.
Bring me to your chief, said the captive,
haughtily
,
when the common herd into whose hands he
had fallen would have questioned him on the
subject
of his companions and of his own fate. My
tongue is used to speak with Sachems.
He was obeyed, and before an hour had passed,
the renowned Conanchet stood confronted with his
most deadly enemy.
The place of meeting was the deserted
encampment
of the band of Philip. Here most of the
pursuers
had already assembled, including all of the
Colonists who had been engaged in the expedition.
The latter consisted of Meek Wolfe, Ensign Dudley,
Sergeant Ring, and a dozen private men of the
village.
The result of the enterprise was, by this time,
generally known. Though Metacom, its principal
object, had escaped; yet, when it was understood
that the Sachem of the Narragansetts had fallen
into their hands, there was not an individual of the
party who did not think his personal risk more than
amply compensated. Though the Mohegans and
Pequots restrained their exultation, lest the pride
of their captive should be soothed by such an
evidence
of his importance, the white men drew around
the prisoner with an interest and a joy they did not
care to conceal. Still, as he had yielded to an
Indian
,
there was an affectation of leaving the chief
to the clemency of his conquerors. Perhaps some
deeply-pondered schemes of policy had its influence
in this act of seeming justice.
When Conanchet was placed in the centre of the
curious circle, he found himself immediately in
presence of the principal chief of the tribe of the
Mohegans. It was Uncas, son of that Uncas whose
fortunes had also prevailed, aided by the whites, in
the conflict with his father, the hapless but noble
Miantonimoh. Fate had now decreed, that the
same evil star, which had governed the destinies of
the ancestor, should extend its influence to the
second
generation.
The race of Uncas, though weakened of its power,
and shorn of much of its peculiar grandeur, by a
vicious alliance with the English, still retained most
of the fine qualities of savage heroism. He, who
now stood forth to receive his captive, was a warrior
of middle age, of just proportions, of a grave though
fierce aspect, and of an eye and countenance that
expressed all those contradictory traits of character
which render the savage warrior almost as
admirable
as he is appalling. Until this moment, the rival
chieftains had never met, except in the confusion
of battle. For a few minutes, neither spoke.
Each stood regarding the fine outlines, the eagle
eye, the proud bearing, and the severe gravity, of
the other, in secret admiration, but with a calmness
so immovable, as entirely to conceal the workings
of his thoughts. At length, they began to assume
miens suited to the part each was to enact in the
coming scene. The countenance of Uncas became
ironical and exulting, while that of his captive grew
still more cold and unconcerned.
My young men, said the former, have taken
a fox skulking in the bushes. His legs were very
long; but he had no heart to use them.
Conanchet folded his arms on his bosom, and the
glance of his quiet eye seemed to tell his enemy.
that devices so common were unworthy of them
both. The other either understood its meaning, or
loftier feelings prevailed; for he added, in a better
taste
Is Conanchet tired of his life, that he comes
among my young men?
Mohican, said the Narragansett chief, he has
been there before; if Uncas will count his warriors,
he will see that some are wanting.
There are no traditions among the Indians of
the islands! said the other, with an ironical glance
at the chiefs near him. They have never heard
of Miantonimoh; they do not know such a field as
the Sachem's plain!
The countenance of the prisoner changed. For
a single instant, it appeared to grow dark, as if a
deep shadow were cast athwart it; and then every
feature rested, as before, in dignified repose. His
conqueror watched the play of his lineaments, and
when he thought nature was getting the ascendancy,
exultation gleamed about his own fierce eye; but
when the self-possession of the Narragansett
returned
,
he affected to think no more of an effort that
had been fruitless.
If the men of the islands know little, he
continued
,
it is not so with the Mohicans. There was
once a great Sachem among the Narragansetts; he
was wiser than the beaver, swifter than the moose,
and more cunning than the red fox. But he could
not see into to-morrow. Foolish counsellors told
him to go upon the war-path against the Pequots
and Mohicans. He lost his scalp; it hangs in the
smoke of my wigwam. We shall see if it will know
the hair of its son. Narragansett, here are wise
men of the Pale-faces; they will speak to you. If
they offer a pipe, smoke; for tobacco is not plenty
with your tribe.
Uncas then turned away, leaving his prisoner to
the interrogatories of his white allies.
Here is the look of Miantonimoh, Sergeant
Ring, observed Ensign Dudley to his wife's brother,
after he had contemplated for a reasonable time
the features of the prisoner. I see the eye and
the tread of the father, in this young Sachem. And
more, Sergeant Ring; the chief favors the boy we
picked up in the fields some dozen years agone, and
kept in the block for the matter of many months,
caged like a young panther. Hast forgotten the
night, Reuben, and the lad, and the block? A fiery
oven is not hotter than that pile was getting, before
we dove into the earth. I never fail to think of it,
when the good Minister is dealing powerfully with
the punishments of the wicked, and the furnaces
of Tophet!
The silent yeoman comprehended the
disconnected
allusions of his relative, nor was he slow in seeing
the palpable resemblance between their prisoner
and the Indian boy whose person had once been so
familiar to his eye. Admiration and surprise were
blended, in his honest face, with an expression that
appeared to announce deep regret. As neither of
these individuals, however, was the principal
personage
of their party, each was fain to remain an
attentive and an interested observer of that which
followed.
Worshipper of Baal! commenced the
sepulchral
voice of the divine; it has pleased the King
of Heaven and Earth to protect his people! The
triumph of thy evil nature hath been short, and
now cometh the judgment!
These words were uttered to ears that affected
deafness. In the presence of his most deadly foe,
and a captive, Conanchet was not a man to suffer
his resolution to waver. He looked coldly and
vacantly
on the speaker, nor could the most suspicious
or the most practised eye have detected in his mien
his knowledge of the English language. Deceived
by the stoicism of the prisoner, Meek muttered a
few words, in which the Narragansett was strangely
dealt by, denunciations and petitions in his favor
being blended in the quaint and exaggerated
fashions
of the times; and then he submitted to the
interference
of those present, who were charged with
the duty of deciding on the fate of the Indian.
Although Eben Dudley was the principal and the
efficient military man in this little expedition from
the valley, he was accompanied by those whose
authority
was predominant in all matters that did not
strictly appertain to the executive portion of the
duty. Commissioners, named by the Government of
the Colony, had come out with the party, clothed
with power to dispose of Philip, should that dreaded
chief, as was expected, fall into the hands of the
English. To these persons the fate of Conanchet
was now referred.
We shall not detain the narrative to dwell on the
particulars of the council. The question was gravely
considered, and it was decided with a deep and
conscientious sense of the responsibility of those
who acted as judges. Several hours were passed
in deliberation, Meek opening and closing the
deliberations
by solemn prayers. The judgment was
then announced to Uncas, by the divine himself.
The wise men of my people have consulted
together
,
in the matter of this Narragansett, he said,
and their spirits have wrestled powerfully with
the subject. In coming to their conclusion, if it
wear the aspect of time-serving, let all remember,
the Providence of Heaven hath so interwoven the
interests of man with its own good purposes, that
to the carnal eye they may outwardly seem to be
inseparable. But that which is here done is done
in good faith to our ruling principle, which is good
faith to thee and to all others who support the
altar
in this wilderness. And herein is our decision:
We commit the Narragansett to thy justice, since
it is evident that while he is at large, neither thou,
who art a feeble prop to the church in these
regions
,
nor we, who are its humble and unworthy
servitors, are safe. Take him, then, and deal with
him according to thy wisdom. We place limits to
thy power, in only two things. It is not meet that
any born of humanity, and having human
sensibilities
,
should suffer more in the flesh than may be
necessary to the ends of duty: we therefore decree
that thy captive shall not die by torture; and, for
the better security of this our charitable decision,
two of our number shall accompany thee and him
to the place of execution; it being always supposed,
it is thy intention to inflict the pains of death.
Another condition of this concession to a foreordered
necessity, is, that a Christian minister may be at
hand, in order that the sufferer may depart with
the prayers of one accustomed to lift his voice in
petitions to the footstool of the Almighty.
The Mohegan chief heard this sentence with deep
attention. When he found he was to be denied the
satisfaction of proving, or perhaps of overcoming,
the resolution of his enemy, a deep cloud passed
across his swarthy visage. But the strength of his
tribe had long been broken, and to resist would
have been as unprofitable as to repine would have
been unseemly. The conditions were therefore
accepted
,
and preparations were accordingly made
among the Indians to proceed to judgment.
These people had few contradictory principles to
appease, and no subtleties to distract their decision.
Direct, fearless, and simple in all their practices,
they did little more than gather the voices of the
Vol. II. 18
chiefs, and acquaint their captive with the result.
They knew that fortune had thrown an implacable
enemy into their hands, and they believed that
self-preservation
demanded his life. To them it mattered
little whether he had arrows in his hands, or had
yielded himself an unarmed prisoner. He knew the
risk he ran in submitting, and he had probably
consulted
his own character, rather than their benefit,
in throwing away his arms. They therefore
pronounced
the judgment of death against their captive,
merely respecting the decree of their white allies,
which had commanded them to spare the torture.
So soon as this determination was known, the
Commissioners of the Colony hastened away from
the spot, with consciences that required some aid
from the stimulus of their subtle doctrines, in order
to render them quiet. They were, however,
ingenious
casuists; and as they hurried along their
return path, most of the party were satisfied that
they had rather manifested a merciful interposition,
than exercised any act of positive cruelty.
During the two or three hours which had passed
in these solemn and usual preparations, Conanchet
was seated on a rock, a close but apparently an
unmoved
spectator of all that passed. His eye was
mild, and at times melancholy; but its brightness
and its steadiness remained unimpaired. When his
sentence was announced, it exhibited no change;
and he saw all the pale-men depart, with the
calmness
he had maintained throughout. It was only as
Uncas, attended by the body of his party and the
two white superintendents who had been left,
approached
,
that his spirit seemed to awaken.
My people have said that there shall be no more
wolves in the woods, said Uncas; and they have
commanded our young men to slay the hungriest
of them all.
It is well! coldly returned the other.
A gleaming of admiration, and perhaps of
humanity
,
came over the grim countenance of Uncas,
as he gazed at the repose which reigned in the firm
features of his victim. For an instant, his purpose
wavered.
The Mohicans are a great tribe! he added;
and the race of Uncas is getting few. We will
paint our brother so that the lying Narragansetts
shall not know him, and he will be a warrior on the
main land.
This relenting of his enemy had a corresponding
effect on the generous temper of Conanchet. The
lofty pride deserted his eye, and his look became
milder and more human. For a minute, intense
thought brooded around his brow; the firm muscles
of his mouth played a little, though scarcely enough
to be seen, and then he spoke.
Mohican, he said, why should your young
men be in a hurry? My scalp will be the scalp of a
Great Chief to-morrow. They will not take two,
should they strike their prisoner now.
Hath Conanchet forgotten any thing, that he is
not ready?
Sachem, he is always readyButhe
paused, and spoke in tones that faltered,does
a Mohican live alone?
How many suns doth the Narragansett ask?
One: when the shadow of that pine points
towards the brook, Conanchet will be ready. He
will then stand in its shade, with naked hands.
Go, said Uncas, with dignity; I have heard
the words of a Sagamore.
Conanchet turned, and passing swiftly through
the silent crowd, his person was soon lost in the
surrounding forest.
CHAPTER XIV.
Therefore, lay bare your bosom.
Merchant of Venice
.
The
night that succeeded was wild and
melancholy
.
The moon was nearly full, but its place in
the heavens was only seen, as the masses of vapor
which drove through the air occasionally opened,
suffering short gleams of fitful light to fall on the
scene below. A south-western wind rather moaned
than sighed through the forest, and there were
moments when its freshness increased, till every leaf
seemed a tongue, and each low plant appeared to
be endowed with the gift of speech. With the
exception
of these imposing and not unpleasing natural
sounds, there was a solemn quiet in and about the
village of the Wish-Ton-Wish. An hour before the
moment when we resume the action of the legend,
the sun had settled into the neighboring forest, and
most of its simple and laborious inhabitants had
already sought their rest.
The lights however still shone through many of
the windows of the Heathcote house, as, in the
language of the country, the dwelling of the Puritan
was termed. There was the usual stirring industry
in and about the offices, and the ordinary calm was
reigning in the superior parts of the habitation. A
solitary man was to be seen on its piazza. It was
young Mark Heathcote, who paced the long and
narrow gallery, as if impatient of some interruption
to his wishes.
The uneasiness of the young man was of short
continuance; for, ere he had been many minutes at
his post, a door opened, and two light and timid
forms glided out of the house.
Thou hast not come alone, Martha, said the
youth, half-displeased. I told thee that the
matter
I had to say was for thine own ear.
It is our Ruth. Thou knowest, Mark, that she
may not be left alone, for we fear her return to the
forest. She is like some ill-tamed fawn, that would
be apt to leap away at the first well-known sound
from the woods. Even now, I fear that we are too
much asunder.
Fear nothing; my sister fondles her infant, and she
thinketh not of flight; thou seest I am here to
intercept
her, were such her intention. Now speak with
candor, Martha, and say if thou meant in sincerity
that the visits of the Hartford gallant were less to
thy liking than most of thy friends have believed?
What I have said cannot be recalled.
Still it may be repented of.
I do not number the dislike I may feel for the
young man, among my failings. I am too happy,
here, in this family, to wish to quit it. And now that
our sisterthere is one speaking to her at this
moment, Mark!
'Tis only the innocent, returned the young man,
glancing his eye to the other end of the piazza.
They confer often together. Whittal hath just
come in from the woods, whither he is much inclined
to pass an hour or two, each evening. Thou wast
saying that now we have our sister?
I feel less desire to change my abode.
Then why not stay with us for ever, Martha?
Hist! interrupted his companion, who, though
conscious of what she was about to listen to, shrunk,
with the waywardness of female nature, from the
very declaration she most wished to hear, hist
there was a movement. Ah! our Ruth and Whittal
are fled!
18 *
They seek some amusement for the babethey
are near the out-buildings. Then why not accept a
right to remain for ever
It may not be, Mark, cried the girl, wresting
her hand from his grasp; they are fled!
Mark reluctantly released his hold, and followed
to the spot where his sister had been sitting. She
was, in truth, gone; though some minutes passed
before even Martha seriously believed that she had
disappeared without an intention of returning. The
agitation of both rendered the search ill-directed
and uncertain, and there was perhaps a secret
satisfaction
in prolonging their interview even in this
vague manner, that prevented them for some time
from giving the alarm. When that moment did come,
it was too late. The fields were examined, the
orchards and out-houses thoroughly searched,
without
any traces of the fugitives. It would have been
useless to enter the forest in the darkness, and all
that could be done, in reason, was to set a watch
during the night, and to prepare for a more active
and intelligent pursuit in the morning.
But, long before the sun arose, the small and
melancholy
party of the fugitives threaded the woods at
such a distance from the valley, as would have
rendered
the plan of the family entirely nugatory.
Conanchet
had led the way over a thousand forest knolls,
across water-courses, and through dark glens,
followed
by his silent partner, with an industry that
would have baffled the zeal of even those from
whom they fled. Whittal Ring, bearing the infant on
his back, trudged with unwearied step in the rear.
Hours had passed in this manner, and not a syllable
had been uttered by either of the three. Once or
twice, they had stopped at some spot where water,
limpid as the air, gushed from the rocks; and,
drinking
from the hollows of their hands, the march had
been resumed with the same speechless industry as
before.
At length Conanchet paused. He studied the
position
of the sun, gravely, and took a long and
anxious
look at the signs of the forest, in order that he
might not be deceived in its quarter. To an
unpractised
eye, the arches of the trees, the leaf-covered
earth, and the mouldering logs, would have seemed
everywhere the same. But it was not easy to
deceive
one so trained in the woods. Satisfied equally
with the progress he had made, and with the hour,
the chief signed to his two companions to place
themselves at his side, and took a seat on a low shelf
of rock, that thrust its naked head out of the side
of a hill.
For many minutes, after all were seated, no one
broke the silence. The eye of Narra-mattah sought
the countenance of her husband, as the eye of
woman
seeks instruction from the expression of features
that she has been taught to revere; but still she
spoke not. The innocent laid the patient babe at
the feet of its mother, and imitated her reserve.
Is the air of the woods pleasant to the
Honey-suckle
,
after living in the wigwam of her people?
asked Conanchet, breaking the long silence. Can a
flower, which blossomed in the sun, like the shade?
A woman of the Narragansetts is happiest in
the lodge of her husband.
The eye of the chief met her confiding look with
affection, and then it fell, mild and full of kindness,
on the features of the infant that lay at their feet.
There was a minute, during which an expression of
bitter melancholy gathered about his brow.
The Spirit that made the earth, he continued,
is very cunning. He has known where to put the
hemlock, and where the oak should grow. He has
left the moose and the deer to the Indian hunter,
and he has given the horse and the ox to a Pale-face.
Each tribe hath its hunting-grounds, and its game.
The Narragansetts know the taste of a clam, while
the Mohawks eat the berries of the mountains.
Thou hast seen the bright bow which shines in the
skies, Narra-mattah, and knowest how one color is
mixed with another, like paint on a warrior's face.
The leaf of the hemlock is like the leaf of the
sumach; the ash, the chestnut; the chestnut, the
linden; and the linden, the broad-leaved tree which
bears the red fruit in the clearing of the Yengeese;
but the tree of the red fruit is little like the
hemlock
!
Conanchet is a tall and straight hemlock, and
the father of Narra-mattah is a tree of the
clearing
,
that bears the red fruit. The Great Spirit was
angry when they grew together.
The sensitive wife understood but too well the
current of the chief's thoughts. Suppressing the pain
she felt, however, she answered, with the readiness
of a woman whose imagination was quickened by
her affections.
What Conanchet hath said is true. But the
Yengeese have put the apple of their own land on
the thorn of our woods, and the fruit is good!
It is like that boy, said the chief, pointing to
his son; neither red nor pale. No, Narra-mattah;
what the Great Spirit hath commanded, even a
Sachem must do.
And doth Conanchet say this fruit is not good?
asked his wife, lifting the smiling boy with a mother's
joy before his eyes.
The heart of the warrior was touched. Bending
his head, he kissed the babe, with such fondness as
parents less stern are wont to exhibit. For a
moment
,
he appeared to have satisfaction in gazing at
the promise of the child. But, as he raised his head,
his eye caught a glimpse of the sun, and the whole
expression of his countenance changed. Motioning
to his wife to replace the infant on the earth, he
turned to her with solemnity, and continued
Let the tongue of Narra-mattah speak without
fear. She hath been in the lodges of her father,
and hath tasted of their plenty. Is her heart glad?
The young wife paused. The question brought
with it a sudden recollection of all those reviving
sensations, of that tender solicitude, and of those
soothing sympathies, of which she had so lately been
the subject. But these feelings soon vanished; for,
without daring to lift her eyes to meet the attentive
and anxious gaze of the chief, she said firmly,
though with a voice that was subdued by diffidence
Narrah-mattah is a wife.
Then will she listen to the words of her
husband
.
Conanchet is a chief no longer. He is a
prisoner of the Mohicans. Uncas waits for him in
the woods!
Notwithstanding the recent declaration of the
young wife, she heard of this calamity with little
of the calmness of an Indian woman. At first, it
seemed as if her senses refused to comprehend the
meaning of the words. Wonder, doubt, horror, and
fearful certainty, each in its turn prevailed; for
she was too well schooled in all the usages and
opinions
of the people with whom she dwelt, not to
understand
the jeopardy in which her husband was
placed.
The Sachem of the Narragansetts a prisoner
of Mohican Uncas! she repeated in a low tone,
as if the sound of her voice were necessary to
dispel
some horrible illusion. No! Uncas is not a
warrior to strike Conanchet!
Hear my words, said the chief, touching the
shoulder of his wife, as one arouses a friend from
his slumbers. There is a Pale-face in these woods
who is a burrowing fox. He hides his head from
the Yengeese. When his people were on the trail,
barking like hungry wolves, this man trusted to a
Sagamore. It was a swift chase, and my father is
getting very old. He went up a young hickory,
like a bear, and Conanchet led off the lying tribe.
But he is not a moose. His legs cannot go like
running
water, for ever!
And why did the great Narragansett give his
life for a stranger?
The man is a brave; returned the Sachem,
proudly: he took the scalp of a Sagamore!
Again Narra-mattah was silent. She brooded, in
nearly stupid amazement, on the frightful truth.
The Great Spirit sees that the man and his wife
are of different tribes, she at length ventured to
rejoin. He wishes them to become the same
people
.
Let Conanchet quit the woods, and go into the
clearings with the mother of his boy. Her white
father will be glad, and Mohican Uncas will not
dare to follow.
Woman, I am a Sachem and a warrior among
my people!
There was a severe and cold displeasure in the
voice of Conanchet, that his companion had never
before heard. He spoke in the manner of a chief
to his woman, rather than with that manly softness
with which he had been accustomed to address the
scion of the Pale-faces. The words came over her
heart like a withering chill, and affliction kept her
mute. The chief himself sate a moment longer in
a stern calmness, and then rising in displeasure, he
pointed to the sun, and beckoned to his companions
to proceed. In a time that appeared to the
throbbing
heart of her who followed his swift footsteps,
but a moment, they had turned a little eminence,
and, in another minute, they stood in the presence
of a party that evidently awaited their coming.
This grave group consisted only of Uncas, two of
his fiercest-looking and most athletic warriors, the
divine, and Eben Dudley.
Advancing rapidly to the spot where his enemy
stood, Conanchet took his post at the foot of the fatal
tree. Pointing to the shadow, which had not yet
turned towards the east, he folded his arms on his
naked bosom, and assumed an air of haughty
unconcern
.
These movements were made in the midst
of a profound stillness.
Disappointment, unwilling admiration, and
distrust
,
all struggled through the mask of practised
composure, in the dark countenance of Uncas. He
regarded his long-hated and terrible foe, with an
eye that seemed willing to detect some lurking signs
of weakness. It would not have been easy to say,
whether he most felt respect, or regret, at the faith
of the Narragansett. Accompanied by his two grim
warriors, the chief examined the position of the
shadow with critical minuteness, and when there no
longer existed a pretext for affecting to doubt the
punctuality of their captive, a deep ejaculation of
assent issued from the chest of each. Like some
wary judge, whose justice is fettered by legal
precedents
,
as if satisfied there was no flaw in the
proceedings
,
the Mohegan then signed to the white men
to draw near.
Man of a wild and unreclaimed nature!
commenced
Meek Wolfe, in his usual admonitory and
ascetic tones, the hour of thy existence draws to
its end! Judgment hath had rule; thou hast been
weighed in the balances, and art found wanting.
But Christian charity is never weary. We may not
resist the ordinances of Providence, but we may
temper the blow to the offender. That thou art
here to die, is a mandate decreed in equity, and
rendered awful by mystery; but further,
submission
to the will of Heaven doth not exact. Heathen,
thou hast a soul, and it is about to leave its earthly
tenement for the unknown world
Until now, the captive had listened with the
courtesy of a savage when unexcited. He had
even gazed at the quiet enthusiasm, and singularly
contradictory passions, that shone in the deep lines
of the speaker's face, with some such reverence as
he might have manifested at an exhibition of one
of the pretended revelations of a prophet of his
tribe. But when the divine came to touch upon
his conditiou after death, his mind received a clear,
and to him an unerring, clue to the truth. Laying
a finger suddenly on the shoulder of Meek, he
interrupted
him, by saying
My father forgets that the skin of his son is red.
The path to the happy hunting-grounds of just
Indians
lies before him.
Heathen, in thy words hath the Master Spirit
of Delusion and Sin uttered his blasphemies!
Hist!Did my father see that which stirred the
bush?
It was the viewless wind, idolatrous and
idle-minded
infant, in the form of adult man!
And yet my father speaks to it, returned the
Indian, with the grave but cutting sarcasm of his
people. See, he added, haughtily, and even
with ferocity; the shadow hath passed the root
of the tree. Let the cunning man of the Pale-faces
stand aside; a Sachem is ready to die!
Meek groaned audibly, and in real sorrow; for,
notwithstanding the veil which exalted theories and
doctrinal subtleties had drawn before his judgment,
the charities of the man were grounded in truth.
Bowing to what he believed to be a mysterious
dispensation
of the will of Heaven, he withdrew to a
short distance, and, kneeling on a rock, his voice
was heard, during the remainder of the ceremonies,
lifting its tones in fervent prayer for the soul of the
condemned.
The divine had no sooner quitted the place, than
Uncas motioned to Dudley to approach. Though
the nature of the borderer was essentially honest
and kind, he was, in opinions and prejudices, but a
creature of the times. If he had assented to the
judgment which committed the captive to the mercy
of his implacable enemies, he had the merit of
having suggested the expedient that was to protect
the sufferer from those refinements in cruelty which
the savages were known to be too ready to inflict.
He had even volunteered to be one of the agents
to enforce his own expedient, though, in so doing, he
had committed no little violence to his natural
inclinations
.
The reader will therefore judge of his
conduct, in this particular, with the degree of lenity
that a right consideration of the condition of the
country and of the usages of the age may require.
There was even a relenting and a yielding of purpose
in the countenance of this witness of the scene, that
was favorable to the safety of the captive, as he
now spoke. His address was first to Uncas.
A happy fortune, Mohegan, something aided by
the power of the white men, hath put this
Narragansett
into thy hands, he said. It is certain that
the Commissioners of the Colony have consented that
thou shouldst exercise thy will on his life; but there
is a voice in the breast of every human being, which
should be stronger than the voice of revenge, and
that is the voice of mercy. It is not yet too late to
hearken to it. Take the promise of the Narragansett
for his faithtake more, take a hostage in this
child, which with its mother shall be guarded among
the English, and let the prisoner go.
My brother asketh with a big mind! said Uncas,
drily.
Vol. II. 19
I know not how nor why it is I ask with this
earnestness, resumed Dudley, but there are old
recollections, and former kindnesses, in the face and
manner of this Indian! And here, too, is one, in the
woman, that I know is tied to some of our
settlements
,
with a bond nearer than that of common
charityMohegan, I will add a goodly gift of powder
and of muskets, if thou wilt listen to mercy, and take
the faith of the Narragansett.
Uncas pointed with ironical coldness to his captive,
as he said
Let Conanchet speak!
Thou hearest, Narragansett. If the man I begin
to suspect thee to be, thou knowest something of
the usages of the whites. Speak; wilt swear to
keep peace with the Mohegans, and to bury the
hatchet in the path between your villages?
The fire that burnt the lodges of my people
turned the heart of Conanchet to stone, was the
steady answer.
Then can I do no more than see the treaty
respected
,
returned Dudley, in disappointment. Thou
hast thy nature, and it will have way. The Lord
have mercy on thee, Indian, and render thee such
judgment as is meet for one of savage opportunities.
He made a gesture to Uncas that he had done,
and fell back a few paces from the tree, his honest
features expressing all his concern, while his eye
did not refuse to do its duty by closely watching
each movement of the adverse parties. At the same
instant, the grim attendants of the Mohegan chief,
in obedience to a sign, took their stations on each
side of the captive. They evidently waited for the
last and fatal signal, to complete their unrelenting
purpose. At this grave moment there was a pause,
as if each of the principal actors pondered serious
matter in his inmost mind.
The Narragansett hath not spoken to his
woman
,
said Uncas, secretly hoping that his enemy
might yet betray some unmanly weakness, in a
moment of so severe trial. She is near.
I said my heart was stone; coldly returned the
Narragansett.
Seethe girl creepeth like a frightened fowl
among the leaves. If my brother Conanchet will
look, he will see his beloved.
The countenance of Conanchet grew dark, but
it did not waver.
We will go among the bushes, if the Sachem
is afraid to speak to his woman with the eyes of a
Mohican on him. A warrior is not a curious girl,
that he wishes to see the sorrow of a chief!
Conanchet felt, hurriedly, for some weapon that
might strike his enemy to the earth, and then a low
murmuring sound at his elbow stole so softly on his
ear, as suddenly to divert the tempest of passion.
Will not a Sachem look at his boy? demanded
the suppliant. It is the son of a great warrior;
why is the face of his father so dark on him?
Narrah-mattah had drawn near enough to her
husband, to be within reach of his hand. With
extended
arms she held the pledge of their former
happiness towards the chief, as if to beseech a last
and kindly look of recognition and love.
Will not the great Narragansett look at his
boy? she repeated, in a voice that sounded like the
lowest notes of some touching melody. Why is
his face so dark, on a woman of his tribe?
Even the stern features of the Mohegan Sagamore
showed that he was touched. Beckoning to his grim
attendants to move behind the tree, he turned and
walked aside, with the noble air of a savage, when
influenced by his better feelings. Then light shot
into the clouded countenance of Conanchet. His
eyes sought the face of his stricken and grieved
consort, who mourned less for his danger than she
grieved for his displeasure. He received the boy
from her hands, and studied his features long and
intently. Beckoning to Dudley, who alone gazed on
the scene, he placed the infant in his arms.
See! he said, pointing to the child; it is a
blossom of the clearings. It will not live in the
shade.
He then fastened a look on his trembling partner.
There was a husband's love in the glance. Flower
of the open land! he said; the Manitou of thy
race will place thee in the fields of thy fathers.
The sun will shine upon thee, and the winds from
beyond the salt lake will blow the clouds into the
woods. A Just and Great Chief cannot shut his ear
to the Good Spirit of his people. Mine calls his son
to hunt among the braves that have gone on the
long path; thine points another way. Go, hear his
voice, and obey. Let thy mind be like a wide
clearing
;
let all its shadows be next the woods; let it
forget the dream it dreamt among the trees. 'Tis
the will of the Manitou.
Conanchet asketh much of his wife; her soul
is only the soul of a woman!
A woman of the Pale-faces; now let her seek
her tribe. Narra-mattah, thy people speak strange
traditions. They say that one just man died for all
colors. I know not. Conanchet is a child among
the cunning, and a man with the warriors. If this
be true, he will look for his woman and boy in the
happy hunting-grounds, and they will come to him.
There is no hunter of the Yengeese that can kill
so many deer. Let Narra-mattah forget her chief
till that time, and then, when she calls him by name,
let her speak strong, for he will be very glad to hear
her voice again. Go; a Sagamore is about to start
on a long journey. He takes leave of his wife with
a heavy spirit. She will put a little flower of two
colors before her eyes, and be happy in its growth.
Now let her go. A Sagamore is about to die.
The attentive woman caught each slow and
measured syllable, as one trained in superstitious
legends would listen to the words of an oracle. But,
accustomed to obedience and bewildered with her
grief, she hesitated no longer. The head of
Narra-mattah
sunk on her bosom, as she left him, and her
face was buried in her robe. The step with which
she passed Uncas was so light as to be inaudible;
but when he saw her tottering form, turning swiftly,
he stretched an arm high in the air. The terrible
mutes just showed themselves from behind the tree,
and vanished. Conanchet started, and it seemed as
if he were about to plunge forward; but,
recovering
himself by a desperate effort, his body sunk
back against the tree, and he fell in the attitude of
a chief seated in council. There was a smile of
fierce triumph on his face, and his lips evidently
moved. Uncas did not breathe, as he bent forward
to listen:
Mohican, I die before my heart is soft! uttered
firmly, but with a struggle, reached his ears. Then
came two long and heavy respirations. One was the
returning breath of Uncas, and the other the dying
sigh of the last Sachem of the broken and dispersed
tribe of the Narragansetts.
19 *
CHAPTER XV.
Each lonely scene shall thee restore;
For thee the tear be duly shed:
Beloved till life could charm no more;
And mourn'd till pity's self be dead.
Collins
.
An
hour later, and the principal actors in the
foregoing scene had disappeared. There remained
only the widowed Narra-mattah, with Dudley, the
divine, and Whittal Ring.
The body of Conanchet still continued, where he
had died, seated like a chief in council. The
daughter
of Content and Ruth had stolen to its side, and
she had taken her seat, in that species of dull woe,
which so frequently attends the first moments of
any unexpected and overwhelming affliction. She
neither spoke, sobbed, nor sorrowed in any way that
grief is wont to affect the human system. The mind
seemed palsied, though a withering sense of the blow
was fearfully engraven on every lineament of her
eloquent face. The color had deserted her cheeks,
the lips were bloodless, while, at moments, they
quivered convulsively, like the tremulous movement
of the sleeping infant; and, at long intervals, her
bosom heaved, as if the spirit within struggled
heavily
to escape from its earthly prison. The child lay
unheeded at her side, and Whittal Ring had placed
himself on the opposite side of the corpse.
The two agents, appointed by the Colony to
witness
the death of Conanchet, stood near, gazing
mournfully on the piteous spectacle. The instant
the spirit of the condemned man had fled, the
prayers
of the divine had ceased, for he believed that
then the soul had gone to judgment. But there was
more of human charity, and less of that exaggerated
severity in his aspect, than was ordinarily seated in
the deep lines of his austere countenance. Now that
the deed was done, and the excitement of his
exalted
theories had given way to the more positive
appearance of the result, he might even have
moments
of harassing doubts concerning the
lawfulness
of an act that he had hitherto veiled under the
forms of a legal and necessary execution of justice.
The mind of Eben Dudley vacillated with none of
the subtleties of doctrine or of law. As there had
been less exaggeration in his original views of the
necessity of the proceeding, so was there more
steadiness
in his contemplation of its fulfilment. Feelings,
they might be termed emotions, of a different
nature
troubled the breast of this resolute but
justly-disposed
borderer.
This hath been a melancholy visitation of
necessity
,
and a severe manifestation of the
foreordering
will, said the Ensign, as he gazed at the
sad spectacle before him. Father and son have
both died, as it were, in my presence, and both have
departed for the world of spirits, in a manner to
prove the inscrutableness of Providence. But dost
not see, here, in the face of her who looketh like a
form of stone, traces of a countenance that is
familiar
?
Thou hast allusion to the consort of Captain
Content Heathcote?
Truly, to her only. Thou art not, reverend sir,
of sufficient residence at the Wish-Ton-Wish, to
remember
that lady in her youthfulness. But to me, the
hour when the Captain led his followers into the
wilderness
,
seemeth but as a morning of the past season.
I was then active in limb, and something idle in
reflection
and discourse; it was in that journey, that
the woman who is now the mother of my children
and I first made acquaintance. I have seen many
comely females in my time, but never did I look on
one so pleasant to the eye, as was the consort of the
Captain until the night of the burning. Thou hast
often heard the loss she then met, and, from that
hour, her beauty hath been that of the October leaf,
rather than its loveliness in the season of fertility.
Now look on the face of this mourner, and say if
there be not here such an image as the water
reflects
from the overhanging bush. In verity, I could
believe it was the sorrowing eye and bereaved look
of the mother herself!
Grief hath struck its blow heavily on this
unoffending
victim, uttered Meek, with great and
subdued
softness in his manner. The voice of
petition
must be raised in her behalf, or
Hist!there are some in the forest; I hear the
rustling of leaves!
The voice of him, who made the earth,
whispereth
in the winds; his breath is the movement of
nature!
Here are living men!But, happily, the
meeting
is friendly, and there will be no further occasion
for strife. The heart of a father is sure as ready
eye and swift foot.
Dudley suffered his musket to fall at his side, and
both he and his companion stood in attitudes of
decent
composure, to await the arrival of those who
approached. The party that drew near, arrived
on the side of the tree opposite to that on which the
death of Conanchet had occurred. The enormous
trunk and swelling roots of the pine concealed the
group at its feet, but the persons of Meek and the
Ensign were soon observed. The instant they were
discovered, he who led the new-comers bent his
footsteps in that direction.
If, as thou hast supposed, the Narragansett hath
again led her thou hast so long mourned into the
forest, said Submission, who acted as guide to those
who followed, here are we, at no great distance
from the place of his resort. It was near yon rock
that he gave the meeting with the bloody-minded
Philip, and the place where I received the boon of
an useless and much-afflicted life from his care, is
within the bosom of that thicket which borders the
brook. This minister of the Lord, and our stout
friend the Ensign, may have further matter to tell
us of his movements.
The speaker had stopped within a short distance
of the two he named, but still on the side of the
tree opposite to that where the body lay. He had
addressed his words to Content, who also halted to
await the arrival of Ruth, who came in the rear,
supported by her son, and attended by Faith and
the physician, all equipped like persons engaged in
a search through the forest. A mother's heart had
sustained the feeble woman for many a weary mile,
but her steps had begun to drag, shortly before they
so happily fell upon the signs of human beings, near
the spot where they now met the two agents of the
Colony.
Notwithstanding the deep interest which belonged
to the respective pursuits of the individuals who
composed these two parties, the interview was
opened
with no lively signs of feeling on either side.
To them a journey in the forest possessed no
novelties
,
and after traversing its mazes for a day, the
newly-arrived encountered their friends, as men
meet on more beaten tracks, in countries where
roads unavoidably lead them to cross each other's
paths. Even the appearance of Submission in front
of the travellers, elicited no marks of surprise in
the unmoved features of those who witnessed his
approach. Indeed, the mutual composure of one
who had so long concealed his person, and of those
who had more than once seen him in striking and
mysterious situations, might well justify a belief
that the secret of his presence near the valley had
not been confined to the family of the Heathcotes.
This fact is rendered still more probable, by the
recollection
of the honesty of Dudley, and of the
professional
characters of the two others.
We are on the trail of one fled, as the truant
fawn seeketh again the covers of the woods, said
Content. Our hunt was uncertain, and it might
have been vain, so many feet have lately crossed
the forest, were it not that Providence hath cast
our route on that of our friend, here, who hath had
reason to know the probable situation of the Indian
camp. Hast seen aught of the Sachem of the
Narragansetts
,
Dudley? and where are those thou led'st
against the subtle Philip? That thou fell upon his
party, we have heard; though further than thy
general success, we have yet to learn. The
Wampanoag
escaped thee?
The wicked agencies that back him in his
designs
,
profited the savage in his extremity. Else
would his fate have been that which I fear a far
worthier spirit hath been doomed to suffer.
Of whom dost speak?but it mattereth not.
We seek our child; she, whom thou hast known,
and whom thou hast so lately seen, hath again left
us. We seek her in the camp of him who hath
been to herDudley, hast seen aught of the
Narragansett
Sachem?
The Ensign looked at Ruth, as he had once
before
been seen to gaze on the sorrowing features
of the woman; but he spoke not. Meek folded his
arms on his breast, and seemed to pray inwardly.
There was, however, one who broke the silence,
though his tones were low and menacing.
It was a bloody deed! muttered the innocent.
The lying Mohican hath struck a Great Chief,
from behind. Let him dig the prints of his
moccason
from the earth, with his nails, like a burrowing
fox; for there'll be one on his trail, before he can
hide his head. Nipset will be a warrior the next
snow!
There speaks my witless brother! exclaimed
Faith, rushing aheadshe recoiled, covered her
face with her hands, and sunk upon the ground,
under the violence of the surprise that followed.
Though time moved with his ordinary pace, it
appeared to those who witnessed the scene which
succeeded, as if the emotions of many days were
collected within the brief compass of a few minutes.
We shall not dwell on the first harrowing and
exciting
moments of the appalling discovery.
A short half-hour served to make each person
acquainted with all that it was necessary to know.
We shall therefore transfer the narrative to the
end of that period.
The body of Conanchet still rested against the
tree. The eyes were open, and though glazed in
death, there still remained about the brow, the
compressed lips, and the expansive nostrils, much
of that lofty firmness which had sustained him in
the last trial of life. The arms were passive at its
sides, but one hand was clenched in the manner
with which it had so often grasped the tomahawk,
while the other had lost its power in a vain effort
to seek the place in the girdle where the keen knife
should have been. These two movements had
probably been involuntary, for, in all other respects,
the form was expressive of dignity and repose. At
its side, the imaginary Nipset still held his place,
menacing discontent betraying itself through the
ordinary dull fatuity of his countenance.
The others present were collected around the
mother and her stricken child. It would seem that
all other feelings were, for the moment, absorbed
in apprehensions for the latter. There was much
reason to dread, that the recent shock had suddenly
deranged some of that fearful machinery which
links the soul to the body. This dreaded effect,
however, was more to be apprehended by a general
apathy and failing of the system, than by any
violent
and intelligible symptom.
The pulses still vibrated, but it was heavily, and
like the irregular and faltering evolutions of the
mill, which the dying breeze is ceasing to fan. The
pallid countenance was fixed in its expression of
anguish. Color there was none, even the lips
resembling
the unnatural character which is given
by images of wax. Her limbs, like her features,
were immovable; and yet there was, at moments,
a working of the latter, which would seem to imply
not only consciousness, but vivid and painful
recollections
of the realities of her situation.
This surpasseth my art, said Doctor Ergot,
raising himself from a long and silent examination
of the pulse; there is a mystery in the
construction
of the body, which human knowledge hath not
yet unveiled. The currents of existence are
sometimes
frozen in an incomprehensible manner, and
this I conceive to be a case that would confound
the most learned of our art, even in the oldest
countries
of the earth. It hath been my fortune to see
many arrive and but few depart from this busy
world, and yet do I presume to foretell that here is
one destined to quit its limits ere the natural
number
of her days has been filled!
Let us address ourselves, in behalf of that which
shall never die, to Him who hath ordered the event
from the commencement of time, said Meek,
motioning
to those around him to join in prayer.
The divine then lifted up his voice, under the
arches of the forest, in an ardent, pious, and
eloquent
petition. When this solemn duty was
performed
,
attention was again bestowed on the sufferer.
To the surprise of all, it was found that the blood
had revisited her face, and that her radiant eyes
were lighted with an expression of brightness and
peace. She even motioned to be raised, in order
that those near her person might be better seen.
Dost know us? asked the trembling Ruth.
Look on thy friends, long-mourned and
much-suffering
daughter! 'Tis she who sorrowed over thy
infant afflictions, who rejoiced in thy childish
happiness
,
and who hath so bitterly wept thy loss, that
craveth the boon. In this awful moment, recall the
lessons of youth. Surely, surely, the God that
bestowed
thee in mercy, though he hath led thee on a
wonderful and inscrutable path, will not desert thee
at the end! Think of thy early instruction, child
of my love; feeble of spirit as thou art, the seed
may yet quicken, though it hath been cast where
the glory of the promise hath so long been hid.
Mother! said a low, struggling voice, in reply.
The word reached every ear, and it caused a
general
and breathless attention. The sound was soft and
low, perhaps infantile, but it was uttered without
accent, and clearly.
Motherwhy are we in the forest? continued
the speaker. Have any robbed us of our home,
that we dwell beneath the trees?
Ruth raised a hand, imploringly, for none to
interrupt
the illusion.
Nature hath revived the recollections of her
youth, she whispered. Let the spirit depart, if
such be his holy will, in the blessedness of infant
innocence!
Why do Mark and Martha stay? continued
Vol. II. 20
the other. It is not safe, thou knowest, mother, to
wander far in the woods; the heathen may be out
of their towns, and one cannot say what evil chance
might happen to the indiscreet.
A groan struggled from the chest of Content, and
the muscular hand of Dudley compressed itself on
the shoulder of his wife, until the breathlessly
attentive
woman withdrew, unconsciously, with pain.
I've said as much to Mark, for he doth not
always
remember thy warnings, mother; and those
children do so love to wander together!but Mark
is, in common, good; do not chide, if he stray too
farmother, thou wilt not chide!
The youth turned his head, for even at that
moment
,
the pride of young manhood prompted him
to conceal his weakness.
Hast prayed to-day, my daughter? said Ruth,
struggling to be composed. Thou shouldst not
forget thy duty to His blessed name, even though
we are houseless in the woods.
I will pray now, mother, said the creature of
this mysterious hallucination, struggling to bow her
face into the lap of Ruth. Her wish was indulged,
and for a minute, the same low childish voice was
heard distinctly repeating the words of a prayer
adapted to the earliest period of life. Feeble as
were the sounds, none of their intonations escaped
the listeners, until near the close, when a species of
holy calm seemed to absorb the utterance. Ruth
raised the form of her child, and saw that the
features
bone the placid look of a sleeping infant. Life
played upon them, as the flickering light lingers on
the dying torch. Her dove-like eyes looked up into
the face of Ruth, and the anguish of the mother
was alleviated by a smile of intelligence and love.
The full and sweet organs next rolled from face to
face, recognition and pleasure accompanying each
change. On Whittal they became perplexed and
doubtful, but when they met the fixed, frowning,
and still commanding eye of the dead chief, their
wandering ceased for ever. There was a minute,
during which, fear, doubt, wildness, and early
recollections
,
struggled for the mastery. The hands of
Narra-mattah trembled, and she clung convulsively
to the robe of Ruth.
Mother!mother! whispered the agitated
victim of so many conflicting emotions, I will pray
againan evil Spirit besets me.
Ruth felt the force of her grasp, and heard the
breathing of a few words of petition; after which
the voice was mute, and the hands relaxed their
hold. When the face of the nearly insensible parent
was withdrawn, to the others the dead appeared to
gaze at each other with a mysterious and unearthly
intelligence. The look of the Narragansett was still,
as in his hour of pride, haughty, unyielding, and
filled with defiance; while that of the creature who
had so long lived in his kindness was perplexed,
timid, but not without a character of hope. A solemn
calm succeeded, and when Meek raised his voice
again in the forest, it was to ask the Omnipotent
Ruler of Heaven and Earth to sanctify his
dispensation
to those who survived.
The changes which have been wrought, on this
continent, within a century and a half, are very
wonderful. Cities have appeared where the
wilderness
then covered the ground, and there is good
reason
to believe that a flourishing town now stands on,
or near, the spot where Conanchet met his death.
But, notwithstanding so much activity has prevailed
in the country, the valley of this legend remains but
little altered. The hamlet has increased to a
village
;
the farms possess more of the air of
cultivation
;
the dwellings are enlarged, and are somewhat
more commodious; the churches are increased to
three; the garrisoned houses, and all other signs of
apprehension from violence, have long since
disappeared
;
but still the place is secluded, little
known, and strongly impressed with the marks of
its original sylvan character.
A descendant of Mark and Martha is, at this
hour, the proprietor of the estate on which so many
of the moving incidents of our simple tale were
enacted. Even the building which was the second
habitation of his ancestor, is in part standing, though
additions and improvements have greatly changed
its form. The orchards, which in 1675 were young
and thrifty, are now old and decaying. The trees
have yielded their character for excellence, to those
varieties of the fruit which the soil and the climate
have since made known to the inhabitants. Still
they stand, for it is known that fearful scenes
occurred
beneath their shades, and there is a deep
moral interest attached to their existence.
The ruins of the block-house, though much
dilapidated
and crumbling, are also visible. At their
foot is the last abode of all the Heathcotes who
have lived and died in that vicinity, for near two
centuries. The graves of those of later times are
known by tablets of marble: but nearer to the ruin
are many, whose monuments, half-concealed in the
grass, are cut in the common coarse free-stone of
the country.
One, who took an interest in the recollection of
days long gone, had occasion a few years since to
visit the spot. It was easy to trace the births and
deaths of generations, by the visible records on the
more pretending monuments of those interred within
a hundred years. Beyond that period, research
became difficult and painful. But his zeal was not
to be easily defeated.
To every little mound, one only excepted, there
was a stone, and on each stone, illegible as it might
be, there was an inscription. The undistinguished
grave, it was presumed, by its size and its position,
was that which contained the bones of those who fell
in the night of the burning. There was another,
which bore, in deep letters, the name of the Puritan.
His death occurred in 1680. At its side there was
an humble stone, on which, with great difficulty, was
traced the single word `Submission.' It was
impossible
to ascertain whether the date was 1680, or
1690. The same mystery remained about the death
of this man, as had clouded so much of his life. His
real name, parentage, or character, further than
they have been revealed in these pages, was never
traced. There still remains, however, in the family
of the Heathcotes, an orderly-book of a troop of
horse, which tradition says had some connexion with
his fortunes. Affixed to this defaced and imperfect
document, is a fragment of some diary or journal,
which has reference to the condemnation of Charles
I. to the scaffold.
The body of Content lay near his infant children,
and it would seem that he still lived in the first
quarter of the last century. There was an aged man,
lately in existence, who remembers to have seen him,
a white-headed patriarch, reverend by his years,
and respected for his meekness and justice. He had
passed nearly, or quite, half-a-century unmarried.
This melancholy fact was sufficiently shown by the
date on the stone of the nearest mound. The
inscription
denoted it to be the grave of Ruth,
daughter of George Harding of the Colony of
Massachusetts
Bay, and wife of Capt. Content
Heathcote
.
She died in the autumn of 1675, with, as the
stone reveals, a spirit broken for the purposes of
earth, by much family affliction, though with hopes
20 *
justified by the covenant, and her faith in the
Lord.
The divine, who lately officiated, if he do not
now officiate, in the principal church of the village,
is called the Reverend Meek Lamb. Though
claiming
a descent from him who ministered in the temple
at the period of our tale, time and intermarriages
have produced this change in the name, and happily
some others in doctrinal interpretations of duty.
When this worthy servant of the church found the
object which had led one, born in another state,
and claiming descent from a line of religionists who
had left the common country of their ancestors to
worship in still another manner, to take an interest
in the fortunes of those who first inhabited the
valley, he found a pleasure in aiding the inquiries.
The abodes of the Dudleys and Rings were numerous
in the village and its environs. He showed a stone,
surrounded by many others that bore these names,
on which was rudely carved, I am Nipset, a
Narragansett
;
the next snow, I shall be a warrior! There
is a rumor, that though the hapless brother of Faith
gradually returned to the ways of civilized life, he
had frequent glimpses of those seducing pleasures
which he had once enjoyed in the freedom of the
woods.
Whilst wandering through these melancholy
remains
of former scenes, a question was put to the
divine concerning the place where Conanchet was
interred. He readily offered to show it. The grave
was on the hill, and distinguished only by a
head-stone
that the grass had concealed from former
search. It merely bore the wordsthe
Narragansett
.
And this at its side? asked the inquirer. Here
is one also, before unnoted.
The divine bent in the grass, and scraped the
moss from the humble monument. He then pointed
to a line, carved with more than usual care. The
inscription simply said
The Wept of Wish-Ton-Wish
.
THE END.